VOL. II. 2
LETTER VIII.
FROM PISO TO FAUSTA.
Marcus
and Lucilia are inconsolable. Their grief,
I fear, will be lasting as it is violent. They have no
resource but to plunge into affairs and drive away
memory
by some active and engrossing occupation. Yet
they cannot always live abroad; they must at times
return to themselves and join the company of their own
thoughts. And then memory is not to be put off; at
such moments this faculty seems to constitute the mind
more than any other. It becomes in a manner the mind
itself. The past rises up in spite of ourselves, and
overshadows
the present. Whether its scenes have been
prosperous or afflictive, but especially if they have been
shameful, do they present themselves with all the
vividness
of the objects before us and the passing hour, and
minister to our joy or increase our pains. We in vain
attempt to escape. We are prisoners in the hands of a
giant. To forget is not in our power. The will is
impotent
.
The effort to forget is often but an effort to
remember
.
Fast as we fly, so fast the enemy of our peace
pursues. Memory is a companion who never leaves us
or never leaves us long. It is the true Nemesis.
Tartarean regions have no worse woes, nor the Hell of
Christians, than memory inflicts upon those who have
done evil. My friends struggle in vain. They have
not done evil indeed, but they have suffered it. The
sorest calamity that afflicts mortals has overtaken them;
their choicest jewel has been torn from them; and they
can no more drown the memory of their loss than they
can take that faculty itself and tear it from their souls.
Comfort cannot come from that quarter. It can come
only from being re-possessed of that which has been lost
hereafter and from enjoying the hope of that felicity now.
See how Marcus writes. After much else he says,
I miss you, Piso, and the conversations which we
had together. I know not how it is, but your presence
acted as a restraint upon my hot and impatient temper.
Since your departure I have been little less than mad,
and so far from being of service to Lucilia, she has been
compelled to moderate her own grief in the hope to
assuage
mine. I have done nothing but rave, and curse
my evil fortune. And can anything else be looked for?
How should a man be otherwise than exasperated when
the very thing he loves best in the wide universe is,
without a moment's warning, snatched away from him?
A man falls into a passion if his seal is stolen, or his
rings, or his jewels; if his dwelling burns down, or his
slaves run away or die by some pestilence. And why
should he not much more when the providence of the
gods, or the same power whatever it may be that gave
us a child, tears it from us again; and just then when
we have so grown into it that it is like hewing us in
two? I can believe in nothing but capricious chance.
We live by chance and so we die. Such events are
otherwise inexplicable. For what reason can by the
most ingenious be assigned for giving life for a few years
to a being like Gallus, and who then, before he is more
than just past the threshold of life, before a single power
of his nature has put itself forth, but at the moment
when he is bound to his parents by ties of love which
never afterwards would be stronger  is struck dead?
We can give no account of it. It is irreconcilable with
the hypothesis of an intelligent and good Providence.
It has all the features of chance upon it. A god could
not have done it unless he had been the god of Tartarus.
Dark Pluto might, or the avenging Furies, were they
supreme. But away with such dreams! The slaves,
who were his proper attendants, have been scourged and
crucified. That at first gave me some relief; but
already
I repent of it. So it is with me; I rush suddenly
upon what at the moment I think right, and then as
suddenly
think and feel that I have done wrong, and so
suffer. I see and experience nothing but suffering,
whichever way I turn. Truly we are riddles. Piso, you
cannot conceive of my loss. It was our only child
and the only one we shall ever know. I wish that I
believed
in the gods that I might curse them.
And much more in the same frantic way. Time will
blunt his grief; but it will bring him I fear no other nor
better comfort. He hopes for oblivion of his loss; but
that can never be. He may cease to grieve as he grieves
now; but he can never cease to remember. I trust to
see him again ere long, and turn his thoughts into a
better channel.
I did not forget to keep my promise to the wife of Macer.
In truth I had long regarded it as essential to our safety
almost, certainly to our success, that this man, and others
of the same character, should be restrained in some way
in their course of mistaken zeal; and had long intended
to use what influence to that end I might possess.
Probus
had promised to accompany me, and do what in him
lay, to rescue religion from this peril at the hands of one
of her best friends. He joined me toward the evening
of the same day on which I had seen the wife of Macer,
and we took our way towards his dwelling.
It was already past the hour of twilight when we
reached the part of the city where Macer dwells, and
entered the ruins among which his cabin stands. These
ruins are those of extensive and magnificent baths
destroyed
a long time ago, and to this day remaining as
the flames left them. At the rear of them, far from the
street and concealed from it by arches and columns and
fragments of wall, we were directed by the rays of a
single light streaming from a window, to the place we
sought. We wound our way among these fallen or still
standing masses of stone, and which frequently hid from
us the object of our search, till, as we found ourselves
near the spot, we were arrested by the sound of a single
voice uttering itself with vehemence and yet solemnity.
We paused, but could not distinguish the words used;
but the same conviction possessed us as to its cause. It
was Macer at prayer. We moved nearer, so that
without
disturbing the family we might still make ourselves
of the number of hearers. His voice, loud and shrill,
echoed among the ruins and conveyed to us, though at
some distance, every word that he uttered. But for the
noise of carriages and passengers it would have
penetrated
even to the streets. The words we caught were
such as these
`If they hear thee not, O Lord, nor reverence thy
messengers, but deny thee and turn upon those whom
thou sendest the lip of scorn and the eye of pride, and
will none of their teachings, and so do despite to the
spirit of thy grace, and crucify the Lord afresh, then do
thou, O Lord, come upon them as once upon the cities
of the plain in the times of thine anger. Let fire from
Heaven consume them. Let the earth yawn and
swallow
them up. Tear up the foundations of this modern
Babylon; level to the earth her proud walls; and let
her stand for a reproach, and a hissing, and a scorn,
through all generations: so that men shall say as they
pass by, lo! the fate of them that held to their idols
rather than serve the living God; their proud palaces
are now dwellings of dragons, and over her ruins the
trees of the forest are now spreading their branches.
But yet, O Lord, may this never be; but may a way of
escape be made for them through thy mercy. And to this
end may we thy servants, to whom thou hast given the
sword of the spirit, gird it upon our sides, lift up our
voice and spare not, day and night, morning and
evening
,
in the public place, and at the corners of the streets;
in all places, and in every presence, proclaiming the good
news of salvation. Let not cowardice seal our lips.
Whether before gentile or Jew, emperor or slave, may
we speak as becomes the Lord's anointed. Warm the
hearts of the cold and dead; put fire into them; fire
from thine own altar. The world, O Lord, and its
honors
and vanities, seduce thine own servants from thee.
They are afraid, they are cold, they are dead, and the
enemy lifts himself up and triumphs. For this we
would mourn and lament. Give us, O Lord, the
courage
and the zeal of thine early apostles and teachers so
that no fear of tortures and death may make us traitors
to Christ and thee.'
It was a long time that he went on in this strain,
inveighing
with heat and violence against all who
withdrew
their hand from the work, or abated their zeal.
When he had ceased, and we stood waiting to judge
whether the service were wholly ended, the voices of the
whole family apparently, were joined together in a hymn
of praise  Macer's now more gentle and subdued, as if
to hear himself the tones of the children and of his wife
who accompanied him. The burden of the hymn was
also a prayer for a spirit of fidelity and a temper of
patience
,
in the cause of truth and Christ. It was worship
in the highest sense, and none within the dwelling could
have joined more heartily than we did who stood
without
.
When it was ended, and with it evidently the evening
service, we approached, and knocked for admittance.
Macer appeared holding a light above his head, and
perceiving
who his guests were gave us cordial welcome,
at the same time showing us into his small apartment
and placing stools for our accommodation. The room
in which we were was small and vaulted, and built of
stone in the most solid manner. I saw at once that it
was one of the smaller rooms of the ancient bath, which
had escaped entire destruction and now served as a
comfortable
habitation. A door on the inner side appeared
to connect it with a number of similar apartments. A
table in the centre and a few stools, a shelf on which
were arranged the few articles which they possessed
both for cooking and eating their food, constituted the
furniture of the room. In the room next beyond I could
see pallets of straw laid upon the floor, and which served
for beds. Macer, his wife, and six children, composed
the family then present; the two elder sons being yet
absent at their work in the shop of Demetrius. The
mother held at her breast an infant of a year or more;
one of three years sprang again upon his father's lap, as
he resumed his seat after our entrance, whence he had
apparently been just dislodged, the rest sitting in obscure
parts of the room were at first scarcely visible. The wife
of Macer expressed heartily her pleasure at seeing us,
and said even more by her flushed and animated
countenance
than by her words. The severe countenance
of Macer himself relaxed and gave signs of satisfaction.
`I owe you, Piso,' he said, `many thanks for mercies
shown to my wife and my little ones here, and I am
glad to see you among us. We are far apart enough as
the world measures such things, but in Christ we are
one. At such times as these, when the Prince of
Darkness
rules, we ought if ever to draw toward each other
that so we may make better our common defence. I
greet you as a brother  I trust to love you as one.'
I told him that nothing should be wanting on my
part toward a free and friendly intercourse; that from
all I had heard of him I had conceived a high regard for
him, and owed him more thanks for what he had done
in behalf of our religion, than he could me for any
services
I had rendered him.
`Me?' said he, and his head fell upon his bosom.
`What have I done for Christ to deserve the thanks of
any? I have preached and I have prayed; I have
opposed
heresies and errors; I have wrestled with the
enemies and corrupters of our faith within our own body
and without; but the fruit seems nothing. The gentile
is still omnipotent  heresy and error still abound.'
`Yes, Macer,' I replied, `that is certainly so, and may
be so for many years to come, but still we are gaining.
He who can remember twenty years can count a great
increase. After the testimony borne by the martyrs of
the Decian persecution to their faith, and all the proof
they gave of sincere attachment to the doctrine of Christ,
crowds have entered the church, an hundred for every
one whose blood then flowed.'
`And now,' said Macer, his eye kindling with its wild
fires, `the church is dead! The truest prayer that the
Christian can now offer is that it would please God to
try us again as it were by fire! We slumber, Piso!
The Christians are not now the Nazarites they were in
the first age of the church. Divisions have crept in;
tares have been sown with the wheat, and have come
up, and are choking the true plants of God. I know
not but the signs of terror, which are scaring the
heavens
ought rather to be hailed as tokens of love. Better
a thousand perish on the rack or by the axe than that
the church itself faint away and die.'
`It will not do,' said Probus, `always to depend upon
such remedies of our sloth and heresies, Macer. Surely
it were better to prosper in some other and happier way.
All I think we can say of persecution, and of the
oppositions
of our enemies, is this, that if it be in the
providence
VOL. II. 3
of God that they cannot be avoided, we have cause
to bless him that their issue is good rather than evil;
that they serve as tests by which the genuine is tried
and proved; that they give the best testimony and
highest
to the world, that man can give of his sincerity; that
they serve to bind together into one compact and
invincible
phalanx the disciples of our common master,
however
in many things they may divide and separate. But
were it not better, if we could attain an equal good
without
the suffering?'
`I believe that to be impossible,' said Macer. `Since
Jesus began his ministry persecution has been the rod
that has been laid upon the church without sparing, and
the fruit has been abundant. Without it, like these
foolish children, we might run riot in all iniquity.'
`I do not say that the rod has not been needed,'
answered
Probus, `nor that good has not ensued; but only
that it would be better, wiser, and happier, to reach the
same good without the rod; just as it is better when
your children without chastisement fulfill your wishes
and perform their tasks. We hope and trust that our
children will grow up to such virtue that they will no
longer need the discipline of suffering to make them
better
.
Ought we not to look and pray for a period to
arrive
in the history of the church, when men shall no
longer need to be lashed and driven, but shall of
themselves
discern what is best and cleave to it?'
`That might indeed be better,' replied the other; `but
the time is not come for it yet. The church I say is
corrupt, and it cries out for another purging. Christians
are already lording it over one another. The bishop of
Rome sets himself up, as a lord, over subjects. A
Roman
Cesar walks it not more proudly. What with his
robes of state, and his seat of gold, and his golden rod,
and his altar set out with vessels of gold and silver,
and his long train of menials and subordinates, poor
simple Macer, who learned of Christ, as he hopes, is at
a loss to discern the follower of the lowly Jesus, but
takes Felix the Christian servant for some Fronto of a
Heathen temple! Were the power mine, as the will is,
never would I stay for Aurelian, but my own arm should
sweep from the places they pollute the worst enemies of
the Saviour. Did Jesus die that Felix might flaunt his
peacock's feathers in the face of Rome?'
`We cannot hope, Macer,' answered Probus, `to grow
up to perfection at once. I see and bewail the errors at
which you point as well as you. But if to remove them
we bring down the heavy arm of Rome upon our heads
the remedy may prove worse than the disease.'
`No. That could not be! Let those who with open
eyes abuse the gifts of God, perish! If this faith cannot
be maintained undefiled by Heathen additions, let it
perish
!'
`But God dealeth not so with us,' continued Probus;
`he beareth long and patiently. We are not destroyed
because in the first years of our life we do not rise to all
virtue, but are spared to fourscore. Ought we not to
manifest a like patience and forbearance? By waiting
patiently we shall see our faults, and one by one correct
them. There is still some reason and discernment left
among us. We are not all fools and blind. And the
faults which we correct ourselves, by our own action,
and the conviction of our own minds acting freely and
voluntarily, will be more truly corrected, than if we are
but frightened away from them for a time by the terrors
of the Roman sword. I think, Macer, and so thinks
Piso, that far from seeking to inflame the common
mind, and so drawing upon us the evils which are now
with reason apprehended, we should rather aim to ward
them off.'
`Never!' cried Macer with utmost indignation. `Shall
the soldier of the cross shrink '
`No, Macer, he need not shrink  let him stand armed
in panoply complete  prompt to serve  willing to die;
but let him not wantonly provoke an enemy who may
not only destroy him, that were a little thing, but in the
fury of the onset, thousands with him, and perhaps with
them the very faith for which they die! The Christian
is not guiltless who  though it be in the cause of
Christ  rushes upon unnecessary death. You, Macer,
are not only a Christian and soldier of Jesus Christ, but
a man who having received life from the Creator, have
no right wantonly to throw it away. You are a
husband
,
and you are bound to live for your wife;  these
are your children, and you are bound to live for them.'
`He,' said Macer, solemnly, `who hateth not father
and mother and wife and children and brethren and
sister
,
yea and his own life also, cannot be my disciple.'
`Yes,' replied Probus, `that is true; we are to be
ready and willing to suffer for Christ and truth; but not
to seek it. He who seeks martyrdom is no martyr.
Selfish passions have then mingled their impure current
with that of love to God, and the sacrifice is not
without
spot and blemish. Jesus did not so; nor his first
followers. When the Lord was persecuted in one city,
he staid not there to inflame it more and more; he fled
to another. Paul and Peter and Barnabas stood ever
for their rights; they suffered not wrong willingly.
When the ark of truth is intrusted to few hands, they
must bear it forward boldly, but with care, else are they
at a blow cut off, and the ark with its precious burden
borne away and lost  or miracles alone can rescue it.
But when the time comes that no prudence nor care will
avail, then they may not refuse the issue, but must show
that life is nothing in comparison of truth and God.'
`Probus,' said Macer, `I like not your timid counsels.
'Tis not by such that Christ's cause shall ever advance,
or that period ever come when he, the long-looked and
waited for, shall descend, and the millenial reign begin.
Life is nothing to me and less than nothing. I hold it
as dirt and dross. And if by throwing it away I can
add such a commentary to my preaching as shall strike
a single Pagan heart I shall not have died in vain; and
if the blood that shall flow from these veins may serve
but as a purge to carry off the foul humors that now
fester and rage in the body of the church, thrice happy
shall I be to see it flow. And for these  let them be
as the women and children of other times, and hold not
back when their master calls. Arria! do thou set
before
thee St. Blandina, and if the Lord let thee be as
her, thou wilt have cause to bless his name.'
`Never, Macer, would I shrink from any trial to
which the Lord in his wisdom might call me  that you
know. But has not Probus uttered a truth when he
says that we are not innocent, and never glorious, when
we seek death? that he who seeks martyrdom is no
martyr? Listen, Macer, to the wisdom of Probus and
the noble Piso. Did you not promise that you would
patiently hear them?'
VOL. II. 3*
`Woman  I have heard them  their words are
naught, stark naught, or worse. Where would have
been the blessed gospel at this hour had it been
committed
to such counsels? Even under Nero would it have
died for want of those who were willing to die for it. I
am a soldier of the cross, whose very vocation it is to
fight and die. And if I may but die, blessed Jesus, for
thee! then may I hope that thou wilt deal mercifully
with thy servant at thy judgment-seat. I hear thy voice
ever sounding in my ear, reproving me for my
cowardice
.
Have patience with me, and I will give thee all.
And if labor, and torture, and death, would but cancel
sin!  But alas! even they may not suffice.'
`Then, dear father,' said one of his daughters who
had drawn near and seated herself at his knee, while
the others had gathered round, `then will we add
ourselves
to the sacrifice.'
`Would you?' said Macer  in an absent, musing
way  as if some other thought were occupying him.
Thinking that his love of his children, evidently a
very strong affection in him, might be made to act as a
restraint, I said, `that I feared he greatly exposed his
little family to unnecessary danger. Already had his
dwelling been once assailed, and the people were now
ripe for any violence. This group of little ones can ill
encounter a rude and furious mob.'
`They can die, can they not?' said Macer. `Is that
difficult, or impossible? If the Lord need them they
are his. I can ask no happier lot for them than that by
death they may glorify God. And what is it to die so,
more than in another way? Let them die in their beds,
and whom do they benefit? They die then to
themselves
,
and no one is the gainer; let them die by the
sword of Varus, or by the stones of the populace, and
then they become themselves stones in the foundation
of that temple of God, of which Jesus is the chief
cornerstone
,
and they are glorious forever. What say you,
Cicer, will you die for Christ?'
The little fellow hid his head in his father's bosom at
this sudden appeal, but soon drew it out and said,
`I would rather die for you, father.'
`Ah!' said Macer, `how am I punished in my
children
!
Cicer, would you not die for Christ?'
`I would die for him if you wish it.'
`Macer,' said Probus, `do you not see how God has
bound you and this family into one? and he surely
requires
you not to separate yourself, their natural
protector
,
from them forever; still less, to involve them in
all the sufferings which taking the course you do may
come upon them at any hour.'
`Probus! their death would give me more pleasure
than their life, dying for Christ. I love them now and
here, fondly as ever parent loved his children,  but
what is now, and here? Nothing. The suffering of
an hour or of a moment joins us together again, where
suffering shall be no more and death no more.
To-morrow
!
yes, to-morrow! would I that the wrath of
these idol-worshippers might be turned against us.
Rome must be roused; she sleeps the sleep of death;
and the church sleeps it too; both need that they who
are for the Lord should stand forth, and not waiting to
be attacked, themselves assail the enemy, who need but
to be assailed with the zeal and courage of men, who
were once to be found in the church, to be driven at all
points.'
`But, father,' said the daughter who had spoken
before
,
`other Christians think not so. They believe for
the most part, as I hear, with Probus and Piso, that on
no account should we provoke the gentiles, or give them
cause of complaint against us; they think that to do so
would greatly harm us; that our duty is to go on the
even tenor of our way, worshipping God after our own
doctrine, and in our own manner, and claiming and
exercising
all our rights as citizens, but abstaining from
every act that might rouse their anger, or needlessly
irritate
them  irritated necessarily almost beyond bearing
by the wide and increasing prosperity of our faith and
the daily falling away of the temple worshippers. Would
it be right, dearest father, to do that which others
approve
not, and the effect of which might be not only to
draw down evil upon your and our heads, but upon
thousands of others? We cannot separate ourselves
from our brethren; if one suffers all will suffer '
`lia, my daughter, there is a judge within the
breast, whom I am bound to obey rather than any other
counsel, of either man or woman. I cannot believe,
because
another believes, a certain truth. Neither can I
act in a certain way because others hold it their duty to
act so. I must obey the inward voice, and no other. If
I abandon this, I am lost  I am on the desert without
sun, moon or stars to guide me. All the powers of
the earth could not bribe nor drag me from that which I
hold to be the true order of conduct for me; shown by
the finger of God to be such.'
`But, father,' continued the daughter, pursuing her
object, `are we not too lately entered among the
Christians
to take upon us a course which they condemn? It
is but yesterday that we were among the enemies of
this faith. Are we to-day to assume the part of
leaders
?
Would not modesty teach us a different lesson?'
`Modesty has nothing to do with truth,' said Macer.
`He who is wholly a Christian to-day, is all that he can
be to-morrow, or next year. I am as old in faith and
zeal as Piso, Probus, or Felix. No one can believe
more, or more heartily, by believing longer. Nay, it is
they who are newly saved who are most sensible to the
blessing. Custom in religion as in other things dulls
the soul. Were I a Christian much longer before God
called me to serve him by suffering or death, I fear I
should be then spiritually dead, and so worse than
before
I believed. Let it be to-morrow, O Lord, that I
shall glorify thee!'
It was plain that little impression was to be made
upon the mind of Macer. But we ceased not to urge
him farther, his wife and elder children uniting with us
in importunate entreaty and expostulation. But all in
vain. In his stern and honest enthusiasm he believed
all prudence cowardice; all calculation, worldliness; all
moderation and temperance treason to the church and
Christ. Yet none of the natural current of the
affections
seemed to be dried up or poisoned. No one could
be more bound to his wife and children; and toward us,
though in our talk we spared him not, he ever
maintained
the same frank and open manner  yielding never
an inch of ground, and uttering himself with an
earnestness
and fury such as I never saw in another; but soon
as he had ceased speaking subsiding into a gentleness
that seemed almost that of a woman, and playfully
sporting with the little boy that he held on his knee.
Soon as our conversation was ended, Macer, turning
to his wife, exclaimed,
`But what hinders that we should set before our
visiters
such hospitality as our poor house affords? Arria,
have we not such as may well enough entertain
Christians
?'
lia, at a word from her mother, and accompanied
by her sister, immediately busied themselves in the
simple
rites of hospitality, and soon spread out the table
which stood in the centre of the room with bread,
lettuces
,
figs, and a flask of wine. While they were thus
engaged I could not but observe the difference in
appearance
of the two elder sisters, who with equal alacrity
were setting out the simple provisions for our repast.
One was clad like the others of the family in the
garment
common to the poor. The other  she who had
spoken  was arrayed, not richly but almost so, or I
should rather say fancifully, and with studied regard to
effect. While I was wondering at this, and seeking in
my own mind for its explanation, I was interrupted in
my thoughts by Macer.
`Thanks to Aurelian, Piso, we are able, though poor
as you see and dwelling in these almost subterranean
vaults, to live above the fear of absolute want. But
especially
are we indebted for many of our comforts, and
for such luxury as this flask of Massican, to my partly
gentile daughter lia, who you behold moving among
us, as if by her attire she were not of us  but Cicer's
heart is not truer  and who will, despite her faith and
her father's bidding, dance and sing for the merriment
of these idolaters. Never before, I believe, had Christian
preacher a dancing-girl for a daughter.'
A deep blush passed over the features of the
daughter
as she answered,
`But, father, you know that in my judgment  and
whose in this matter is so to be trusted?  I am in no
way injured by my art, and it adds somewhat to the
common stock. I see not why I need be any the less a
Christian because I dance; especially as with me it is
but one of the forms of labor. Were it forbidden by our
faith, or could it be shown to be to me an evil, I would
cease. But most sure I am it is neither. Let me now
appeal to Probus for my justification, and to Piso.'
`Doubtless,' said Probus, `those Christians are right
who abstain from the theatres, the amphitheatres, the
circuses, and from the places of public amusement
where sights and sounds meet ear and eye such as the
pure should never hear nor see, and such as none can
hear or see and maintain their purity. The soul is
damaged
in spite of herself. But for these arts of music and
dancing, practiced for the harmless entertainment of
those who feast their friends,  where alone I warrant
lia is found  who can doubt that she is right?
Were not the reception of the religion of Christ
compatible
with the indulgence in innocent amusement or the
practice of harmless arts such as these, few I fear would
receive it. Christianity condemns many things which
by Pagans are held to be allowable; but not everything.'
`Willingly would I abandon my art,' said lia, `did
I perceive it to injure the soul; or could I in other ways
buy bread for our household. So dearly do I prize this
new-found faith, that for its sake, were it to be retained
in no other way, would I relinquish it, and sink into the
deeper poverty that would then be ours, or drudge at
some humbler toil.'
`Do it, do it, lia,' said Macer; `and the Lord will
love thee all the more. 'T is the only spot on thy white
and glistering robes. The Lord loves not more than I
to see thee wheeling and waving to and fro, to supply
mirth to those who mayhap would crucify thee the next
hour, as others crucified thy master.'
Tears fell from the eyes of the fair girl as she
answered
,
`Father, it shall be as you wish. Not willingly, but
by constraint, have I labored as I have. God will not
forsake us, and will, I will not doubt, open some new
path of labor for me  if indeed the disorders of the
times do not first scatter or destroy us.'
I here said to Macer and his daughter, that there need
be no hesitation about abandoning the employment in
question, from any doubt concerning a future
occupation
;
if lia would but accompany her mother, when
next she went to visit Julia, I could assure her of
obtaining
there all she could desire.
At this the little boy, whom Macer held, clapped his
hands and cried out with joy  `Ah! then will lia
be always with us and go away no more;' and flying to
his sister was caught by her in her arms.
The joy diffused throughout the little circle at this
news was great. All were glad that lia was to dance
and sing no more, for all wished her at home, and her
profession had kept her absent almost every day. The
table was now spread, and we sat down to the frugal
repast, Macer first offering a prayer to God.
`It is singular,' said he, when we were seated, `that in
my Heathen estate, I ever asked the blessing of the gods
before I ate. Nay, and notwithstanding the abominations
of my life, was often within the temples a worshipper.
I verily believe there are many Christians who pray less
than the Heathen, and less after they become Christian
than before.'
`I can readily believe it,' said Probus. `False
religions
multiply outward acts; and for the reason, that
they make religion to consist in them. A true faith,
which places religion in the inward disposition, not in
services, will diminish them. More prayers were said,
and more rites performed in the temple of Jupiter, where
my father was priest, than the Christian church, where
I serve, ever witnesses. But what then? With the
Pagan
worshipper religion ended when the service closed,
and he turned from the temple to the world. With the
Christian the highest service only then commences when
he leaves the church. Religion with him is virtuous
action, more than it is meditation or prayer. He prays
without ceasing, not by uttering without cessation the
language of prayer, but by living holily. Every act of
every hour which is done conscientiously is a prayer, as
well as the words we speak, and is more pleasing to
God, for the reason that practice is better than mere
profession
doing better than saying.'
`That is true, Probus,' replied Macer. `When I
prayed as an idolater it was because I believed that the
gods required such outward acknowledgment, and that
some evil or other might befall me through their
vengeance
,
if I did not. But when I had ended that duty I
had ended my religion, and my vices went on none the
less prosperously. Often indeed my prayers were for
special favors,  wealth or success in some affair  and
when, after wearying myself with repeating them a
VOL. II. 4
thousand times, and the favors were not bestowed, how
I left the temple in a rage, cursing the gods I had just
been worshipping, and swearing never more to
propitiate
them by prayer or sacrifice. Sometimes I repented
of such violence, but oftener kept my word and tried
some other god. You, Probus, were I may believe of a
more even temper?'
`Yes, perhaps so. My father was one of the most
patient and gentle of men, and religious after the manner
of our remoter ancestors of the days of the republic.
He was my instructer; and from him I learned truths
which were sufficient for my happiness under ordinary
circumstances. I was a devout and constant worshipper
of the gods. My every-day life may then have been as
pure as it has been since I have been a Christian; and
my prayers as many or more. The instincts of my
nature
,
which carried up the soul toward some great and
infinite being, and which I could not resist, kept me
within the bounds of that prudent and virtuous life which
I believed would be most acceptable to them. But when
a day of heavy and insupportable calamity came upon
me, and I was made to look after the foundations of
what I had been believing, I found there were none.
I was like a ship tossed about by the storms,
without
rudder or pilot. I then knew not whether there
were gods or not; or if there were any, who, among the
multiplicity worshipped in Rome, the true ones were.
In my grief, I railed at the heavens and their rulers
if there were any  for not revealing themselves to us
in our darkness and weakness; and cursed them for
their cruelty. Soon after I became a Christian. The
difference between my state then and now is this. I
believed then; but it was merely instinctive. I could
give no reason to myself or others for my faith. It was
something and yet nothing. Now I have somewhat to
stand upon. I can prove to myself and to others my
religion as well as other things. I have knowledge as
well as blind belief. It is good to believe in something,
and in some sort, though one can give no account of his
faith; but it is better to believe in that which we know,
as we know other things. I have now, as a Christian,
the same strength of belief in God, providence, and
futurity
,
that I have in any facts attested by history.
Jesus
has announced them or confirmed them, and they
are susceptible of proof. I differed from you, Macer, in
this; that I cursed not the gods in my passion, or
caprice
;
I was for years and years their humble, and
contented
,
and patient worshipper. I rebelled not till I
suffered
cruel disappointment, and in my faith could find
no consolation nor light. One real sorrow, by which
the foundations of my earthly peace were all broken up,
revealed to me the nothingness of my so called religion.
Into what a new world, Macer, has our new faith
introduced
us! I am now happier than ever I was, even
with my wife and children around me.'
`Some of our neighbors,' said Arria, `wonder what it
is that makes us so light of heart notwithstanding our
poverty and the dangers to which we are so often
exposed
.
I tell them that they who like us believe in the
providence of a God, who is always near us and within
us, and in the long reign with Christ as soon as death
is past, have nothing to fear. That which they esteem
the greatest evil of all is to us an absolute gain. Upon
this they either silently wonder, or laugh and deride.
However, many too believe.'
`Probus,' said Macer, `we are all ready to be offered
up. God's mercy to me is beyond all power of mine to
describe, in that he has touched and converted the hearts
of every one under my roof. Now if to this mercy he
will but add one more, that we may glorify him by our
death as well as in our life, the cup of his servant will
be full and running over.'
Probus did not choose again to engage with his
convert
upon that theme, knowing him to be beyond the
reach of influence and control. We could not but
marvel
to see to what extent he had infused his own
enthusiasm
into his family. His wife indeed and elder
daughters
would willingly see him calmer and less violent
when abroad, but like him, being by nature of warm
temperament, they are like him Christians warm and
zealous beyond almost any whom I have seen. They
are as yet also so recently transferred from their
Heathen
to their Christian state, that their sight is still
dazzled
,
and they see not objects in their true shapes and
proportions. In their joy they seem to others, and
perhaps
often are, greatly extravagant in the expression of
their feelings and opinions.
When our temperate repast was ended Macer again
prayed, and we then separated. Our visit proved wholly
ineffectual as to the purpose we had in view, but by no
means so when I consider the acquaintance which it
thus gave me with a family in the very humblest
condition
,
who yet were holding and equally prizing the same
opinions at which, after so much research and labor, I
had myself arrived. I perceived in this power of
Christianity
to adapt itself to minds so different in their state
of previous preparation, and in their ability to examine
and sift a question which was offered to them; in the
facility and quickness with which it seized both upon
the understanding and the affections; in the deep
convictions
which it produced of its own truth and excellence,
and the scorn and horror with which it filled the mind for
its former superstitions; I saw in this an element of
strength, and of dominion, such as even I had hardly
conceived, and which assures me that this religion is
destined to a universal empire. Not more certainly
do all men need it than they will have it. When in
this manner, with everything against it, in the habits,
lives and prejudices of men  with itself almost against
itself in its strictness and uncompromising morality
it nevertheless forces its way into minds of every variety
of character, and diffuses wherever it goes the same
inward
happiness; its success under such circumstances
is at once an argument for its truth, and an assurance
that it will pause in its progress not till it shall have
subdued the world to itself.
Julia was deeply interested in all that I told her of
the family of Macer, and will make them all her special
charge. lia will I hope become in some capacity a
member of our household.
I ought to tell you that we have often of late been at
the Gardens, where we have seen both Livia and
Aurelian
.
Livia is the same, but the emperor is changed. A
gloomy horror seems to sit upon him, which both
indisposes
him to converse as formerly, and others to converse
with him. Especially has he shown himself averse to
discussion of any point that concerns the Christians, at
least with me. When I would willingly have drawn
him that way, he has shrunk from it with an expression
VOL. II. 4*
of distaste for it, or with more expressive silence, or the
dark language of his terrific frown. For me however
he has no terrors, and I have resolved to break through
the barriers he chooses to set up around him, and learn
if I can what his feelings and purposes precisely are.
One conversation may reveal them in such a way,
as may make it sufficiently plain what part he means
to act, and what measure of truth there may be in the
current rumors; in which for my own part I cannot
bring myself to place much reliance. I doubt even
concerning the death of Aurelia, whether, if even it
has taken place, it is not to be traced to some cause
other than her religion.
A day has passed. I have seen the emperor, as I
was resolved to do, and now I no longer doubt what his
designs are, nor that they are dark as they have been
represented; yea, and darker, even as night is darker
than day.
Upon reaching the palace I was told that the
emperor
was exercising at the hippodrome, toward which I
then bent my steps. It lies at some distance from the
palace, concealed from it by intervening groves. Soon
as I came in sight of it I beheld Aurelian upon his
favorite
horse running the course as if contending for a
prize, plying the while the fierce animal he bestrode
with the lash, as if he were some laggard who needed
rousing to his work. Swifter than the wind he flew
by me, how many times I know not, without noting
apparently that any one was present beside the
attendant
slaves; nor did he cease till the horse, spent and
exhausted, no longer obeyed the will of even the
emperor
of the world. Many a noble charger has he in this
manner rode till he has fallen dead. So long used as
this man has been to the terrific game of war, and the
scenes and sights which that reveals, stirring to their
depths all the direst passions of our nature, that now, at
home and at peace, life grows stale and flat, and needs
the artificial stimulants which violent and extreme
modes of action can alone supply. The death of a
horse on the course answers now for a legion slain in
battle; an unruly, or disobedient, or idle slave hewn in
two, affords the relief which the execution of prisoners
has been accustomed to yield. He pants for the day to
arrive when, having completed the designs he has set
on foot in the city, he shall again join the army, now
accumulating in huge masses in Thrace, and once more
find himself in the East, on the way to new conquests
and fresh slaughter.
As he threw himself from his horse, now breathing
hard and scarcely supporting himself, the foam rolling
from him like snow, he saluted me in his usual manner.
`A fair and fortunate day to you, Piso! And what
may be the news in the city? I have rode fast and
far, but have heard nothing. I come back empty as I
went out, save the heat which I have put into my veins.
This horse is he I was seen upon from the walls of
Palmyra
by your and other traitor eyes. But for first
passing through the better part of my leg and then the
saddle, the arrow that hit me then had been the death
of him. But death is not for him, nor he for death; he
and his rider are something alike, and will long be
so, if auguries ever speak truth. And if there be not
truth in auguries, Piso, where is it to be found among
mortals? These three mornings have I rode him to see
if in this manner he could be destroyed, but thou seest
how it issues; I should destroy myself before him. But
what, I say, is the news? How does the lady Julia?
and the queen?'
Replying first to these last inquiries, I then said that
there was little news I believed in the city. The only
thing perhaps that could be treated as news was the
general uneasiness of the Christians.
`Ah! They are uneasy? By the gods, not wholly
without reason. Were it not for them I had now
been, not here chafing my horse and myself on a
hippodrome
,
but tearing up instead the hard sands of the
Syrian deserts. They weigh upon me like a
nightmare
!
They are a visible curse of the gods upon the
state  but being seen it can be removed. I reckon not
you among this tribe, Piso, when I speak of them.
What purpose is imputed?'
`Rumor varies. No distinct purpose is named, but
rather a general one of abridging some of their liberties
suppressing their worship, and silencing their priests.'
`Goes it no further?'
`Not with many; for the people are still willing to
believe that Aurelian will inflict no needless suffering.
They see you great in war; severe in the chastisement
of the enemies of the state; and just in the punishment
inflicted upon domestic rebels; and they conceive that
in regard to this simple people you will not go beyond
the rigor I have just named.'
`Truly they give me credit,' replied Aurelian, `for
what I scarcely deserve. But an emperor can never
hear the truth. Piso! they will find themselves
deceived
.
One or the other must fall  Hellenism or
Christianity! I knew not till my late return from the
East, the ravages made by this modern superstition, not
only throughout Rome, but the world. In this direction
I have for many years been blind. I have had eyes
only for the enemies of my country, and the glories of
the battle-field. But now, upon resting here a space in
the heart of the empire, I find that heart eaten out and
gone; the religion of ancient Rome, which was its very
life, decaying and almost dead through the rank growth
of this overshadowing poison-tree that has shot up at its
side. It must be cut up by the roots  the branches
hewn away  the leaves stripped and scattered to the
winds  nay, the very least fibre that lurks below the
surface with life in it, must be wrenched out and
consumed
.
We must do thus by the Christians and their
faith, or they will do so by us.'
`I am hardly willing,' I replied, `to believe what I
have heard; nor will I believe it. It were an act, so
mad and unwise, as well as so cruel, that I will not
believe
it though coming from the lips of Aurelian!'
`It is true, Piso, as the light of yonder sun! But if
thou wilt not believe, wait a day or two and proof
enough shalt thou have  proof that shall cure thy
infidelity
in a river of Christian blood.'
`Still, Aurelian,' I answered, `I believe not; nor will,
till that river shall run down before my eyes red and
thick as the Orontes!'
`How, Piso, is this? I thought you knew me!'
`In part I am sure I do. I know you neither to be a
madman nor a fool, both which in one would you be to
attempt what you have now threatened.'
`Young Piso, you are bold!'
`I make no boast of courage,' I replied; `but I know
that in familiar speech with Aurelian, I need not fear
him. Surely you would not converse on such a subject
with a slave nor a flatterer. A Piso can be neither. I
can speak, or I can be silent; but if I speak '
`Say on, say on, in the name of the gods!'
`What I would say to Aurelian then is this, that
slaughter as he may, the Christians cannot be
exterminated
;
that though he decimated, first Rome and then
the empire, there would still be left a seed that would
spring up and bear its proper harvest. Nay, Aurelian,
though you halved the empire, you could not win your
game. The Christians are more than you deem them.'
`Be it so,' replied the emperor; `nevertheless I will
try. But they are not so many as you rate them at,
neither by a direct nor an indirect enumeration.'
`Let that pass then,' I answered. `Let them be a
half, a quarter, or a tenth part of what I believe them to
be, it will be the same; they cannot be exterminated.
Soon as the work of death is done, that of life will
begin
again, and the growth will be the more rank for the
blood spilled around. Outside of the tenth part,
Aurelian
,
that now openly professes this new religion, there
lies another equal number of those who do not openly
profess it, but do so either secretly, or else view it with
favor and with the desire to accept it. Your violence,
inflicted upon the open believers, reaches not them, for
they are an invisible multitude; but no sooner has it
fallen and done its work of ruin, than this other
multitude
slowly reveals itself, and stands forth heirs and
professors
of the persecuted faith, and ready, like those
who went before them, to live for it and die for it.'
`What you say may be so,' answered Aurelian; `I
had thought not of it. Nevertheless I will try.'
`Moreover,' I continued, `in every time of
persecution
,
there are those  sincere believers, but timid
who dare not meet the threatened horrors. These deny
not their faith, but they shrink from sight; they for a
season disappear; their hearts worship as ever, but
their tongues are silent; and search as they may, your
emissaries of blood cannot find them. But soon as the
storm is overpast, then do they come forth again, as
insects
from the leaves that sheltered them from the storm,
and fill again the forsaken churches.
`Nevertheless I will try for them.'
`Then will you be, Aurelian, as one that sheds blood,
because he will shed it  seeing that the end at which
you aim cannot in such way be reached. Confiscation,
imprisonment, scourging, fires, torture, and death, will
all be in vain; and with no more prospect that by such
oppression Christianity can be annihilated, than there
would be of rooting out poppies from your fields when
as you struck off the heads or tore up the old roots, the
ripe seeds were scattered abroad over the soil, a thousand
for every parent stalk that fell. You will drench
yourself
in the blood of the innocent, only that you may do
it  while no effect shall follow.'
`Let it be so then; even so. Still I will not forbear.
But this I know, Piso, that when a disaffection has
broken out in a legion, and I have caused the half
thereof, or its tenth, to be drawn forth and slaughtered
by the other part, the danger has disappeared. The
physic has been bitter, but it has cured the patient! I
am a good surgeon; and well used to letting blood. I
know the wonders it works and shall try it now, not
doubting to see some good effects. When poison is in
the veins, let out the blood, and the new that comes in
is wholesome. Rome is poisoned!'
`Great emperor,' I replied, `you know nothing, allow
me to say, whereof you affirm. You know not the
Christians, and how can you deem them poison to the
state? A purer, holier brotherhood never has the world
seen. I am but of late one among them, and it is
but a few months since I thought of them as you now
do. But I knew nothing of them. Now I know them.
And knowledge has placed them before me in another
light. If Aurelian '
`I know nothing of them, Piso, I know; and I wish
to know nothing, nothing more than that they are
Christians
!
that they deny the good gods!  that they aim
at the overthrow of the religion of the state!  that
religion
under whose fostering care Rome has grown up to
her giant size  that they are fire-brands of discord and
quarrel in Rome and throughout the world! Greater
would my name be, could I extirpate this accursed tribe
than it is for triumphing over both the East and West,
or would be, though I gained the whole world.'
`Aurelian,' I replied, `this is not such as I used to
hear from your lips. Another spirit possesses you, and
it is not hard to tell whence it comes.'
`You would say  from Fronto.'
`I would. There is the rank poison, that has turned
the blood in the veins of one, whom justice and wisdom
once ruled, into its own accursed substance.'
`I and Rome, Piso,' said Aurelian, `owe much to
Fronto. I confess that his spirit now possesses me.
He has roused the latent piety into action and life, which
I received with my mother's milk, but which, the gods
forgive me! carried away by ambition had well nigh
gone quite out in my soul. My mother  dost thou
know it?  was a priestess of Apollo, and never did god
or goddess so work by unseen influence to gain a
mortal's
heart, as did she to fill mine with reverence of the
deities of heaven  specially of the great god of light.
I was early a wayward child. When a soldier in the
legions I now command, my life was what a soldier's is
a life of action, hardship, peril, and blood. The gods
soon became to me as if they were not. And so it has
been for well night all the years of my life. But the
gods be thanked, Fronto has redeemed me! and since I
have worn this diadem have I toiled, Rome can testify
with what zeal, to restore to her gods their lost honors
to purge her worship of the foul corruptions that
were bringing it into contempt  and raise it higher
than ever in the honor of the people by the magnificence
of the temples I have built; by the gifts I have lavished
upon them; by the ample riches wherewith I have
endowed
the priesthood. And more than once, while this
work has been achieving, has the form of my revered
parent, beautiful in the dazzling robes of her office, stood
by my bed's side  whether in dream, or in vision, or
in actual presence, I cannot tell  and blessed me for my
pious enterprise  The gods be thanked, the lips have
said or seemed to say, that thy youth lasts not always,
but that age has come, and with it second childhood in
thy reverence of the gods, whose worship it was mine
to put into thy infant heart. Go on thy way, my son!
Build up the fallen altars of the gods, and lay low the
VOL. II. 5
aspiring fanes of the wicked. Finish what thou hast
begun, and all time shall pronounce thee greatest of the
great. Should I disobey the warning? The gods
forbid
!
and save me from such impiety. I am now, Piso,
doubly armed for the work I have taken in hand  first
by the zeal of the pious Fronto, and second, by the
manifest
finger of Heaven pointing the way I should go.
And, please the gods! I will enter upon it, and it shall
not be for want of a determined will and of eyes too
used to the shedding of blood to be frightened now
though an ocean-full were spilled before them, if this
race be not utterly swept from the face of the earth, from
the suckling to the silver head, from the beggar to the
prince  and from Rome all around to the four winds,
as far as her almighty arms can reach.'
My heart sunk within me as he spoke, and my knees
trembled under me. I knew the power and spirit of the
man, and I now saw that superstition had claimed him
for her own; that he would go about his work of death
and ruin, armed with his own cruel and bloody mind,
and urged behind by the fiercer spirit still of Pagan
superstition
.
It seemed to me, in spite of what I had just
said myself, and thought I believed, as if the death-note
of Christianity had now rung in my ear. The voice of
Aurelian as he spoke had lost its usual sharpness, and
fallen into a lower tone full of meaning, and which said
to me that his very inmost soul was pouring out with
the awful words he used. I felt utterly helpless and
undone  like an ant in the pathway of a giant
incapable
of escape, resistance, or remonstrance. I
suppose
all this was visible in my countenance. I said
nothing; and Aurelian, after pausing a moment, went
on.
`Think me not, Piso, to be using the words of an idle
braggart in what I have said. Who has known
Aurelian
,
when once he has threatened death, to hold back
his hand? But I will give thee earnest of my truth!'
`I require it not, Aurelian. I question not thy truth.'
`I will give it notwithstanding, Piso. What will you
think  you will think as you ever have of me  if I
should say that already, and upon one of my own house
infected with this hell-begotten atheism, has the axe
already
fallen!'
Hearing the horrible truth from his own lips, it seemed
as if I had never heard it before. I hardly had believed
it.
`Tyrant!' I exclaimed, `it cannot be! What,
Aurelia
?'
`Yes, Aurelia! Keep thy young blood cool, Piso.
Yes, Aurelia! Ere I struck at others it behoved me
to reprove my own. It was no easy service, as you may
guess, but it must be done. And not only was Aurelia
herself pertinaciously wedded to this superstition, but
she was subduing the manly mind of Mucapor too, who,
had he been successfully wrought upon, were as good
as dead to me and to Rome  and he is one whom
our legions cannot spare. We have Christians more
than enough already in our ranks: a Christian general
was not to be endured. This was additional matter of
accusation against Aurelia, and made it right that she
should die. But she had her free choice of life, honor,
rank, riches, and, added to all, Mucapor, whose equal
Rome does not hold, if she would but take them. One
word spoken and they were all her own; with no small
chance that she should one day be what Livia is. But
that one word her obstinate superstition would not let
her speak.'
`No, Aurelian; there is that in the Christian
superstition
that always forbids the uttering of that word.
Death to the Christian is but another word for life.
Apostacy is the true death. You have destroyed the
body of Aurelia, but her virtuous soul is already with
God, and it is you who have girded upon her brow a
garland that shall never fade away. Of that much may
you make your boast.'
`Piso, I bear with you, and shall; but there is no
other in Rome who might say so much.'
`Nay, nay, Aurelian, there I believe you better than
you make yourself. To him who is already the victim
of the axe or the beasts do you never deny the liberty
of the tongue such as it then is.'
`Upon Piso, and he the husband of Julia, I can inflict
no evil, nor permit it done.'
`I would take shelter, Aurelian, neither behind my
own name, my father's, nor my wife's. I am a
Christian
and such fate as may befall the rest I would share.
Yet not willingly, for life and happiness are dear to me
as to you  and they are dear to all these multitudes
whom you do now, in the exercise of despotic power,
doom to a sudden and abhorred death. Bethink
yourself
,
Aurelian, before it be too late '
`I have bethought myself of it all,' he replied  `and
were the suffering ten times more, and the blood to be
poured out a thousand times more, I would draw back
not one step. The die has been cast; it has come up
as it has, and so must be the game. I listen to no
appeal
.'
`Not from me,' I replied; `but surely you will not
deny a hearing to what these innocent people may say
in their own defence. That were neither just nor
merciful
;
nor were it like Aurelian. There is much which
by their proper organs they might say to place before
you their faith in the light of truth. You have heard
what you have received concerning it, chiefly from the
lips of Fronto; and can he know what he has never
learned? or tell it unperverted by prejudices black as
night?'
`I have already said,' rejoined the emperor, `that I
would hear them, and I will. But it can avail them no
more than words uttered in the breath of the tempest
that is raging up from the north. Hear them! This
day have I already heard them  one of those madmen
of theirs who plague the streets of Rome. Passing early
by the temple of sculapius  that one which stands
not an arrow's flight from the column of Trajan  I
came upon a dense crowd of all sorts of persons,
listening
to a gaunt figure of a man who spoke to them.
Soon as I came against him, and paused on my horse
for the crowd to make way, the wild beast who was
declaiming
shouted at me at the top of his voice, calling on
me to `hear the word of God which he would speak to
me.' Knowing him by such jargon to be a Christian, I
did as he desired, and there stood, while he for my
especial
instruction laid bare the iniquities and follies of
the Roman worship; sent the priesthood and all who
entered their temples to the infernal regions; and
prophesied
against Rome  which he termed Babylon  that
VOL. II. 5*
ere so many centuries were gone her walls would lie
even with the ground, her temples moulder in ruins, her
language become extinct, and her people confounded
with other nations and lost. And all this because I,
whom he now called Ahaz and now Nebuchadnezzar,
oppressed the children of God and held them in
captivity
:
while in the same breath he bid me come on with
my chains, gibbets, beasts, crosses, and fires, for they
were ready, and would rejoice to bear their testimony in
the cause of Christ.' As I turned to resume my way,
his words were; `go on, thou man of pride and blood;
go on thy way! The gates of hell swing open for thee!
Already the arm of the Lord is bared against thee! the
winged lightning struggles in his hand to smite thee! I
hear thy cry for mercy which no one answers ' and
more till I was beyond the reach of his owl's voice.
There was an appeal, Piso, from this people! What
think you of it?'
`He whom you heard,' I replied, `I know, and know
him to be honest and true; as loyal a subject too as
Rome holds. He is led away by his hot and hasty
temper
both to do and say what injures not only him, but
all who are joined with him, and the cause he defends.
He offends the Christians not less than others. Judge
not all by him. He stands alone. If you would hear
one whom all alike confide in, and who may fitly
represent
the feelings and principles of the whole body of
Christians, send for Probus. From him may you learn
without exaggeration or concealment, without reproach
of others or undue boasting of themselves, what the
Christians are in their doctrines and their lives  as
citizens
of Rome and loyal subjects of Aurelian  and
what, as citizens of heaven and loyal followers of Jesus
Christ.'
The emperor promised to consider it. He had no
other reason to deny such favor, but the tedium of
listening
to what could profit neither him nor others.
We then turned toward the palace, where I saw
Livia; now as silent and sad as, when in Palmyra, she
was lively and gay. Not that Aurelian abates the least
of his worship, but that the gloom which overshadows
him imparts itself to her, and that knowing what has
befallen Aurelia, she cannot but feel it to be a possible
thing for the blow to fall elsewhere and nearer. Yet is
there the same outward show as ever. The palace is
still thronged, with not Rome only, but by strangers
from all quarters of the empire, anxious to pay their
homage at once to the empress of Rome, to the most
beautiful woman in the world  such is the language
and to a daughter of the far-famed Zenobia.
The city is now crowded with travelers of all nations,
so much so that the inns can scarce receive them, and
hardly ever before was private hospitality so put to all
its resources. With all, and everywhere, in the streets,
at the public baths, in the porticos, at the private or
public
banquet, the Christians are the one absorbing topic.
And at least this good comes with the evil, that thus the
character of this religion, as compared with that of Rome
and other faiths, is made known to thousands who might
otherwise never have heard of it, or have felt interest
enough in it to examine its claims. It leads to a large
demand for and sale of our sacred books. The copyists
can hardly supply them so fast as they are wanted. For
in the case of any dispute or conversation it is common
to hear the books themselves referred to, and then called
in as witnesses for or against a statement made. And
pleasant enough is it to see how clear the general voice
is on our side  especially with the strangers  how
indignant
they are, for the most part, that violence to the
extreme of another Decian persecution should be so
much as dreamed of. Would that the same could be
said of our citizens and countrymen! A large
proportion
of them indeed embrace the same liberal sentiments,
but a greater part, if not for extreme violence, are yet
for oppression and suppression; and I dare not say how
many for all that Aurelian himself designs. Among the
lower orders especially, a ferocious and blood-thirsty
spirit breaks out in a thousand ways that fills the bosom
both with grief and terror.
The clouds are gathering over us, Fausta, heavy and
black with the tempest pent up within. The thunders
are rolling in the distance, and each hour coming nearer
and nearer. Whom the lightnings shall strike  how
vain to conjecture! Would to God that Julia were
anywhere
but here! For, to you I may say it, I cannot
trust Aurelian  yes  Aurelian himself I may; but not
Aurelian the tool of Fronto. Farewell.
LETTER IX.
FROM PISO TO FAUSTA.
When
I turned from the palace of Aurelian and again
took my way towards the Clian, I did it in the belief
that before the day should end, edicts against the
Christians
would be published. I found, as I conversed with
many whom I met in the way, that from other sources
the same opinion had become common. In one manner
or another it had come abroad that measures had been
resolved upon by the emperor, and would soon be put in
force. Many indeed do not give the least credit to the
rumors, and believe that they all spring from the violent
language of Fronto, which has been reported as that of
Aurelian. You may wonder that there should be such
uncertainty respecting a great design like this. But
you must remember that Aurelian has of late shrouded
himself in a studied obscurity. Not a despot, in the
despotic lands of Asia, keeps more secret counsel than
he, or leans less upon the opinion or advice of others.
All that is done throughout the vast compass of the
empire
,
springs from him alone  all the affairs of foreign
and dependent kingdoms are arranged and determined
by him. As for Italy and the capital, they are mere
playthings in his hand. You ask if the senate does not
still exist? I answer, it does; but as a man exists
whom a palsy has made but half alive; the body is
there, but the soul is gone, and even the body is asleep.
The senators with all becoming gravity assemble
themselves
at the capitol, and what time they sleep not away
the tedious hours in their ivory chairs, they debate such
high matters as, `whether the tax which this year falls
heavy upon Capua, by reason of a blast upon the grapes,
shall be lightened or remitted!' or `whether the petition
of the Milanese for the construction at the public
expense
of a granary shall be answered favorably!' or
`whether V. P. Naso shall be granted a new trial after
defeat at the highest court!' Not that there is not virtue
in the senate  some dignity  some respect and love
for the liberties of Rome  witness myself  but that
the emperor has engrossed the whole empire to himself,
and nothing is left for that body but to keep alive the
few remaining forms of ancient liberty, by assembling
as formerly, and taking care of whatever insignificant
affairs are intrusted to them. In a great movement
like this against the Christians, Aurelian does not so
much as recognize their existence. No advice is asked,
no cooperation. And the less is he disposed to
communicate
with them in the present instance perhaps, from
knowing so well that the measure would find no favor
in their eyes; but would on the contrary be violently
opposed. Everything accordingly originates in the
sovereign will of Aurelian, and is carried into effect by
his arm wielding the total power of this boundless
empire
being now, what it has been his boast to make it,
coextensive with its extremest borders as they were in
time of the Antonines. There is no power to resist
him; nor are there many who dare to utter their real
opinions, least of all a senator, or a noble. A beggar in
the street may do it with better chance of its being
respected
,
if agreeable to him, and of escaping rebuke or
worse, if it be unpalatable. To the people he is still as
ever courteous and indulgent.
There is throughout the city a strange silence and
gloom, as if in expectancy of some great calamity; or of
some event of dark and uncertain character. The
Christians go about their affairs as usual, not ceasing
from any labors, nor withdrawing from the scene of
danger; but with firm step and serious air keep on
their way as if conscious of the great part which it is
theirs to act, and resolved that it shall not suffer at their
hands. Many with whom I spoke put on even a
cheerful
air as they greeted me, and after the usual
morning's
salutation went on as if things were in their usual
train. Others with pale face and quivering lip
confessed
the inward tumult, and that if they feared naught
for themselves, there were those at home, helpless and
exposed, for whom the heart bled, and for whom it could
not but show signs of fear.
I met the elder Demetrius. His manly and
thoughtful
countenance  though it betrayed nothing of
weakness
was agitated with suppressed emotion. He is a
man full of courage, but full of sensibility too. His
affections
are warm and tender as those of a girl. He
asked me `what I could inform him of the truth of the
rumors
which were now afloat of the most terrific
character
.'
I saw where his heart was as he spoke; and
answered
him as you may believe with pain and
reluctance
.
I knew indeed that the whole truth would soon
break upon him  it was a foolish weakness  but I
could hardly bring myself to tell him what a few hours
would probably reveal. I told him however all that I
had just learned from Aurelian himself, and which, as
he made no reserve with regard to me, nor enjoined
concealment, I did not doubt was fully resolved upon,
and would be speedily put in force. As I spoke the
countenance of the Greek grew pale beyond its usual
hue of paleness. He bent his head as in perplexed and
anxious thought; the tears were ready to overflow as
he raised it after a moment and said,
`Piso, I am but recently a Christian. I know
nothing
of this religion but its beauty and truth. It is what
I have ever longed for, and now that I possess it I value
it far more than life. But,'  he paused a moment
`I have mingled but little with the Christians; I know
scarcely any; I am ignorant of what they require of
those who belong to their number in such emergences.
I am ready to die myself rather than shrink from a bold
acknowledgment of what in my heart I believe to be
the divinest truth; but  my wife and my children!
must they too meet these dangers? My wife has
become
what I am; my children are but infants; a Greek
vessel sails to-morrow for Scio, where dwells in
peaceful
security the father of my wife, from whom I
received
her, almost to his distraction; her death would
be his immolation. Should I offend'
`Surely not,' I replied. `If, as I believe will happen,
the edicts of the emperor should be published to-day,
put them on board to-night, and let to-morrow see them
floating on the Mediterranean. We are not all to stand
still and hold our throats to the knife of this imperial
butcher.'
`God be thanked!' said Demetrius, and grasping my
hand with fervor turned quickly and moved in the
direction
of his home.
Soon after, seated with Julia and Probus  he had
joined me as I parted from Demetrius  I communicated
to her all that I had heard at the palace. It neither
surprised
nor alarmed her. But she could not repress
her grief at the prospect spread out before us of so much
suffering to the innocent.
`How hard is this,' said she, `to be called to bear such
testimony as must now be borne to truth! These
Christian
multitudes, so many of whom have but just adopted
their new faith and begun to taste of the pleasures it
imparts
,
all enjoying in such harmony and quietness their
rich blessings  with many their only blessings  how
hard for them, all at once, to see the foundations of their
peace broken up, and their very lives clamored for!
rulers
and people setting upon them as troops of wild beasts!
It demands almost more faith than I can boast, to sit here
without complaint a witness of such wrong. How
strange, Probus, that life should be made so difficult!
That not a single possession worth having can be
secured
without so much either of labor or endurance! I
wonder if this is ever to cease on earth?'
`I can hardly suppose that it will,' said Probus. `
Labor
and suffering, in some of their forms, seem both
essential
to the perfection of man. My arm would be
weak as a rush were it never moved; but exercised,
and you see it is nervous and strong; plied like a
smith's, and it grows to be hard as iron and capable of
miracles. So it is with any faculty of the mind you
may select; the harder it is tasked the more worthy it
becomes; and without tasking at all, it is worth
nothing
.
So seems to me it is with the whole character.
In a smooth and even lot its worth never would be
VOL. II. 6
known and we should respect it neither in ourselves nor
in others. Greatness and worth come only of collision
and conflict. Let our path be strewed with roses, and
soft southern gales ever blow, and earth send up of her
own accord our ready prepared nutriment, and mankind
would be but one huge multitude of Sybarites, dissolved
in sloth and effeminacy. If no difficulty opposed, no
labor were exacted, both body and mind were dead.
Hence it is we may believe that man must everywhere
labor even for the food which is necessary to mere
existence
.
Life is made dear to us by an instinct  we
shrink from nothing as we do from the mere thought of
non-existence  but still it is death or toil; that is the
alternative. So that labor is thus insured wherever
man is found, and it is this that makes him what he is.
Then he is made, moreover, so as to crave not only food,
but knowledge as much, and also virtue; but between
him and both these objects there are interposed, for the
same reason doubtless, mountains of difficulty, which he
must clamber up and over before he can bask in the
pleasant fields that lie beyond, and then ascend the
distant
mountain-tops, from which but a single step removes
him from the abode of God. Doubt it not, lady, that it
is never in vain and for naught that man labors and
suffers
;
but that the good which redounds is in proportion
to what is undergone, and more than a compensation.
If in these times of darkness and fear suffering is more,
goodness and faith are more also. There are Christians,
and men, made by such trials, that are never made
elsewhere
nor otherwise  nor can be; just as the arm of
Hercules could not be but by the labors of Hercules.
What says Macer? Why even this, that God is to be
thanked for this danger, for that the church needs it!
The brief prosperity it has enjoyed since the time of
Valerian
and Macrianus, has corrupted it, and it must be
purged anew, and tried by fire! I think not that; but
I think this; that if suffering ever so extreme is
ordained
,
there will be a virtue begotten in the souls of
the sufferers, and abroad through them, that shall prove
it not to have been in vain.'
`I can believe what you say,' said Julia, `at least I
can believe in the virtue ascribed to labor, and the
collision
with difficulty. Suffering is passive; may it not be
that we may come to place too much merit in this?'
`It is not to be doubted that we may,' replied Probus.
`The temptation to do so is great. It is easy to suffer.
In comparison with labor and duty  life-long labor and
duty  it is a light service. Yet it carries with it an
imposing air and is too apt to take to itself all the glory
of the Christian's course. Many who have lived as
Christians but indifferently have, in the hour of
persecution
and in the heat of that hour, rushed upon death
and borne it well, and before it extremest torture,
and gained the crown of martyrdom and the name of
saint  a crown not always without spot  a name not
always holy. He who suffers for Christ must suffer
with simplicity  even as he has lived with simplicity.
And when he has lived so, and endured the martyr's
death at last, that is to be accounted but the last of many
acts of duty which are essentially alike  unless it may
be that in many a previous conflict over temptation and
the world and sin, there was a harder victory won and
a harder duty done than when the flames consumed him
or the beasts tare him limb from limb.'
`Yet, Probus,' continued Julia, `among the humble
and the ignorant where we cannot suppose that vanity
could operate, where men have received Christianity
only because it seemed to them just the faith they needed,
and who then when it has been required that they
renounce
it, they will not do it, but hold steadfastly to
what they regard the truth of God, and for it take with
meekness and patience all manner of torture, and death
itself  there is surely here great virtue! Suffering
here has great worth and sets upon the soul the seal of
God. Is it not so?'
`Most assuredly it is,' answered Probus. `O there is
no virtue on earth greater than theirs. When dragged
from their quiet homes  unknown  obscure
despised
solitary  with not one sympathising eye to
look on upon their sufferings  with none to record their
name  none to know it even  they do nevertheless
without faltering keep true to their faith, hugging it to
them the closer, the more it is tried to tear them
asunder
this, this, is virtue the greatest on earth! It is a
testimony borne to the truth of whatever cause is thus
supported that is daily bringing forth its fruits in the
conviction and conversion of multitudes. It is said that
in the Decian persecution it was the fortitude and
patience
,
under the cruelest sufferings of those humble
Christians whom no one knew, who came none knew
whence, and who were dying out of a pure inward love
of the faith they professed, that fell upon the hearts of
admiring thousands with more than the force of
miracle
,
and was the cause of the great and sudden growth
of our numbers which then took place. Still, suffering
and dying for a faith is not unimpeachable evidence of
its truth. There have been those who have died and
suffered for idolatries the most abhorred. It is proof
indeed not at all of truth itself, but only of the deep
sincerity
of him who professes it.'
`Yes,' replied Julia, `I see that it is so. But then it
is a presumption in behalf of truth, strong almost as
miracles
done for it, when so many  multitudes in
different
ages, in the humblest condition of life, hesitate not
to die rather than renounce their faith in a religion like
this of Christianity; which panders to not one of man's
passions, appetites, or weaknesses, but is the severest
censor of morals the world has ever seen; which
requires
a virtue and a purity in its disciples such as no
philosopher ever dared to impose upon his scholars; and
whose only promise is immortality; and even that an
immortality never to be separated from the idea of
retribution
as making a part of it. They, who will suffer
and die for such a religion, do by that act work as
effectively
for it, as their master by the signs and
wonders
which he did. If Christianity were like many of
the forms of Paganism; or if it ministered to the
cravings
of our sensual nature, as we can conceive a
religion
might; if it made the work of life light, and the
reward certain and glorious; if it relieved its followers
of much of the suffering, and fear, and doubt, that
oppress
others; it would not be surprising that men should
bear much for its sake; and their doing so for what
appealed
so to their selfishness would be no evidence, at
all to be trusted, of its truth. But as it is, they who die
for it afford a presumption in belief of it, that assails the
reason almost or quite with the force of demonstration.
So I remember well my reason was impressed by what
VOL. II. 6*
I used to hear from Paul of the sufferings of the early
Christians.'
While Julia had been saying these things, it had
seemed to me as if there was an unusual commotion in
the streets; and as she ended I was about to look for
the cause of it, when the hasty steps of several running
through the hall leading from the main entrance of the
house prevented me, and Milo breathless, followed by
others of the household, rushed into the apartment where
we sat, he exclaiming with every mark of fear and
horror
upon his countenance,
`Ah! sir, it is all just as I was told by Curio it would
be; the edicts are published on the capitol. The people
are going about the streets now in crowds, talking loud
and furiously, and before night they say the Christians
will all be delivered to their pleasure.'
Soon as Milo could pause, I asked him `if he had
read or seen the edicts?'
`No, I have not,' he answered; I `heard from Curio
what they were to be.'
I told Julia and Probus that such I did not believe was
their tenor. It did not agree with usage, nor with what
I had gathered from Aurelian of his designs. But that
their import was probably no more than deprivation of a
portion of their freedom and of some of their privileges.
It was the purpose of Aurelian first to convert back
again the erring multitudes to Paganism, for which time
must be granted.
But my words had no effect to calm the agitation of
our slaves, who, filled with terror at the reports of Milo,
and at the confusion in the streets, had poured into the
room, and were showing in a thousand ways their
affection
for us and their concern. Some of this number are
Christians, having been made so by the daily
conversations
which Julia has had with them, and the
instruction
she has given them in the gospels. Most however
are still of that religion in which they were reared, as
they are natives of the East, of the North, or of Africa.
But by all, with slight differences, was the same interest
manifested in our safety. They were ready to do
anything
for our protection; and chiefly urgent were they
that we should that very night escape from Rome
they could remain in security and defend the palace.
When they had thus in their simple way given free
expression
to their affections, I assured them that no
immediate
danger impended, but even if it did, I should
not fly from it, but should remain where I was; that
the religion for which I might suffer was worth to those
who held it a great deal more than mere life  we
could easily sacrifice life for it, if that should be
required
.
Some seemed to understand this  others not;
but they then retired, silent and calm, because they saw
that we were so.
Soon as they were withdrawn, I proposed to Probus
that we should go forth and learn the exact truth. We
accordingly passed to the street, which, as it is one that
forms the principal avenue from this part of the city to
the capitol, we found alive with numbers greater than
usual, with their faces turned toward that quarter. We
joined them and moved with them in the same
direction
.
It was a fearful thing, Fausta, even to me, who
am rarely disturbed by any event, to listen to the
language
which fell on my ear on all sides from the lips of
beings who wore the same form as myself, and with me
have a right to the name of man. It was chiefly that
of exultation and joy, that at length the power of the
state was about to strike at the root of this growing
evil  that one had taken hold of the work who would
not leave it, as others had, half accomplished, but would
finish it as he had every other to which he had put his
hand.
`Now we shall see what one whose hand bears the
sword of a true soldier can do, and whether he who
has slain more foes of Rome abroad than emperor
before
ever did, cannot do as well by enemies at home.'
`Never doubt it,' said another. `Before the ides of
the month now just come in, not a Christian will be
seen in the streets of Rome. They will be swept out as
clean as by Varus they now are of other filth. The
prefect is just the man for the times. Aurelian could
not have been better matched.'
`Lucky this,' said still another as he hurried away,
`is it not? Three vessels arrived yesterday stowed
thick with wild beasts from Africa and Asia. By the
gods! there will be no starving for them now. The
only fear will be that gorged so they will lose their
spirit.'
`I don't fear that,' said his older companion. `I
remember
well the same game twenty-five years ago.
The fact was then that the taste of human blood
whetted
it for more and more, and, though glutted, their
rage seemed but to become more savage still; so that,
though hunger was fed to the full, and more, they fell
upon fresh victims with increased fury  with a sort of
madness as it were. Such food 't is said crazes them.'
Others were soon next us from whom I heard,
`Let every soul perish. I care not for that. Or
rather I do. Let all die, I say; but not in this savage
way. Let it be done by a proper accusation, trial, and
judgment. Let profession of atheism be death by a
law, and let the law be executed, and the name will
soon die. Inevitable death under a law for any one
who assumes the name, would soon do the work of
extermination
better than this universal slaughter which
I hear is to be the way. Thousands are then
overlooked
in the blind popular fury; the work by and by
ceases through weariness; it is thought to be
completed
when lo! as the first fury of the storm is spent
they come forth from their hiding-places, and things are
but little better than before.'
`I think with you,' said the younger companion of
him who had just spoken; `and besides, Romans need
not the further instruction in the art of assassination,
which such a service would impart. Already nothing
comes so like nature to a Roman as to kill; kill
something
if not a beast, a slave  if there is no slave at
hand, a Christian  if no Christian, a citizen. One
would think we sucked in from our mothers not milk
but blood. If the state cannot stand secure, as our
great men say, but by the destruction of this people, in
the name of the gods, let the executioners do the work,
not our sons, brothers, and fathers. So too I say
touching
the accursed games at the Flavian and elsewhere.
What is the effect but to make of us a nation of
manbutchers
?
as, by the gods, we already are. If the gods
send not something or somebody to mend us we shall
presently fall upon one another and exterminate
ourselves
.'
`Who knows but it is this very religion of the
Christians
that has been sent for that work?' said a third who
had joined the two. `The Christians are famed for
nothing more than for their gentleness and care of one
another  so at least I hear.'
`Who knows, indeed?' said the other. `If it be so,
pity it were not found out soon. Aurelian will make
short work with them.'
In the midst of such conversation which on every side
caught our ears as we walked silently along, we came
at length to the neighborhood of the capitol; but so great
was the throng of the people, who in Rome have naught
else to do but to rush together upon every piece of news,
that we could not even come within sight of the
building
,
much less of the parchment.
We accordingly waited patiently to learn from some
who might emerge from the crowd what the precise
amount of the edicts might be. We stood not long,
before
one struggling and pushing about at all adventures,
red and puffing with his efforts, extricated himself from
the mass, and adjusting his dress which was half torn
from his back, began swearing, and cursing the emperor
and his ministers for a parcel of women and fools.
`What is it?' we asked, gathering about him.
`What have you seen? Did you reach the pillar?'
`Reach it? I did; but my cloak, that cost yesterday
the good aurelians, did not, and here I stand
cloakless
'
`Well, but the edicts.'
`Well, but the edicts! Be not in a hurry, friend
they are worth not so much as my cloak. Blank
parchment
were just as good. I wonder old `sword-in-hand'
didn't hang up a strip  't would have saved the expense
of a scrivener. If any of you hear of a cloak found
hereabouts, blue without, and lined with yellow, and
trimmed with gold, please to note the name sewed on
beneath the left shoulder, and send it according to the
direction and your labor shall not be lost.'
`But the edicts  the edicts.'
`O the edicts! why they are just this; the Christians
are told that they must neither assemble together in their
houses of worship to hear their priests, nor turn the
streets into places of worship in their stead; but leave
off all their old ways just as fast as they can and
worship
the gods. There 's an edict for you!'
`Who is this?' said one to Probus.
`I do not know; he seems sadly disappointed at the
emperor's clemency, as he deems it.'
But what Probus did not know, another who at the
moment came up, did; exclaiming, as he slapped the
disappointed man on the shoulder,
`What, old fellow, you here? always where mischief
is brewing. But who ever saw you without Nero and
Sylla? What has happened? and no cloak either?'
`Nero and Sylla are in their den  for my cloak I
fear it is in a worse place. But come, give me your
arm, and let us return. I thought a fine business was
opening, and so ran up to see. But it 's all a sham.'
`It 's only put off,' said his companion, as they walked
away; `your dogs will have enough to do before the
month is half out  if Fronto knows anything.'
`That is one, I see,' said he who had spoken to
Probus
,
`who breeds hounds for the theatres  I thought I
had seen him before. His ordinary stock is not less
than five hundred blood-hounds. He married the sister
of the gladiator Sosia. His name is Hanno.'
Having heard enough we turned away and sought
again the Clian. You thus see, Fausta, what Rome
is made of and into what hands we may all come. Do
you wonder at my love of Christianity? at my zeal for
its progress? Unless it prosper; unless it take root and
spread through this people; their fate is sealed  to my
mind with the same certainty as if I saw their doom
written upon the midnight sky in letters of fire. Their
own wickedness will break them in pieces and destroy
them. It is a weight, beneath which no society can
stand. It must give way in general anarchy and ruin.
But my trust is that, in spite of Aurelian and of all other
power, this faith will go on its way, and so infuse itself
into the mass as never to be dislodged, and work out its
perfect regeneration.
By this decree of the emperor then, which was soon
published in every part of the capital, the Christians are
prohibited from assembling together for purposes of
worship
,
their churches are closed, and their preachers
silenced
.
One day intervenes between this, and the first day of
the week, the day on which the Christians as you may
perhaps know assemble for their worship. In the
meantime
it will be determined what course shall be pursued.
Those days have passed, Fausta, and before I seal
my letter I will add to it an account of them.
Immediately upon the publication of the emperor's
decrees
,
the Christians throughout the city communicated
with each other, and resolved, their places of worship
being all closed and guarded, to assemble secretly, in
some spot to be selected, both for worship and to
determine
what was to be done, if anything, to shield
themselves
from the greater evils which threatened. The
place selected was the old ruins where the house of
Macer
stands. `There still remains,' so Macer urged, `a
vast circular apartment partly below and partly above
the surface of the ground, of massy walls, without
windows
,
remote from the streets, and so surrounded by
fallen walls and columns and rubbish as to be wholly
buried from the sight. The entrance to it was through
his dwelling, and the rooms beyond. Resorting thither
when it should be dark, and seeking his house singly
and by different avenues among the ruins, there would
be little chance of observation and disturbance.'
Macer's
counsel was accepted.
On the evening of the first day of the week  a day
which since I had returned from the East to Rome had
ever come to me laden with both pleasure and profit
I took my way under cover of a night without star or
moon, and doubly dark by reason of clouds that hung
black and low, to the appointed place of assembly. The
cold winds of autumn were driving in fitful blasts through
the streets, striking a chill into the soul as well as the
body. They seemed ominous of that black and bitter
storm that was even now beginning to break in sorrow
and death upon the followers of Christ. Before I
reached the ruins the rain fell in heavy drops, and the
wind was rising and swelling into a tempest. It seemed
to me, in the frame I was then in, better than a calm.
It was moreover a wall of defence against such as might
be disposed to track and betray us.
Entering by the door of Macer's cell, I passed through
VOL. II. 7
many dark and narrow apartments, following the noise
of the steps of some who were going before me, till at
length I emerged into the vaulted hall spoken of by
Macer
.
It was lofty and spacious, and already filled with
figures of men and women whom the dim light of a few
lamps, placed upon the fragments of the fallen
architecture
,
just enabled me to discern, and distinguish from
the masses of marble and broken columns which strewed
the interior, and which when they afforded a secure
footing
were covered with the assembled worshippers. The
footsteps of those who were the last to enter soon died
away upon the ear, and deep silence ensued, unbroken
by any sound save that of the sighs and weeping of such
as could not restrain their feelings.
It was interrupted by the voice of one who said,
`That the Christians of Rome were assembled here
by agreement to consult together concerning their affairs
which now by reason of the sudden hostility of Aurelian,
set on by the Pagan priesthood, had assumed a dark and
threatening aspect. It was needful so to consult; that
it might be well ascertained whether no steps could be
taken to ward off the impending evil, and if not, in what
manner and to what extent we might be able to protect
ourselves. But before this be done,' he continued, `let
us all first with one heart seek the blessing of God.
Today
,
Christians, for the first time within the memory of
the younger portion of this assembly, have we by the
wicked power of the state been shut out of those temples
where we have been wont to offer up our seventh day
worship. Here there is none to alarm or interrupt.
Let us give our first hour to God. So shall the day not
be lost, nor the enemy wholly prevail.'
`That is right,' said another. `It is what we all wish.
Let Probus speak to us and pray for us.'
`Felix! Felix!' cried other voices in different parts
of the room.
`Not so, but Probus! Probus!' shouted a far greater
number.
`Who does not know,' cried a shrill voice elevated to
its utmost pitch, `that Probus is a follower of Paul of
Samosata?'
`And who does not know,' responded he who had
first spoken `that Felix follows after Plato and Plotinus?
Pagans both!'
`And what,' said the sharp voice of Macer, `what if
both be true? who dare say that Felix is not a
Christian
?
who dare say that Probus is not a Christian?
and if they are Christians, who shall dare to say they
may not speak to Christians? Probus was first asked,
and let Probus stand forth.'
The name of Probus was then uttered as it were by
the whole assembly.
As he moved toward a more central and elevated spot,
the same mean and shrill voice that had first charged
him, again was heard, advising that no hymn nor chant
be sung; `the Roman watch is now abroad, and despite
the raging of the storm their ears may catch the sound
and the guard be upon us.'
`Let them come then!' shouted Macer `Let them
come! Shall any fear of man or of death frighten us
away from the worship of God? What death more
glorious
than if this moment those doors gave way and the
legions of Aurelian poured in? Praise God and Christ,
Christians, in the highest note you can raise, and let no
cowardice seal your lips nor abate your breath.'
The voice of Probus, now heard in prayer, brought a
deep silence upon the assembly, and I would fain believe,
harmony and peace also into the spirits of all who were
there. It was a service deeply moving and greatly
comforting
.
Whatever any who were present might have
thought of the principles of Probus, all must have been
penetrated and healed by that devout and benevolent
temper that was so manifest in the sentiments he uttered
and, in the very tones of his voice.
No sooner had he ended his prayer than the voice of
Macer broke forth, commencing a chant commonly heard
in the churches and with which all were familiar. His
voice, louder than that of the storm and shriller than the
blast of a war-trumpet, rang through the vast apartment,
and inspiring all who were there with the same courage
that possessed himself, their voices were instinctively
soon joined with his, and the hymn swelled upward
with a burst of harmony that seemed as if it might reach
Heaven itself. Rome and its legions were then as if
they did not exist. God only was present to the mind,
and the thoughts with which that hymn filled it. Its
burden was like this:
`O God almighty, God of Christ our Lord, arise and
defend thy people. The terrors of death are around us,
the enemies of truth and thy Son assail us, and we faint
and are afraid. Their hosts are encamped against us;
they are ready to devour us. Our hope is in thee:
Strengthen and deliver us. Arise, O God, and visit us
with thy salvation.'
These, and words like them, repeated with
importunity
and dwelt upon, the whole soul pouring itself out
with the notes, while tears ran down the cheeks of those
who sang  the sign not of weakness but of the strength
of those affections which bound their hearts to God, to
Christ, and to one another  it seemed as if such words
and so uttered could not but reach the throne of Heaven,
and draw a blessing down. As the hymn drew to a
close and the sounds died away, deep silence again fell
upon the assembly. The heart had been relieved by
the service; the soul had been rapt and borne quite
away; and by a common feeling an interval of rest
ensued
,
which by each seemed to be devoted to meditation
and prayer. This, when it had lasted till the wants of
each had been satisfied, was broken by the voice of
Probus.
What he said was wonderfully adapted to infuse fresh
courage into every heart, and especially to cheer and
support the desponding and the timid. He held up
before
them the great examples of those who in the earlier
ages of the church had offered themselves as sacrifices
upon the same altar upon which the great head of the
Christians had laid down his life. He made it apparent
how it had ever been through suffering of some kind on
the part of some, that great benefits had been conferred
upon mankind; that they who would be benefactors of
their race must be willing cheerfully to bear the evil and
suffering that in so great part constitutes that office; and
was it not a small thing to suffer and that in the body
only, and but for a moment, if by such means great and
permanent blessings to the souls of men might be
secured
,
and remotest ages of the world made to rejoice
and flourish through the effects of their labors? Every
day of their worship they were accustomed to hear sung
or recited the praises of those who had died for Christ
VOL. II. 7*
and truth; men of whom the world was not worthy, and
who, beautiful with the crown of martyrdom, were now
of that glorious company who in the presence of God
were chanting the praises of God and the Lamb.
Who was not ready to die, if it was so ordained, if by
such death truth could be transmitted to other ages?
What was it to die to-day rather than to-morrow  for
that was all  or this year rather than the next, if one's
death could be made subservient to the great cause of
Christ and his gospel? What was it to die by the sword
of a Roman executioner, or even to be torn by wild
beasts, if by suffering so the soul became allied to
reformers
and benefactors of all ages? And besides, what
evil after all was it in the power of their enemies to
inflict
?
They could do no more than torment and destroy
the body. They could not touch nor harm the soul. By
the infliction of death itself they did but hasten the
moment
when they should stand clothed in shining
garments
in the presence of the Father. The time has
come, Christians, he then said, when in the providence
of God you are called upon to be witnesses of the faith
which you profess in Christ. After many years of
calm, a storm has arisen which begins already to be felt
in the violence with which it beats upon our heads.
Almost
ever since the reign of Decius have we possessed
our borders in quietness. Especially under Gallienus
and Claudius, and during these nearly four years of
Aurelian
,
have we enjoyed our faith and our worship with
none to alarm or oppress us. The laws of the empire
have been as a wall of defence between us and the fierce
and bloody spirit of Pagan superstition. They who
would have willingly assailed and destroyed us have
been forcibly restrained by wise and merciful enactments.
During this season of repose our numbers have
increased
,
we have been prosperous and happy. Our
churches have multiplied, and all the signs of an
outward
prosperity have been visible in all parts of this vast
empire. Would to God I could say that while numbers
and wealth have been added to the church, it had grown
in grace and in the practice of the virtues of the gospel
in the same proportion! But I cannot. The simplicity
and purity of the first ages are no longer to be seen
among us. We no longer emulate the early apostles
and make them our patterns. We rather turn to the
Pagan and Jewish priesthood, and in all that pertains to
the forms of our worship mould ourselves upon them; and
in all that pertains to opinion and doctrine we turn to
the philosophers and engraft whatever of their mysteries
and subtleties we can upon the plain and simple truth
as it is in Jesus. We have departed far, very far, from
the gospel standard, both in practice and in faith. We
need, Christians, to be brought back. We have gone
astray  we have almost worshipped other gods,  it is
needful that we return in season, while the day lasts, to
our true allegiance. I dare not say, Christians, that
the calamity which now impends is a judgment of God
upon our corruptions; we know not what events are of
a judicial character, they have upon them no signature
which marks them as such; but this we may say, that
it will be no calamity, but a benefit and a blessing rather,
if it have the effect to show us our errors and cause us
to retrace our steps. Aurelian, enemy though we call
him, may prove our benefactor; he may scourge us;
but the sufferings he inflicts may bring healing along
with them, being that very medicine which the sick soul
needs. Let us meet then this new and heavy trial as a
part of the providence of God, as a part of that
mysterious
plan  the lines of which are in so great part hidden
from our eyes  by which he educates his children for
eternity, and at the same time, and by the same means,
prepares and transmits to future generations the richest
blessings. If we, Christians, suffer for the cause of truth
and God, let us be cheered by the thought that by our
sufferings our children and children's children are made
to inherit that truth, and brought into the family of God.
If our blood is poured out like water, let us remember
that it serves to fertilize that soil out of which divine
nutriment
shall grow for generations yet unborn, whom it
shall nourish up unto eternal life. Let your hearts then
be strong within you; faint not, nor fear; God will be
with you and his Spirit comfort you.
`But why do I say these things? Why do I exhort
you to courage? For when was it known that the
followers
of Christ shrunk from the path of duty, though
it were evidently the path of death? When and in
what age have those been wanting who should bear
witness
to the truth, and seal it with their blood? There
have been those who in time of persecution have fallen
away  but for one apostate there have been a thousand
martyrs. We have been, I may rather affirm, too
prodigal of life  too lavish of our blood. There has
been, in former ages, not only a willingness, a readiness
to die for Christ, but an eagerness. Christians have
not waited to be searched for and found by the ministers
of Roman power; they have thrust themselves
forward
;
they have gone up of their own accord to the
tribunal and proclaimed their faith, and invited the death
at which nature trembles and revolts. But shall we
blame this divine ardor? this more than human
contempt
of suffering and death? this burning zeal for the
great cause of our Master? Let us rather honor and
revere it as a temper truly divine and of more than
mortal force. But let us be just to all. While we
honor the courage and self-sacrificing love of so many,
let us not require that all should be such, nor cast
suspicion
upon those who  loving Christ not less in their
hearts  shrink from the sufferings in which others
glory. Ye need not, Christian men and women,
yourselves
rush to the tribunal of Varus, ere you can feel
that you are Christ's indeed. It is not needful that to
be a Christian you must also be a martyr. Ye need
not, ye ought not, impatiently seek for the rack and the
cross. It is enough if, when sought and found and
arraigned
,
you be found faithful; if then you deny not
nor renounce your Lord, but glory in your name, and
with your dying breath shout it forth as that for which
you gladly encounter torture and death. Go not forth
then seeking the martyr's crown! Wait till you are
called. God knoweth, and he alone, whom he would
have to glorify him by that death which is so much
more to be coveted than life. Leave all in the hand of
Providence. You that are not chosen, fear not that,
though later, the gates of Heaven shall not be thrown
open for you. Many are the paths that lead to those
gates. Besides, shall all rush upon certain death?
Were all martyrs, where then were the seed of the
church? They who live, and by their life consecrate to
holiness and God show that they are his, do no less for
their Master and his cause than do they who die for
that cause. Nay, 't is easier to die well than to live
well. The cross which we bear through a long life of
faithful service, is a heavier one than that which we
bear as we go up our Calvary. Leave all then,
Christian
men and women, in the hands of God. Seek not
death nor life. Shun not life nor death. Say each,
Here, Lord, is thy servant, do with him as shall seem
to thee good.
`And now, Christians, how shall we receive the edict
of Aurelian? It silences our preachers, it closes our
churches. What now is the duty of the Christians of
Rome?'
Soon as this question was proposed by Probus, many
voices from various parts of the room gave in their
judgments
.
At first the opinions expressed differed on many
points, but as the discussion was prolonged the
difference
grew less and less, till unanimity seemed to be
attained
.
It was agreed at length, that it was right to
conform to the edict so far as this: `That they would
not preach openly in the streets nor elsewhere. They
would at first and scrupulously conform to the edict in
its letter and spirit  until they had seen what could be
done by appeals both to the emperor and the senate
but maintaining at the same time that if their appeals
were vain, if their churches were not restored to them
with liberty to assemble in them as formerly and for the
same purposes  then they would take the freedom that
was not granted, and use it as before, and abide by the
issue  no power of man should close their mouths as
ambassadors of God, as followers of Christ and through
him reformers of the world. They would speak  they
would preach and pray, though death were the
immediate
reward.
In this determination I heartily agreed as both
moderate
and yet firm; as showing respect for the powers that
are over us, and at the same time asserting our own
rights and declaring our purpose to stand by them. But
so thought not all. For no sooner was the opinion of
the assembly declared than Macer broke forth:
`I have heard,' said he, `the judgment which has
been pronounced. But I like it not  I agree not to it.
Shall the minister of Christ, the ambassador of God, a
messenger from Heaven to earth, hold his peace at the
behest of a man, though he be an emperor, or of ten
thousand men, were all emperors? Not though every
Christian in Rome subscribed to this judgment, not
though every Christian in the world assented to it,
would I. Is Christ to receive laws of Aurelian? Is
the cause of God and truth to be postponed to that of
the empire? and posterity to die of hunger because we
refuse to till the earth? We are God's spiritual
husbandmen
the heart of Rome is our field of labor
it is already the eleventh hour  the last days are at
hand  and shall we forbear our toil? shall we
withdraw
our hand from the plough? shall we cease to
proclaim
the glad tidings of salvation because the doors of
our churches are closed? Not so, Christians, by the
blessing of God, shall it be with me. While the streets
of Rome and her door-stones will serve me for church
and pulpit, and while my tongue is left unwrenched
from my mouth, will I not cease to declare Jesus Christ
and him crucified! Think you Aurelian will abate his
wrath or change his purposes of death, for all your
humble sueing? that cringing and fawning will turn
aside the messengers of death? Believe it not. Ye
know not Aurelian. More would you gain with him,
did the faith of the peace-loving Jesus allow it, if ye
went forth in battle array and disputed this great
question
in the streets of Rome sword in hand! More
would ye gain now, if ye sent a word of defiance
denying
his right to interpose between God and his
people
between Christ and his church  and daring him
to do his worst, than by this tame surrender of your
rights  this almost base denial of your Master. No
sooner shall to-morrow's sun have risen than on the
very steps of the capitol will I preach Christ, and hurl
the damnation of God upon this bloody emperor and his
bloody people.'
`O, Macer, Macer! cease, cease!' cried a woman's
voice from the crowd. `You know not what you say!
Already have your harsh words put new bitterness into
Aurelian's heart. Forbear, as you love Christ and us.'
`Woman ' replied Macer, `for such your voice
declares
you to be  I do love both Christ and you, and it
is because I love you that I aim to set aside this
faithless
judgment of the Roman Christians. But when I
say I love you, and the believers in Rome, I mean your
souls, not your bodies. I love not your safety, nor your
peace, nor your outward comforts; your houses, nor
your wealth, nor your children, nor your lives, nor
anything
that is yours which the eye can see or the hands
handle. I love your souls, and beside them nothing.
And while it is them I love and for them am bound
in the spirit as a minister of Christ, I may not hold my
peace, nor hide myself, for that there is a lion in the
path! As a soldier of the cross I will never flee.
Though at the last day I hear no ether word of praise
from Him the judge  and no other shall I hear, for my
Pagan sins weigh me down  down  help, Lord! or I
perish! ' Macer's voice here took the tone of
deepest
agony; he seemed for a time wholly lost, standing
still, with outstretched arms and uplifted eye. After a
long pause he suddenly resumed. `What did I say?
It was this: though I hear no other word of praise from
my judge as I stand at his judgment-seat, I trust I shall
hear this, that I did not flee nor hide myself, that I was
no coward, but a bold and fearless soldier of the cross,
ready at any time and at all times to suffer for the souls
of my brethren.'
`Think not, Macer,' said Probus, `that we shrink
at the prospect of danger. But we would be not
only bold and unshrinking, but wise and prudent.
There is more than one virtue goes to make the
Christian
man. We think it right and wise first to appeal to
the emperor's love of justice. We think it might
redound
greatly to our advantage if we could obtain a
public hearing before Aurelian, so that from one of our
own side he might hear the truth in Christ, and then
judge whether to believe so was hurtful to the state or
deserving of torture and death.'
`As well, Probus,' replied Macer, `might you preach
the faith of Christ in the ear of the adder! to the very
stones of the highways! Aurelian turn from a settled
purpose! ha! ha! you have not served, Probus, under
him in Gaul and Asia as others have. Never did the
arguments of his legions and his great officers on the
other side serve but to intrench him the more
impregnably
VOL. II. 8
on his own. He knows not what the word change
means. But were this possible and of good hope, it
shows not that plain and straight path to which my spirit
points, and which therefore I must travel. Is it right to
hearken to man rather than God? That to me is the
only question. Shall Aurelian silence the ambassador
of God and Christ? Shall man wrestle and dispute it
with the Almighty? To me, Christians, it would be a
crime of deeper dye than the errors of my Pagan youth,
did I chain my tongue were it but for an hour at the
command of Aurelian. I have a light within, and it is
that I must obey. I reason not  I weigh not
probabilties
I balance not argument against argument  I feel!
and that I take to be the instinct of God  the
inspiration
of his holy Spirit  and as I feel so am I bound
to act.'
It was felt to be useless to reason with this impetuous
and self-willed man. He must be left to work out his
own path through the surrounding perils, and bear
whatever
evil his violent rashness might draw upon his head.
Yet his are those extreme and violent opinions and
feelings
which are so apt to carry away the multitude, and
it was easy to see that a large proportion of the assembly
went with him. Another occasion was given for their
expression.
When it had been determined that the edicts should
be observed so far as to refrain from all public preaching
and all assembling together, till the emperor had been
first appealed to, it then became a question in what
manner
the emperor should be approached, and by whom, in
behalf of the whole body. And no sooner had Macer
ceased, than the same voice which had first brought
those charges against Probus was again heard  the
voice as I have since learned of a friend of Felix, and
an exorcist.
`If it be now determined,' said the voice, `that we
appeal
to the clemency of the emperor in order to avert
from our heads the evil that seems to be more than
threatened, let it be done by some one who in his faith
may fitly represent the great body of Christ's followers.
Whether the emperor shall feel well inclined toward us
or not, will it not greatly depend upon the manner in
which the truth in Christ shall be set forth, and whether
by means of the principles and doctrines that shall be
shown to belong to it and constitute it, it shall be judged
by him to be of hurtful or beneficial tendency? Now it
is well known to all how variously Christ is received
and interpreted in Rome. As received by some, his
gospel is one thing; as received by others, is another
and quite a different thing. Who can doubt that our
prospect of a favorable hearing with Aurelian will be an
encouraging one in the proportion that he shall perceive
our opinions to agree with those which have already
been advanced in the schools of philosophy  especially
in that of the divine Plato. This agreement and almost
identity has, ever since the time of Justin, been pointed
out and learnedly defended. They who perceive this
agreement, and rest in it as their faith, now constitute
the greater part of the Christian world. Let him then
who is to bespeak for us the emperor's good-will be, as
in good sooth he ought to be, of these opinions. As to
the declaration that has been made that one is as much
a Christian as another, whatever the difference of faith
may be, I cannot receive it; and he who made the
declaration
,
I doubt, would scarce abide by it, since as I
learn he is a worshipper and follower of that false-hearted
interloper Novatian. The puritans least of all are apt to
regard with favor those who hold not with them. Let
Felix then, who, if any now living in Rome may stand
forward as a specimen of what Christ's religion is in
both its doctrine and its life  let Felix plead our cause
with Aurelian.'
The same difference of feeling and opinion manifested
itself as before. Many voices immediately cried out,
`yes, yes, Felix, let Felix speak for us.' While others
from every part of the room were heard shouting out,
`Probus, Probus, let Probus be our advocate!'
At length the confusion subsided as a single voice
made itself heard above the others and caught their
attention
.
`If Felix, O Christians, as has just been affirmed,
represents the opinions which are now most popular in
the Christian world, at least here in Rome, Probus
represents
those which are more ancient ' He was
instantly
interrupted.
`How long ago,' cried another, `lived Paul of
Samosata
?'
`When died the heretic Sabellius?' added still another.
`Or Praxeas?' said a third, `or Theodotus? or
Artemon
?'
`These,' replied the first, soon as he could find room
for utterance  `these are indeed not of the earliest age,
but they from whom they learned their faith are of that
age, namely, the apostles and the great master of all.'
`Heresy,' cried out one who had spoken before, `
always
dates from the oldest; it never has less age nor
authority than that of Christ.'
`Christians! Christians!' Macer's stentorian voice
was now heard towering above the tumult `what is it
ye would have? What are these distinctions about
which ye dispute? What have they to do with the
matter
now in hand? How would one doctrine or the other
in such matters weigh with Aurelian more than straws
or feathers? But if these are stark naught, and less
than naught, there are other questions pertinent to the
time, nay which the time forces upon us, and about
which we should be well agreed. A new age of
persecution
has arisen, and the church is about to be sifted,
and the wheat separated from the chaff  the first to be
gathered into the garners of God the last to be burned
up in fire unquenchable. Now is it to be proved who
are Christ's and who are not  who will follow him
bearing their cross to some new Calvary, and who,
saving their lives, shall yet lose them. Who knows not
the evil that in the time of Decius, yes and before and
since too, fell upon the church from the so easy
reception
and restoration of those who in an hour of weakness
and fear denied their master and his faith and bowed
the knee to the gods of Rome? Here is the danger
against which we are to guard; from this quarter  not
from any other of vain jargon concerning natures,
essences
,
and modes of being  are we to look for those fatal
inroads to be made upon the purity of the gospel, that
cannot but draw along with them corruption and ruin.
Of what stuff will the church then be made when they
who are its ministers, deacons, and bishops, shall be
such as when danger showed itself, relapsed into
idolatry
,
and soon as the clouds had drifted by and the winds
blew soft came forth again into the calm sunshine,
renounced
VOL. II. 8*
their idolatry, and again professing Christ, were
received to the arms of the church and even to the
communion
of the body and blood of our Lord? Christians,
the great Novatian is he to whom we owe what purity
the church yet retains, and it is in allegiance to him '
`The great Novatian!' exclaimed a priest of the
Roman
church, `great only in his infamy! Himself an
apostate once, he sought afterwards, having been
received
himself back again to the church upon his
repentance
,
to bury his shame under a show of zeal against
such as were guilty of the same offence. His own
weakness or sin, instead of teaching him compassion,
served but to harden his heart. Is this the man to
whose principles we are to pledge ourselves? Were his
principles sound in themselves we could hardly take
them from such a source. But they are false. They
are in the face of the spirit and letter of the gospel.
What is the character of the religion of Christ, if it be
not mercy? Yet this great Novatian to those who like
Peter have fallen  Peter whom his master received and
forgave  denies all mercy! and for one offence,
however
penitence may wring the soul, cuts them off forever
like a rotten branch from the body of Christ! Is this
the teacher whose follower should appeal for us to the
Roman emperor?'
`I seek not,' Macer began to say, `to defend the bishop
of Rome '
`Bishop!' cried the other, `bishop! who ever heard
that Novatian was bishop of Rome? But who has not
heard that that wicked and ambitious man through envy
of Cornelius, and resolved to supplant him, caused
himself
to be ordained bishop by a few of that order, weak
and corrupt men, whom he bribed to the bad work, but
who, corrupt as they were, and bribed as they were, it
was first needful to make drunk before conscience would
allow them by such act eternally to disgrace themselves
and the church '
`Lies and slanders all,' cried Macer and others with
him in the same breath and with their utmost voice.
At the same time many were heard to name Macer as
one who would best assert and defend the Christian
cause before Aurelian. But these were soon overborne
and silenced by the greater number of those who now
again called upon Probus to fill that office.
Probus seemed not sorry that, his name being thus
tumultuously called out, he had it in his power to speak
to the assembly. Making a sign accordingly that he
would be heard, he said,
`That he coveted not the honorable office of appealing
for them to the Emperor of Rome. It would confer more
happiness a thousand fold, Christians, if I could by any
words of mine put harmony and peace into your hearts
than if I might even convert a Roman emperor. What
a scene is this, at such an hour  of confusion and
discord
when, if ever, our hearts should be drawn closer
together by this exposure to a common calamity. Why
is it that when at home, or moving abroad in the
business
of life, your conversation so well becomes your
name and faith, drawing upon you even the
commendation
of your Pagan foes, you no sooner assemble
together
as now than division and quarrel ensue in such
measure as among our Heathen opponents is never or
rarely seen? Why is it that when you are so ready,
Christians, to die for Christ, you will not live at peace
for him? Honor you not him more by showing that
you are of his spirit, that for his name's sake you are
willing to bear patiently whatever reproach may be laid
upon you, than you do even by suffering and dying for
him? for which is the harder service, to lay down a life
often so hard beset by sorrow and pain, and thereupon
enter through Heaven's gates into the immediate and
eternal glory of God, or to live on many and weary days
of patient doing and bearing, toiling without ceasing
oftentimes trampled upon, cast out as an offence
despised
scorned; and with the first teachers a spectacle
of misery and compassion to angels and to men? Be
not so ready then to take upon you the lighter burden
and the easier yoke, while you shrink from the heavier
one, but for that reason the more honorable. Let all
who are here but show their love of Christ as perfectly
in their tempers, as they would to-morrow, were they
summoned to the trial, by meeting without a murmur or
a groan the rods and the axe of the executioner, and a
day of a new and better glory will have risen upon the
church. The questions you have agitated are not for
this hour and place. What now does it signify whether
one be a follower of Paul, of Origen, of Sabellius, or
Novatian
,
when we are each and all so shortly to be called
upon to confess our allegiance to neither of these  but
to a greater, even Jesus  the master and head of us
all! And what has our preference for some of the
doctrines
of either of these to do with our higher love of
Christ and his truth? By such preference is our
superior
and supreme regard for Jesus and his word
vitiated
or invalidated? Nay what is it we then do when
we embrace the peculiar doctrine of some great or good
man who has gone before, but embrace that which in a
peculiar sense we regard as the doctrine of Christ? We
receive the peculiar doctrine of Paul, or Justin, or
Origen
,
not because it is theirs, but because we think they
have shown it to be eminently the doctrine of Christ.
In binding upon us then the dogmas of any teacher, we
ought not to be treated other than as those who in doing
so are seeking to do the highest honor not to such
teacher, but to Christ. I am charged as a disciple of
the bishop of Antioch, and the honored Felix as a
disciple
of Plato. If I honor Paul, Christians, for any of
his truth, it is because I deem him to have discerned
clearly the truth as it is in Jesus. My faith is not
in him, but in Jesus. And if Felix honor Plato or
Plotinus, it is but because in them he beholds some
clearer unfolding  clearer than elsewhere  of the truth
in Christ. Are not we then, and all who do the same
thing, to be esteemed as those who honor Christ? not
deny or forsake him. And as we all hold in especial
reverence some one or another of a former age, through
whom as a second master we receive the doctrines of
the gospel, ought we not all to love and honor one
another, seeing that in the same way, we all love and
honor Christ? Let love, Christians, mutual honor and
love, be the badge of our discipleship, as it was in the
first age of the church. Soon, very soon, will you be
called to bear testimony to the cause you have espoused,
and perhaps seal it with your blood. Be not less ready
to show your love to those around you by the
promptness
with which you lend your sympathy, or counsel, or
aid, as this new flood of adversity flows in upon them.
But why do I exhort you? The thousand acts of
kindness
,
of charity, of brotherly love, which flow outwards
from you in a perpetual stream toward Heathen not less
than Christian, and have drawn upon you the
admiration
even of the Pagan world, is sufficient assurance that
your hearts will not be cold when the necessities of this
heavier time shall lay upon you their claims. It is only
in the public assembly, and in the ardor of debate, that
love seems cold and dead. Forget then, now and
tomorrow
,
that you are followers of any other than Christ.
Forget that you call yourselves after one teacher or
another, and remember only that you are brethren,
members
of one family, of the same household of faith,
owning
one master, worshipping one and the same God and
Father of us all. And now, Christians, if you would
rather that Felix should defend you before Aurelian, I
would also. There is none among us who loves Christ
more or better than he, or would more readily lay down
his life for his sake.'
Felix however joined with all the others  for all now
seemed of one opinion  in desiring that Probus should
appear for the Christians before the Emperor; which he
then consented to do. Harmony was once more restored.
The differences of opinion which separated them seemed
to be forgotten, and they mingled as friends and
fellow-laborers
in the great cause of truth. They who had
been harshest in the debate  which was at much greater
length, and conducted with much more vehemence than
as I have described it  were among the most forward
to meet with urbanity those who were in faith the most
distantly removed from them. A long and friendly
interview
then took place, in which each communed with
each, and by words of faith or affection helped to supply
the strength which all needed for the approaching
conflict
.
One saw no longer and heard no longer the
enthusiastic
disputant, more bent upon victory than truth,
and heedless of the wounds he gave to the heart,
provided
he convinced the head or silenced the tongue, but
instead, those who now appeared no other than a
company
of neighbors and friends engaged in the promotion
of some common object of overwhelming interest.
When in this manner and for a considerable space of
time a fit offering had been laid upon the altar of love,
the whole assembly again joined together in acts of
prayer, and again lifted up their voices in songs of
praise. This duty being performed we separated and
sought the streets. The storm which had begun in
violence
,
had increased, and it was with difficulty that beset
by darkness, wind, and rain, I succeeded without injury
in finding my way to the Clian.
Julia was waiting for me with anxious impatience.
After relating to her the events of the evening, she
said,
`How strange, Lucius, the conduct of such men at
such a time! How could Christians with the
Christian's
faith in their hearts so lose the possession of
themselves  and so violate all that they profess as
followers
of Jesus! I confess if this be the manner in
which Christianity is intended to operate upon the
character
,
I am as yet wholly ignorant of it, and desire ever
to remain so. But it is not possible that they are right.
Nay, they seem in some sort to have acknowledged
themselves to have been in the wrong by the last acts of
the meeting. This brings to my mind what Paul has
often told me of the Christians, of the same kind at which
I was then amazed but had forgotten. I do not
comprehend
it. I have read and studied the character and
the teachings of Jesus, and it seems to me I have arrived
at some true understanding  for surely there is little
difficulty in doing so  of what he himself was, and of
what he wished his followers to be. Would he have
recognized his likeness in those of whom you have now
told me?'
`Yet,' I replied, `there was more of it there in those
very persons than at first we might be inclined to think;
and in the great multitude of those who were present it
may have been all there, and was in most I cannot
doubt. We ought not to judge of this community by the
leaders of the several divisions which compose it. They
are by no means just specimens, from which to infer the
character of all. They are but too often restless,
ambitious
,
selfish men; seeking their own aggrandizement
and their party's, rather than the glory of Christ and his
truth. I can conceive of a reception of Christian
precept
and of the Christian spirit being but little more
perfect
and complete than I have found it among the
humbler
sort of the Christians of Rome. Among them there
is to be seen nothing of the temper of violence and
bigotry
that was visible this evening in the language of so
many. They for the most part place the religion of
Jesus in holy living, in love of one another, and patient
waiting for the kingdom of God. And their lives are
seen to accord with these great principles of action. Even
for their leaders, who are in so many points so different
from them, this may be said in explanation and excuse
that from studying the record more than the common
people, they come to consider more narrowly in what
the religion of Jesus consists, and arriving after much
labor at what they believe in their hearts to be the
precise
truth,  truth the most vital of any to the power
and success of the gospel, this engrosses all their
affections
and prompts all their labor and zeal; in the
dissemination
of this do they alone behold the dissemination
of Christianity itself  this being denied or rejected the
gospel itself is. With such notions as fundamental
principles
of action, it is easy to see with what sincere and
virtuous indignatin they would be filled toward such as
should set at nought and oppose that which they cherish
as the very central glory and peculiarity of Christianity.
These things being so, I can pity and forgive a great deal
of what appears and is so opposite to the true Christian
temper, on account of its origin and cause. Especially
as these very persons, who are so impetuous and
truculent
almost, as partizans and advocates, are as private
Christians examples perhaps of extraordinary virtue.
We certainly know this to be the case with Macer. An
apostle was never more conscientious, or more pure.
Yet would he, had he power equal to his will, drive
from the church all who bowed not the knee to his idol
Novatian.'
`But how,' asked Julia, `would that agree with the
offence he justly took at those who quareled with
Probus
and Felix on account of their doctrine?'
`There certainly would be in such conduct no
agreement
nor consistency. It only shows how easy it is to
see a fault in another, to which we are stone-blind in
ourselves. In the faith or errors of Probus and Felix
he thought there was nothing that should injure their
Christian name, or unfit them for any office. Yet in
the same breath he condemned as almost the worst
enemies
VOL. II. 9
of Christ such as refused honor and adherence to
the severe and inhuman code of his master Novatian.'
`But how far removed, Lucius, is all this from the
spirit of the religion of Jesus! Allowing all the force
of the apologies you may offer, is it not a singular state
for the minds and tempers of those to have arrived at,
who profess before the world to have formed themselves
after the doctrine, and what is more after the character
of Christ? I cannot understand the process by which
it has been done, nor how it is that without bringing
upon themselves public shame and reproach such men
can stand forth and proclaim themselves not only
Christians
,
but Christian leaders and ministers.'
`I can understand it I confess quite as little. But I
cannot doubt that as Christianity outgrows its infancy,
especially when the great body of those who profess it
shall have been formed by it from their youth and shall
not be composed as now of those who have been brought
over from the opposite and uncongenial regions of
Paganism
,
with much of their former character still
adhering
to them, Christians will then be what they ought
to be who make the life and character of Jesus their
standard. Nothing is learned so slowly by mankind as
those lessons which enforce mutual love and respect, in
which the gospels so abound. We must allow not only
years, but hundreds of years, for these lessons to be
imprinted upon the general heart of men, and to be
seen in all their character and intercourse. But when
a few hundred years shall have elapsed, and that is a
long allowance for this education to be perfected in, I
can conceive that the times of the primitive peace and
love shall be more than restored, and that such
reproaches
as to-night were heard lavished upon one and
another will be deemed as little compatible with a
Christian
profession as would be violence and war. All
violence
and wrong must cease as this religion is received,
and the ancient superstitions and idolatries die out.'
`What a privilege, to be born and live,' said Julia, `in
those fast approaching years, when Christianity shall
alone be received as the religion of this large empire;
when Paganism shall have become extinct in Rome,
and all our people shall be actuated by the same great
principles of faith and virtue that governed both Christ
and his apostles! A few centuries will witness more
and better than we now dream of.'
So we pleased ourselves with visions of future peace
and happiness which Christianity was to convert to
reality
.
To me they are no more mere visions, but as
much realities to be experienced, as the future towering
oak is, when I look upon an acorn planted, or as the
future
man is, when I look upon a little child. If
Christianity
grows at all, it must grow in such direction. If
it do not, it will not be Christianity that grows, but
something else that shall have assumed its name and
usurped its place. The extension of Christianity is the
extension and multiplication as it were of that which
constituted Christ himself  it is the conversion of men
into his image  or else it is nothing. Then when this
shall be done, what a paradise of peace, and holiness,
and love, will not the earth be! Surely to be used as
an instrument in accomplishing such result, one may
well regard as an honor and privilege, and be ready to
bear and suffer much if need be in fulfilling the great
office.
I hope I shall not have wearied you by all this
exactness
.
I strictly conform to your injunctions, so that you
can complain only of yourself.
We often wish that the time would allow us to
escape
to you, that we might witness your labors and
share them in the rebuilding and rembelishing of the
city. Rome will never be a home to Julia. Her
affections
are all in Syria. I can even better conceive of
Zenobia becoming a Roman than Julia. Farewell.
Finding
among the papers of Piso no letter giving
any account of what took place immediately after the
meeting of the Christians, which in his last letter he
has so minutely described, I shall here supply as I may
the deficiency, and I can do it at least with fidelity,
since I was present at the scenes of which I shall speak.
No one took a more lively interest in the condition and
affairs of the Christians than Zenobia; and it is with
sorrow that I find among the records of Piso no mention
made of conversations had at Tibur while these events
were transpiring, at which were present himself, and the
princess Julia, the queen, and more than once Aurelian
and Livia. While I cannot doubt that such record was
made, I have in vain searched for it among those
documents
which he has intrusted to me.
It was by command of the queen that on the day
following
that on which the Christians held their assembly
at the baths, I went to Rome for the very purpose to
learn whatever I could both at the Gardens and abroad
in the city concerning the condition and probable fate of
the Christians, she desiring more precise information
than could be gathered from any of the usual sources of
intelligence.
It was apparent to me as I entered the city, and
penetrated
to its more crowded parts, that somewhat unusual
had taken place, or was about to happen. There were
more than the common appearances of excitement among
those whom I saw conversing and gesticulating at the
corners of streets or the doors of the public baths. This
idle and corrupt population seemed to have less than on
other occasions to employ their hands, and so gave their
time and their conversation to one another, laying no
restraint upon the quantity of either. It is an
indisputable
fact that Rome exists to this day, for any one who
will come into Italy may see it for himself, and he
cannot
reject the testimony of his eyes and ears. But how
it exists from year to year, or from day to day, under
such institutions, it would puzzle the wisest philosopher
I believe to tell. Me, who am no philosopher, it
puzzles
as often as I reflect upon it. I cannot learn the
causes that hold together in such apparent order and
contentment so idle and so corrupt a people. I have
supposed it must be these, but they seem not sufficient:
the Prtorian camp without the walls, and the guard in
league with them within, and the largesses and games
proceeding from the bounty of the emperor. These last,
though they are the real sources of their corruption and
must end in the very destruction of the city and people,
yet at present operate to keep them quiet and in order.
So long as these bounties are dispensed, so long, such
VOL. II. 9*
is our innate love of idleness and pleasure, will the
mass think it foolish to agitate any questions of right
or religion, or any other, by which they might be
forfeited
.
Were these suddenly suspended, all the power
of the Prtorian cohorts I suppose could not keep peace
in Rome. They were now I found occupied by the
affairs
of the Christians, and waiting impatiently for the
orders which should next issue from the imperial will.
The edicts published two days before gave them no
employment
,
nor promised much. They merely laid
restraints
upon the Christians, but gave no liberty of
assault
and injury to the Roman.
`That does not satisfy the people,' said one to me, at
the door of a shop, of whom I had made some inquiry
on the subject. `More was looked for from the
emperor
,
for it is well known that he intends the extremest
measures, and most are of opinion that before the day
is out new edicts will be issued. Why he took the
course he did of so uncommon moderation 'tis hard to
say. All the effect of it is to give the Christians
opportunity
to escape and hide themselves, so that by the
time the severer orders against them are published, it
will be impossible to carry them into execution.'
`Perhaps,' I said, `it was after all his intention to give
them a distant warning, that some might, if they saw
fit to do so, escape.'
`I do not believe that,' he replied; `it will rather, I
am of the opinion, be found to have proceeded from the
advice of Fronto and Varus, to give to the proceedings
a greater appearance of moderation; which shows into
the hands of what owls the emperor has suffered himself
to fall. Nobody ever expected moderation in Aurelian,
nor do any but a few as bad as themselves think these
wretches deserve it. The only effect of it will be to
increase
their swelling insolence and pride, thinking that
Aurelian threatens but dares not execute. Before
another
day, I trust, new edicts will show that Aurelian is
himself. The life of Rome hangs upon the death of
these.'
Saying which, with a savage scowl, which showed
how gladly he would turn executioner or tormentor in
such service, he turned and crossed the street.
I then sought the palace of Piso. I was received in
the library, where I found the lady Julia and Piso.
They greeted me as they ever did, rather as if I were
a brother than but the servant of Zenobia. But
whatever
belongs to her, were it but so much as a slave of
the lowest office, would they treat with affection at
least, if not with reverence. After answering their
inquiries
after the welfare of the queen and Faustula, I
made mine concerning the condition of the city and the
affairs of the Christians, saying, `that Zenobia was
anxious
to learn what ground there was, or whether any,
to feel apprehension for the safety of that people?'
Piso said, `that now he did not doubt there was great
ground for serious apprehension. It was believed by
those who possessed the best means of intelligence, that
new edicts of a much severer character would be issued
before another day. But that Zenobia need be under
no concern either as to himself or Julia, since the
emperor
in conversation with him as much as assured
him that whatever might befal others, no harm should
come to them.'
He then gave me an account of what the Christians
had done in their assembly, agreeing with what is now
to be found in the preceding letter.
I then asked whether he thought that the Christian
Macer would keep to the declaration he had made that
he would to-day, the edicts notwithstanding, preach in
the streets of Rome? He replied that he did not doubt
that he would, and that if I wished to know what some
of the Christians were, and what the present temper of
the people was towards them, I should do well to seek
him and hear him.
`Stand by him, good Nichomachus,' said Julia, `if at
any moment you find that you can be of service to him.
I have often heretofore blamed him, but since this
murder
of Aurelia, and the horrors of the dedication, I hold
him warranted and more in any means he may use to
rouse this guilty people. Perhaps it is only by the
laceration
of such remedies as he uses that the heart of Rome
hardened by ages of sin  can be made to feel. To
the milder treatment of Probus, and others like him, it
seems sometimes utterly insensible and dead. At least
his sincerity and his zeal and his courage are worthy of
all admiration.'
I assured her that I would befriend him if I could do
so with any prospect of advantage, but it was little that
one could do against the fury of a Roman mob. I then
asked Piso if he would not accompany me? but he
replied
that he had already heard Macer, and was besides
necessarily detained at home by other cares.
As there was no conjecturing in what part of the city
this Christian preacher would harrangue the people, and
neither the princess nor Piso could impart any certain
information, I gave little more thought to it, but as I left
the palace on the Clian determined to seek the gardens
of Sallust, where if I should not see Aurelian, I might
at least pass the earlier hours of the day in an agreeable
retreat. I took the street which leads from the Clian
to the Capitol Hill, as affording a pleasanter walk  if
longer. On the way there I observed well the signs
which were given in the manner and conversation of
those whom I met, or walked with, of the events which
were near at hand. There is no better index of what a
despotic ruler and yet at the same time a `people's'
despot
will do, than the present will of the people. It was
most apparent to me that the people were impatient for
some quick and vigorous action, no matter how violent,
against the Christians. Language the most cruel and
ferocious met my ear. The moderation and tardiness
of the emperor  of him who had in everything else
been noted for the rapidity of his movements were
frequent
subjects of complaint. `It is most strange,' they
said, `that Aurelian should hesitate in this matter, in
truth as if he were afraid to move. Were it not for
Fronto, it is thought that nothing would be done after
all. But this we may feel sure of that if the emperor
once fairly begins the work of extermination, he is not
the man to stop half way. And there is not a friend of
the ancient institutions of religion, but who says that its
very existence depends upon  not the partial
obstruction
of this sect  but upon its actual and total
extermination
.
Who does not know that measures of opposition
and resistance which go but part way, and then stop
through a certain unwillingness as it were to proceed to
extremes, do but increase the evil they aim to suppress.
Weeds that are but mown, come up afterwards but the
more vigorously. Their very roots must be torn up and
then burned.' Such language was heard on all sides,
uttered with utmost violence  of voice and gesture.
I paused among other curious and busy idlers at the
door of a smith's shop, which as I passed slowly by
presented
a striking view of a vast and almost boundless
interior blazing with innumerable fires, about which
laborers
half nakedand seeming as if fire themselves from
the reflection from their steaming bodies of the red glare
of the furnaces  stood in groups, some drawing forth the
bars of heated metal and holding them, while others
wielding their cyclopean hammers made the anvils and
the vast interior ring with the blows they gave. All
around the outside of the shop and in separate places
within stood the implements and machines of various
kinds which were either made, or were in the process
of being put together. Those whom I joined were just
within the principal entrance looking upon a fabric of
iron consisting of a complicated array of wheels and
pulleys
,
to which the workmen were just in the act of
adding the last pieces. The master of the place now
approaching and standing with us, while he gave
diverse
orders to the men, I said to him,
`What new device may this be? The times labor
with new contrivances by which to assist the laborer in
his art and cause iron to do what the arm has been
accustomed
to perform. But after observing this with
care I can make nothing of it.'
The master looked at me with a slighting expression
of countenance as much as to say `you are a wise one!
You must just have emerged from the mountains of
Helvetia, or the forests of the Danube.' But he did not
content himself with looks.
`This, sir?' said he. `This if you would know it, is a
rack  a common instrument of torture  used in all the
prisons of the empire, the use of which is to extract truth
from one who is unwilling to speak except compelled;
or, sometimes when death is thought too slight a
punishment
,
to give it an edge with, just as salt and pepper
are thrown into a fresh wound. Some crimes you must
know were too softly dealt with, were a sharp axe the
only instrument employed. Csar! just bring some
wires of a good thickness and we will try this. Now
shall you see precisely how it would fare with your own
body were you on this iron frame and Varus standing
where I am. There, the body you perceive is confined
in this manner. You observe there can be no escape
and no motion. Now at the word of the judge, this
crank is turned. Do you see the effect upon the wire?
Imagine it your body and you will have a lively idea of
the instrument. Then at another wink or word from
Varus, these are turned and you see that another part of
the body, the legs or arms as it may be, are subjected to
the same force as this wire, which as the fellow keeps
turning you see  strains, and straightens, and strains,
till  crack!  there!  that is what we call a rack. A
most ingenious contrivance and of great use. This is
going up within the hour to the hall of the prefect.'
`It seems,' I remarked, `well contrived indeed for its
object. And what,' I asked, `are these which stand
here? Are they for the same or a similar purpose?'
`Yes  these, sir, are different and yet the same.
They are all for purposes of torture, but they vary
infinitely
in the ingenuity with which they severally inflict
pain and death. That is esteemed in Rome the most
perfect instrument which, while it inflicts the most
exquisite
torments, shall at the same time not assail that
which is a vital part, but you observe prolong life to
the utmost. Some of an old fashioned structure, with
a clumsy and bungling machinery  here are some sent
to me as useless  long before the truth could be
extracted
,
or much more pain inflicted than would
accompany
beheading, destroyed the life of the victim. Those
which I build  and I build for the state  are not to be
complained of in that way. Varus is curious enough I
can assure you in such things. All these that you see
here, of whatever form or make, are for him and the
hall of justice. They have been all refitted and repaired
or else they are new.'
`How is it possible,' I asked, `so many could be
required
in one place?'
`Surely,' said the master, `you must just have dropt
down in Rome from Britain, or Scythia, or the moon.
Didst ever hear of a people called Galilean or Christian?
Perhaps the name is new to you.'
`No, I have heard it.'
`Well, these are for them. As you seem new in the
city and to our Roman ways, walk a little farther in and
I will show you others, which are for the men and the
boys at such time as the slaughter of this people shall
become general. For you must know,  although it is
not got widely abroad yet  that by and by the whole
city is to be let loose upon them. That is the private
plan of the emperor. Every good citizen, it will be
expected
,
will do his share in the work till Rome shall be
purged. Aurelian does nothing by halves. It is in
view of such a state of things that I have prepared an
immense armory  if I may call it so  of every sort of
cheap iron tool  I have the more costly also  to meet
the great demand that will be made. Here they are!
commend now my diligence, my patriotism, and my
foresight! Some of my craft will not engage in this
work: but it exactly jumps with my humor. Any that
you shall choose of these, sir, you shall have cheap, and
they shall be sent to your lodgings.'
I expressed my gratitude, but declined the offer.
After wandering a little longer around the huge
workshop
,
I took my leave of its humane master still
entreating
me to purchase, and as I entered again the
street, turned towards the capitol. My limbs were
sympathising
with those wires throughout the rest of the day.
I had forgotten Macer, and almost my object in coming
abroad, and was revolving various subjects in my mind,
my body only being conscious of the shocks which now
and then I received from persons meeting me or passing
me, when I became conscious of a sudden rush along
the street in the direction of the capitol, which was now
but a furlong from where I was. I was at once awake.
The people began to run, and I ran with them by
instinct
.
At length it came into my mind to ask why we
were running? One near me replied,
`O, it's only Macer the Christian, who 'tis said in
spite of the edict, has just made for the steps of the
capitol
followed by a large crowd.'
On the instant I outstripped my companion and
turning
quickly the corner where the street in which I was
crossed the hill, I there beheld an immense multitude
gathered around the steps of the capitol, and the tall
form of Macer just ascending them. Resolved to be
VOL. II. 10
near him, I struggled and forced my way into the mass
till I found myself so far advanced that I could both hear
and be heard by him, if I should find occasion to speak,
and see the expression of his countenance. It was to
me as he turned round toward the people the most
extraordinary
countenance I ever beheld. It seemed as if
once it had been fiercer than the fiercest beast of the
forest
,
while through that was now to be discerned the deep
traces of grief, and an expression which seemed to say,
I and the world have parted company. I dwell above.
His two lives and his two characters were to be read at
once in the strong and deep-sunk lines of a face that
struck the beholder at once with awe, with admiration,
and compassion.
The crowd was restless and noisy; heaving to and
fro like the fiery mass of a boiling crater. A thousand
exclamations and imprecations filled the air. I thought
it doubtful whether the rage which seemed to fill a great
proportion of those around me would so much as permit
him to open his mouth. It seemed rather as if he would
at once be dragged from where he stood to the Prefect's
tribunal, or hurled from the steps and sacrificed at once
to the fury of the populace. But, as the cries of his
savage enemies multiplied, the voices of another
multitude
were lifted up in his behalf, which were so
numerous
and loud that they had the effect of putting a
restraint
upon the others. It was evident that Macer could
not be assailed without leading to a general combat.
All this while Macer stood unmoved and calm as the
columns of the capitol itself  waiting till the debate
should be ended and the question decided  a question
of life or death to him. Upon the column immediately
on his right hand hung, emblazoned with gold and
beautiful
with all the art of the chirographer, the edict of
Anrelian
.
It was upon parchment within a brazen frame.
Soon as quiet was restored, so that any single voice
could be heard, one who was at the foot of the steps and
near the preacher cried out to him,
`Well, old fellow, begin! thy time is short.'
`Young man,' he replied, `I was once old in sin, for
which God forgive me!  now I am old in the love of
Christ, for which God be thanked!  but in years I am
but forty. As for time!  I think only of eternity.'
`Make haste, Macer,' cried another voice from the
crowd. `Varus will soon be here.'
`I believe you,' replied the soldier; `but I am ready
for him. I love life no longer than I can enjoy free
speech. If I may not now and here speak out every
thought of my heart and the whole truth in Christ, then
would I rather die; and whether I die in my own bed
or upon the iron couch of Varus matters little.
Romans
!'
turning now and addressing the crowd, `the
Emperor
in his edict tells me not to preach to you. Not to
preach Christ in Rome, neither within a church nor in
the streets. Shall I obey him? When Christ says,
`go forth and preach the gospel to every creature,' shall
I give ear to a Roman emperor who bids me hold my
peace? Not so, not so, Romans. I love God too well,
and Christ too well, and you too well, to heed such
bidding
.
I love Aurelian too, I have served long under
him, and he was ever good to me. He was a good as
well as great general, and I loved him. I love him now,
but not so well as these; not so well as you. And if I
obeyed this edict, it would show that I loved him better
than you, and better than these, which would be false.
If I obeyed this edict I should never speak to you again
of this new religion, as you call it. I should leave you
all to perish in your sins without any of that knowledge,
or faith, or hope in Christ which would save you from
them, and form you after the image of God, and after
death carry you up to dwell with him and with just men
forever and ever. I should then, indeed, show that I
hated you, which I can never do. I love you and Rome
I cannot tell how much  as much as a child ever loved
a mother or children one another. And therefore it is
that no power on earth  nor above it nor under it
save that of God, shall hinder me from declaring to you
the doctrine which I think you need, nay, without which
your souls will perish and dwell forever and ever not
with God, but in fires eternal of the lowest hell. For
what can your gods do for you? what are they doing?
They lift you not up to themselves  they push you
down rather to those fires. Christ, O Romans, if you
will receive him, will save you from them, and from
those raging fires of sorrow and remorse which here on
earth do constitute a hell hot as any that burns below.
It is your sins which kindle those fires, and with which
Christ wages war  not with you. It is your sins
against which I wage war here in the streets of Rome.
Only repent of your sins, Romans, and believe in Christ
the son of God, and, O how glorious and happy were
then this great and glorious city. I have told you
before
,
and I tell you now, your vices are undermining the
foundations of this great empire. There is no power to
cure these but in Jesus Christ. And when I know this,
shall I cease to preach Christ to you because a man, a
man like myself, forbids me? Would you not still
prepare
for a friend or a child the medicine that would save
his life though you were charged by another never so
imperiously
to forbear? The gospel is the divine
medicament
that is to heal all your sicknesses, cure all your
diseases, remove all your miseries, cleanse all your
pollutions
,
correct all your errors, confirm within you all
necessary truth. And when it is this healing draught
for which your souls cry aloud, for which they thirst
even unto death, shall I, the messenger of God, sent in
the name of his Son to bear to your lips the cup of which
if you once drink you shall live forever, withhold from
you that cup, or dash it to the ground? Shall I, a
mediator
between God and man falter in my speech, and
my tongue hang palsied in my mouth, because Aurelian
speaks? What to me, O Romans, is the edict of a
Roman
Emperor? Down, down, accursed scrawl! nor
insult
longer both God and man.'
And saying that he reached forth his hand, and
seizing
the parchment wrenched it from its brazen frame
and rending it to shreds strewed them abroad upon
the air.
It was done in the twinkling of an eye. At first,
horror-struck
at the audacity of the deed, and while it was
in the act of performing, the crowd stood still and mute
bereft as it were of all power to move or speak. But
soon as the fragments of the parchment came floating
along upon the air, their senses returned, and the most
violent outcries, curses and savage yells rose from the
assembled multitude, and at the same moment a
movement
was made to rush upon him with the evident
purpose
to sacrifice him on the spot to the offended majesty
VOL. II. 10*
of the empire. I supposed that their purpose would
easily be accomplished, and that whatever I might
attempt
to do in his defence would be no more than a
straw thrown in the face of a whirlwind. But here a
new wonder revealed itself. For no sooner was it
evident
,
from the rage and tumultuous tossings of the crowd
and their ferocious cries, that the last moments of Macer
had arrived, than it was apparent that all in the
immediate
neighborhood of the building on whose steps he
stood were either Christians, or Romans who like
myself
were well disposed towards that people, and would
promptly join them in their defence of Macer. These,
and they amounted to a large and dense mass, at once
as those cries arose sent forth others as shouts of
defiance
,
and facing outwards made it known that none
could assail Macer but by first assailing them. I could
not doubt that it was a preconcerted act by which the
Christian was thus surrounded by his friends  not as I
afterward found with his knowledge, but done at their
own suggestion  so that if difficulty should arise, they
by a show of sufficient power might rescue Macer, whom
all esteemed in spite of his errors, and also serve by
their presence to deter him from any act or the use of
any language that should give needless offence to either
the Prefect or his friends. Their benevolent design was
in part frustrated by the sudden and as it seemed
unpremeditated
movement of Macer in tearing down the
edict. But they still served as a protection against the
immediate assaults of the excited and enraged mob.
But their services were soon ended, by the
interference
of a power with which it was vain to contend. For
when the populace had given over for a moment their
design, awed by the formidable array of numbers about
the person of Macer, he again, having never moved from
the spot where he had stood, stretched out his long arm
as if he would continue what he had scarcely as yet
begun, and to my surprise the people, notwithstanding
what had occurred, seemed not indisposed to hear him.
But just at that moment  just as a deep silence had at
length succeeded the late uproar  the distant sound in
the direction of the Prefect's, of a troop of horse in rapid
movement over the pavements caught the ears of the
people. No one doubted for a moment what it signified.
`Your hour is come, Macer,' cried a voice from the
crowd.
`It can never come too soon,' answered the preacher,
`in the service of God. But remember, Roman citizens,
what I have told you, that it is for you and for Rome,
that I incur the wrath of the wicked Varus, and may so
soon at his hands meet the death of a Christian witness.'
As Macer spoke, the Roman guard swept rapidly
round a corner, and the multitude giving way in every
direction left him alone upon the spot where he had been
standing. Regardless of life and limb the horse dashed
through the flying crowds, throwing down many and
trampling them under foot, till they reached the
Christian
,
who undismayed and fearless maintained his post.
There was little ceremony in their treatment of him.
He was seized by a band of the soldiers, his hands
strongly bound behind him, and placed upon a horse
when wheeling round again the troop at full speed
vanished
down the same avenue by which they had come,
bearing their victim as we doubted not to the tribunal of
Varus.
Determined to see all I could, and the last if it must
be so, of this undaunted spirit, I hastened at my utmost
speed in the wake of the flying troop. Little as I had
heard or seen of this strange man, I had become as
deeply concerned in his fate as any could have been who
had known him more intimately, or believed both in
him and with him. I know not what it was, unless it
were the signatures of sincerity, of child-like sincerity
and truth, stamped upon him that so drew me toward
him; together with that expression of profound sadness,
or rather of inward grief, which, wherever we see it and
in whomsoever, excites our curiosity and engages our
sympathy. He was to me a man who deserved a better
fate than I feared he would meet. He seemed like one
who, under fortunate circumstances, might have been of
the number of those great spirits whose iron will and
gigantic force of character bear down before them all
opposition
and yoke nations to their car. Of fear he
evidently
had no comprehension whatever. The rustling
of the autumn breeze in his gown alarmed him as much,
as did the clang of those horses' hoofs upon the
pavements
,
though he so well knew it was the precursor of
suffering and death.
With all the speed I could use I hurried to the hall of
the Prefect. The crowds were pouring in as I reached
it, among whom I also rushed along and up the flights
of steps, anxious only to obtain an entrance and a post
of observation whence I could see and hear what should
take place. Varus was not yet in his seat: but before
it at some little distance stood Macer, his hands still
bound and a soldier of the palace on either side.
I waited not long before Varus appeared at the
tribunal
and following him and placed near him Fronto
priest of the Temple of the Sun. Now, poor Christian!
I thought within myself, if it go not hard with thee it
will not be for want of those who wish thee ill. The
very Satan of thy own faith was never worse than these.
Fronto's cruel eyes were fixed upon him just as a
hungry
tiger's are upon the unconscious victim upon whom
he is about to spring. Varus seemed as if he sat in his
place to witness some holiday sport, drawing his box of
perfume between his fingers, or daintily adjusting the
folds of his gown. When a few preliminary formalities
were gone through, Varus said, addressing one of the
officials of the place,
`Whom have we here?'
`Noble Prefect, Macer the Christian?'
`And why stands he at my tribunal?' continued
Varus
.
`For a breach of the late edict of the Emperor, by
which the Christians were forbidden to preach either
within their temples or abroad in the streets and squares.'
`Is that all?' asked the Prefect.
`Not only,' it was replied, `hath he preached abroad
in the streets, but he hath cast signal contempt upon
both the Emperor and the empire, in that he hath but
now torn down from its brazen frame the edict which he
had first violated, and scattered it in fragments upon the
streets.'
`If these are so, doubtless he hath well earned his
death. How is this, Galilean? dost thou confess these
crimes, or shall I call in other witnesses of thy guilt?'
`First,' replied Macer, `will it please the Prefect to
have these bonds removed? For the sake of old
fellowship
let them be taken off, that while my tongue is free
to speak, my hands may be free also. Else am I not a
whole man.'
`Unbind them,' said the Prefect; `let him have his
humor. Yet shall we fit on other bracelets anon that
may not sit so easy.'
`Be that as it may,' answered the Christian; `in the
meanwhile I would stand thus. I thank thee for the
grace.'
`Now, Christian, once more if thou art ready. Is it
the truth that hath been witnessed?'
`It is the truth,' replied Macer; `and I thank God
that it is so.'
`But knowest thou, Christian, that in saying that thou
hast condemned thyself to instant death? Was not
death the expressed penalty for violation of that law?'
`Truly it was,' answered Macer; `and what is death
to me?'
`I suppose death to be death,' replied Varus.
`Therein thou showest thyself to be in the same
darkness
as all the rest of this idolatrous city. Death to the
Christian, Prefect, is life! Crush me by thy engines,
and in the twinkling of an eye is my soul dwelling with
God, and looking down with compassion upon thy stony
heart.'
`Verily, Fronto,' said Varus, `these Christians are an
ingenious people. What a wonderful fancy is this!
But, Christian,' turning to Macer, `it were a pity surely
for thee to die. Thou hast a family as I learn. Would
not thy life be more to them than thy death?'
`Less,' said the Christian, `a thousand fold! Were
it not a better vision to them of me crowned with a
victor's
wreath and sitting with Christ, than dwelling here
in this new Sodom, and drinking in its pestilential air?
The sight of me there would be to them a spring of
comfort and a source of strength which here I can
never be.'
`But,' added the Prefect, `it is but right that thou
shouldst for the present, if it may be, live here and take
care of thy family. They will want thee.'
`God,' replied Macer, `who feeds the birds of the air
and through all their wanderings over the earth from
clime to clime still brings them back to the accustomed
home, will watch over those whom I love, and bring
them home. Such, Prefect, are the mercies of Rome
toward
us who belong to Christ, that they will not be left
long to bewail my loss.'
`Do thy family then hold with thee?' said Varus.
`Blessed be God they do.'
`That is a pity ' responded the Prefect.
`Say not so, Varus; 'tis a joy and a triumph to me in
this hour, and to them, that they are Christ's.'
`Still,' rejoined the Prefect, `I would willingly save
thee, and make thee live: and there is one way in which
it may be done, and thou mayest return in joy to thy
family.'
`Let me then know it,' said Macer.
`Renounce Christ, Macer, and sacrifice; and thy life
is thine, and honor too.'
Macer's form seemed to dilate to more than its
common
size, his countenance seemed bursting with
expression
as he said,
`Renounce Christ? save my life by renouncing
Christ? How little, Varus, dost thou know what a
Christian is! Not though I might sit in thy seat or
Aurelian's
,
or on the throne of a new universe, would I
deny my Saviour. To Christ, Varus, do I owe it that
I am not now what I was, when I dwelt in the caves of
the Flavian. To Christ do I owe it that I am not now
what I was when in the ranks of Aurelian. To Christ
do I owe it that my soul, once steeped in sin as thy robe
in purple die, is now by him cleansed and as I trust
thoroughly purged. To Christ do I owe it that once
worshipping the dumb idols of Roman superstition I now
bow down to the only living and invisible God '
`Away with him to the tormentors!' came from an
hundred
voices  `to Christ do I owe it, O Prefect, that my
heart is not now as thine or his who sits beside thee, or
as that of these, hungering and thirsting  never, after
righteousness  but for the blood of the innocent. Shall
I then renounce Christ? and then worship that ancient
adulterer, Jupiter greatest and best? ' The hall here
rang with the ferocious cries of those who shouted
`Give him over to us!'  `To the rack with him!'
`Tear out the tongue of the blaspheming Galilean!'
`Romans,' cried Varus, rising from his chair, `let not
your zeal for the gods cause you to violate the sanctity
of this room of Justice. Fear not but Varus, who as
you well know is a lover of the gods, his country, and
the city, will well defend their rights and honors against
whoever shall assail them.'
He then turned to Macer and said,
`I should ill perform my duty to thee, Christian, did I
spare any effort to bring thee to a better mind  ill should
I perform it for Rome did I not use all the means by the
state entrusted to me to save her citizens from errors
that, once taking root and growing up to their proper
height, would soon overshadow and by their poisonous
neighborhood kill that faith venerable through a
thousand
years, and of all we now inherit from our ancestors
of greatest and best, the fruitful and divine spring.'
`There, Romans! spoke a Roman,' exclaimed Fronto.
As Varus ended  at a sign and a word from him,
what seemed the solid wall of the room in which we
were suddenly flew up upon its screaming pulleys,
and revealed another apartment black as night, save here
and there where a dull torch shed just light enough to
show its great extent, and set in horrid array before us,
engines of every kind for tormenting criminals, each
attended
by its half-naked minister ready at a moment's
warning to bind the victim and put in motion the
infernal
machinery. At this sight a sudden faintness
overspread
my limbs, and I would willingly have rushed
from the hall  but it was then made impossible. And
immediately the voice of the Prefect was again heard:
`Again, Christian, with Rome's usual mercy, I freely
offer to thee thy life, simply on the condition, easily
fulfilled
by thee, for it asks but one little word from thy
lips, that thou do, for thy own sake and for the sake of
Rome which thou sayest thou lovest, renounce Christ
and thy faith.'
`I have answered thee once, O Prefect; dost thou
think so meanly of me as to suppose that what but now
I affirmed I will now deny, and only for this show of
iron toys and human demons set to play them? It is not
of such stuff Aurelian's men are made of, much less the
soldiers of the cross. For the love I bear to Rome and
Christ, and even thee, Varus, I choose to die.'
VOL. II. 11
`Be assured, Christian, I will not spare thee.'
`I ask it not, Prefect; do thy worst  and the worst is
but death, which is life.'
`Pangs that shall keep thee hours dying,' cried the
Prefect  `thy body racked and rent  torn piecemeal
one part from another  this is worse than death.
Bethink
thee well. Do not believe that Varus will relent.'
`That were the last thing to find faith with one who
knows him as well as Macer does,' replied the Christian.
A flush of passion passed over the face of Varus.
But he proceeded in the same even tone.
`Is thy election made, Macer?'
`It is made.'
`Slaves,' cried the Prefect, `away with him to the
rack, and ply it well.'
`Yes,' repeated Fronto, springing with eager haste
from his seat, that he might lose nothing of what was to
be seen or heard, `away with him to the rack, and ply
it well.'
Unmoved and unresisting, his face neither pale nor
his limbs trembling, did Macer surrender himself into
the hands of those horrid ministers of a cruel and bloody
superstition, who then hastily approached him, and
seizing
him dragged him toward their worse than hell.
Accomplished
in their art, for every day is it put to use,
Macer was in a moment thrown down and lashed to the
iron bars; when each demon having completed the
preparation
stood leaning upon his wheel for a last sign from
the Prefect. It was instantly given, and while the breath
even of every being in the vast hall was suspended,
through an intense interest in the scene, the creaking of
the engine as it began to turn sounded upon the brain
like thunder. Not a groan nor a sigh was heard from
the sufferer. The engine turned till it seemed as if any
body or substance laid upon it must have been wrenched
asunder. Then it stopped. And the minutes counted
to me like hours or ages ere the word was given and
the wheels unrestrained flew back again to their places.
Macer was then unbound. He at first lay where he was
thrown upon the pavement. But his life was yet strong
within his iron frame. He rose upon his feet, and was
again led to the presence of his judges. His eye had
lost nothing of its wild fire, nor his air anything of its
lofty independence.
Varus again addressed him.
`Christian, you have felt what there is in Roman
justice
.
Reject not again what Roman mercy again offers
thee  life freely, and honor too, if thou wilt return
once more to the bosom of the fond mother who reared
thee.'
`Yes,' said Fronto `thy mother who reared thee!
Die not with the double guilt of apostacy and
ingratitude
upon thy soul.'
`Varus,' said Macer, `art thou a fool, a very fool, to
deem that thy word can weigh more with me than
Christ? Make not thyself a laughingstock to me and
such Christians as may be here. The torments of thy
importunity are worse to me than those of thy engines.'
`I wish thee well, Macer; 'tis that which makes me
thus a fool.'
`So, Varus, does Satan wish his victim well, to
whom he offers his luscious baits. But what is it when
the bait is swallowed, and hell is all that has been
gained? What should I gain, but to live with thee, O
fool!'
`Think, Macer, of thy wife and children.'
At those names, Macer bent his head and folded his
hands upon his breast, and tears rolled down his cheeks.
Till then there had, as it seemed, been a blessed
forgetfulness
of all but himself and the scene before him. Varus,
misinterpreting this his silence, and taking it for the first
sign of repentance, hastily cried out,
`There is the altar, Macer.  Slave! hold to him the
sacred libation; he will now pour it out.'
Instantly a slave held out to him a silver ladle filled
with wine.
Macer at the same instant struck it with his long arm
and sent it whirling to the ceiling.
`Bind him again to the rack,' cried the Prefect,
leaping
from his seat; `and let him have it till the nerves
break.'
Macer was again seized and stretched upon the iron
frame  this time upon another, of different construction
and greater power. Again the infernal machine was
worked by the ministering servants, and as it was
wound up, inflicting all that it was capable of doing
without absolutely destroying life, groans and screams
of fierce agony broke from the suffering Christian. How
long our ears were assailed by those terrific cries, I
cannot say. They presently died away, as I doubted
not, only because Macer himself had expired under the
torment. When they had wholly ceased, the engine
was reversed and Macer again unbound. He fell
lifeless
upon the floor. Varus, who had sat the while
conversing
with Fronto, now said,
`Revive him, and return him hither.'
Water was then thrown upon him, and powerful
drinks were forced down his throat. They produced in a
little while their intended effect, and Macer gave signs
of returning life. He presently gazed wildly round
him, and came gradually to a consciousness of where
and what he was. His limbs almost refused their office,
and he was supported and partly lifted to the presence
of Varus.
`Now, Galilean,' cried Varus, `how is it with thee?'
`Better than with thee, I trust in God.'
`Wilt thou now sacrifice?'
`I am myself, O Varus, this moment a sacrifice, well
pleasing and acceptable to the God whom I worship and
the Master whom I serve.'
`Why, Varus,' said Fronto, `do we bear longer his
insults and impieties? Let me strike him dead.' And
he moved his hand as if to grasp a concealed weapon
with which to do it.
`Nay, nay, hold, Fronto! let naught be done in haste
or passion, but all calmly and in order. We act for those
who are present as well as for ourselves.'
A voice from a dark extremity of the room shouted
out,
`It is Macer, O Prefect, who acts for us.'
The face of Macer brightened up, as if he had
suddenly
been encompassed by a legion of friends. It was
the first token he had received, that so much as one
heart in the whole assembly was beating with his. He
looked instantly to the quarter whence the voice came,
and then, turning to the Prefect, said,
`Yes, Varus, I am now and here preaching to the
people of Rome, though I speak never a word. 'T is a
sermon that will fall deeper into the heart than ten
thousand spoken ones.'
VOL. II. 11*
The Prefect commanded that he who had spoken
should be brought before him. But upon the most
diligent
search he could not be found.
`Christian,' said Varus, `I have other pains in store,
to which what thou hast as yet suffered is but as the
scratching of the lion's paw. It were better not to suffer
them. They will leave no life in thee. Curse Christ
't is but a word  and live.'
Macer bent his piercing eye upon the Prefect, but
answered
not.
`Curse Christ, and live.'
Macer was still silent.
`Bring in then,' cried the Prefect, `your pincers,
rakes and shells; and we will see what they may have
virtue to bring forth.'
The black messengers of death hastened at the word
from their dark recesses, loaded with those new
instruments
of torture, and stood round the miserable man.
`Now, Macer,' said Varus once more, `acknowledge
Jupiter Greatest and Best, and thou shalt live.'
Macer turned round to the people, and with his
utmost
voice cried out,
`There is, O Romans, but one God; and the God of
Christ is he '
No sooner had he uttered those words than Fronto
exclaimed,
`Ah! hah! I have found thee then! This is the
voice, thrice accursed! that came from the sacred
Temple
of the Sun! This, Romans, is the god whose
thunder
turned you pale!'
`Had it been my voice alone, priest, that was heard
that day, I had been accursed indeed. I was but the
humble instrument of him I serve  driven by his spirit.
It was the voice of God, not of me.'
`These,' said Fronto, `are the Christian devices, by
which they would lead blindfold into their snares you,
Romans, and your children. May Christ ever employ
in Rome a messenger cunning and skillful as this
prating
god, and Hellenism will have naught to fear.'
`And,' cried Macer, `let your priests be but like
Fronto, and the eyes of the blindest driveler of you all
will be unsealed. Ask Fronto into whose bag went the
bull's heart, that on the day of dedication could not be
found '
`Thou liest, Nazarene '
`Ply him with your pincers,' cried Varus,  and the
cruel irons were plunged into his flesh. Yet he shrunk
not  nor groaned; but his voice was again heard in
the midst of the torture,
`Ask him from whose robe came the old and withered
heart, the sight of which so unmanned Aurelian '
`Dash in his mouth,' shrieked Fronto, `and stop those
lies blacker than hell.'
But Macer went on, while the irons tore him in every
part.
`Ask him too for the instructions and the bribes given
to the haruspices, and to those who led the beasts up to
the altar. Though I die, Romans, I have left the proof
of all this in good hands. I stood the while, where I
saw it all.'
`Thou liest, slave,' cried the furious priest; and at the
same moment springing forward and seizing an
instrument
from the hands of one of the tormentors, he struck
it into the shoulder of Macer, and the lacerated arm fell
from the bleeding trunk. A piercing shriek confessed
the inflicted agony.
`Away with him!' cried Varus, `away with him to
the rack, and tear him joint from joint!'
At the word he was borne bleeding away, but not
insensible
nor speechless. All along as he went his voice
was heard calling upon God and Christ, and exhorting
the people to abjure their idolatries.
He was soon stretched again upon the rack, which
now quickly finished its work; and the Christian
Macer
,
after sufferings which I knew not before that the
human
frame could so long endure and live, died a martyr
to the faith he had espoused; the last words which were
heard throughout the hall being these;
`Jesus, I die for thee and my death is sweet!'
When it was announced to the Prefect that Macer
was dead, he exclaimed,
`Take the carcass of the Christian dog and throw it
upon the square of the Jews: there let the dogs
devour
it.'
Saying which, he rose from his seat, and, accompanied
by Fronto, left by the same way he had before entered
the hall of judgment.
Soon as he had withdrawn from the apartment, the
base rabble that had filled it and had glutted their
savage
souls upon the horrors of that scene, cried out
tumultuously
for the body of the Christian, which when
it was gladly delivered to them by those who had already
had enough of it, they thrust hooks into, and rushed
out dragging it toward the place ordained for it by the
Prefect. As they came forth into the streets the mob
increased
to an immense multitude of those who seemed
possessed of the same spirit. And they had not together
proceeded far, filling the air with their cries and uttering
maledictions of every form against the unhappy
Christians
,
before a new horror was proclaimed by that
blood-thirsty
crew. For one of them, suddenly springing up
upon the base of one of the public statues whence he
could be heard by the greater part, cried out,
`To the house of Macer! To the house of Macer!'
`Aye, aye,' shouted another, `to the house of Macer,
in the ruins behind the shop of Demetrius!'
`To the house of Macer!' arose then in one
deafening
shout from the whole throng; and filled with this
new frenzy, maddened like wild beasts at the prospect of
fresh blood, they abandoned there where they had
dragged it the body of Macer, and put new speed into
their feet in their haste to arrive at the place of the
expected
sport. I knew not then where the ruins were, or
it was possible that I might have got in advance of the
mob, and given timely warning to the devoted family.
Neither did I know any to whom to apply to discharge
such a duty. My helplessness and weakness sat upon
me like a nightmare. And while I inwardly mourned
at this, I suffered myself to be borne along with the
rushing
crowd. Their merciless threats, their savage
language
,
better becoming barbarians than a people like this
living in the very centre of civilization, filled me with
an undefinable terror. It seemed to me that within reach
of such a populace, no people were secure of property or
life.
`The Christians,' said one, `have had their day and it
has been a long one, too long for Rome. Let its night
now come.'
`Yes,' said another, `we will all have a hand in
bringing it on. Let every Roman do his share, and they
may be easily rooted out.'
`I understand,' said another, `that it is agreed upon,
that whatever the people attempt after their own
manner
,
as in what we are now about, they are not to be
interfered
with. We are to have free pasturage.'
`Who could suppose,' said the first, `it should be
different
?
It is well known that formerly, though there
has been no edict to the purpose, the people have not
only been permitted, they have been expected, to do
their part of the business without being asked or urged.
I dare say if we can do up this family of  who is it?
`Macer, the Christian Macer.'
`We shall receive the thanks of Aurelian, though
they be not spoken, as heartily as Varus. That was a
tough old fellow though. They say he has served
many years under the Emperor, and when he left the
army was in a fair way to rise to the highest rank.
Curses upon those who made a Christian of him! It
is they, not Varus, who have put him on the rack.
But see! are not those the ruins we seek? I hope so,
for I have run far enough.'
`Yes,' replied his companion; `those are the old
baths! Now for it!'
The crowd thereupon abandoning the streets, poured
itself like an advancing flood among the ruins, filling
all the spaces and mounting up upon all the still
standing
fragments of walls and columns. It was not at all
evident where the house of the Christian was. It all
seemed a confusion of ruins and of dead wall.
`Who can show us,' cried out one who took upon
himself the office of leader, `where the dwelling of
Macer
is?'
`I can,' responded the slender voice of a little boy;
`for I have often been there before they became
Christians
.'
`Show us then, my young urchin; come up hither.
Now, lead the way, and we will follow.'
`You need go no further,' replied the boy; `that
is it.'
`That? It is but a stone wall!'
`Still it is the house,' replied the child; `but the door
is of stone as well as the walls.'
At that the crowd began to beat upon the walls, and
shout to those who were within to come forth. They
had almost wearied themselves out, and were inclined
to believe that the boy had given them a false direction,
when, upon a sort of level roof above the projecting
mass which served as the dwelling, a female form
suddenly
appeared, and, advancing to the edge  not far
above yet beyond the reach of the mob below  she
beckoned to them with her hand, as if she would speak
to them.
The crowd, soon as their eyes caught this new object,
ceased from their tumultuous cries and prepared to hear
what she who approached them thus might have to say.
Some indeed immediately began to hurl missiles, but
they were at once checked by others, who insisted
that she should have liberty to speak. And these
wretches would have been more savage still than I
believed
them, if the fair girl who stood there pleading to
them had not found some favor. Hers was a bright and
sparkling countenance, that at once interested the
beholder
.
Deep blushes spread over her face and bosom,
while she stood waiting the pleasure of the heaving
multitude before her.
`Ah! hah!' cried one; `who is she, but the dancing
girl lia! she is a dainty bit for us. Who would
have thought that she was the daughter of a Christian!'
`I am sorry for her,' cried another; `she is too pretty
to be torn in pieces. We must save her.'
`Say on! say on!' now cried one of the leaders of
the crowd as silence succeeded; `we will hear you.'
`Whom do you seek for?' then asked lia,
addressing
him who had spoken.
`You know well enough, my pretty girl,' replied the
other. `We seek the house and family of Macer the
Christian. Is this it? and are you of his household?'
`This,' she replied, `is the house of Macer, and I am
his daughter. My mother with all her children are
below
.
And now why do you seek us thus?'
`We seek,' replied the savage, `not only you but your
lives. All you have to do is to unbar this door and let
us in.'
Though lia could have supposed that they were
come for nothing else, yet the brutal announcement of
the terrible truth drove the color from her cheeks, and
caused her limbs to tremble. Yet did it not abate her
courage, nor take its energy from her mind.
`Good citizens and friends,' said she, `for I am sure I
must have some friends among you, why should you do
us such wrong? We are poor and humble people, and
have never had the power, if the will had been ours, to
injure you. Leave us in safety, and if you require it
we will abandon our dwelling and even our native
Rome  for we are all native Romans.'
`That, my young mistress, will not serve our turn.
Are you not, as you said, the family of the Christian
Macer?'
`Yes, we are.'
`Well,' answered the hard-hearted wretch, `that is the
reason we seek after you and mean to have you.'
`But,' replied the girl, `there must be many among
you who would not willingly harm either Macer or
anything
that is his. Macer is not only a Christian,
Romans
,
but he is a good warm-hearted patriot as ever
was born within the compass of these walls. Brutus
himself never loved freedom nor hated tyrants more
than he.'
`That's little to the purpose now-a-days,' cried one
from the crowd.
`There is not a single possession he has,' continued
lia, `save only his faith as a Christian, which he
would not surrender for the love he bears to Rome and to
everything that is Roman. Ever since he was strong
enough to draw and wield a sword, has he been
fighting
for you the battles of our country. If you have
seen him, you have seen how cruelly the weapons of
the enemy have hacked him. On every limb are there
scars of wounds received in battle; and twice, once in
Gaul and once in Asia, has he been left for dead upon
the field. It was he who in Syria, when the battle
raged at its highest, and Carinus was suddenly beset by
more than he could cope with, and had else fallen into
their hands a prisoner, or been quickly despatched, that
Macer came up and by his single arm saved his
general
'
`A great pity that,' cried many from the crowd.
VOL. II. 12
`Macer,' continued lia, `only thought that Carinus
then represented Rome, and that his life, whatever it
was and however worthless in itself, was needful for
Rome, and he threw himself into the breach even as he
would have done for Aurelian or Probus. Was not his
virtue the greater for that? Was he to feed his own
humor, and leave Carinus to perish, when his country
by that might receive detriment? Macer has never
thought of himself. Had he been ambitious as some,
he had now been where Mucapor is. But when in the
army he always put by his own interests. The army,
its generals and Rome were all in all with him.
Himself
nothing. How, citizens, can you wish to do him
harm? or anything that is his? And even as a
Christian
for which you reproach him and now seek him
it is still the same. Believe me when I say, that it is
because of his love of you and Rome that he would
make you all as he is. He honestly thinks that it is
the doctrine of Christ, which can alone save Rome from
the destruction which her sins are drawing down upon
her. He has toiled from morning to night, all day and
all night  harder than he ever did upon his marches
either in Africa or in Asia  that you might be made
to know what this religion of Christ is; what it means;
what it will bestow upon you if you will receive it; and
what it will save you from. And he would not scruple
to lose his life, if by so doing he could give any greater
efficacy to the truth in which he believes. I would he
were here now, Romans, to plead his own cause with
with you. I know you would so esteem his honesty,
and his warm Roman heart, that you would be more
ready to serve than to injure him.'
Pity stood in some eyes, but impatience and anger in
more.
`Be not so sure of that,' cried he who had spoken
before
.
`No true Roman can love a Christian.
Christians
are the worst enemies of the state. As for
Macer
,
say no more of him; he is already done for. All
you have to do is to set open the door.'
`What say you of Macer?' cried the miserable girl,
wringing her hands. `Has any evil befallen him?'
`What he will never recover from,' retorted the
barbarian
.
`Varus has just had him on one of his iron
playthings, and his body we have but now left in the
street yonder. So hasten.'
`O worse than demons to kill so good a man,' cried
lia, the tears rolling down her cheeks. `But if he is
dead, come and take us too. We wish not now to live;
and ready as he was to die for Christ, so ready are we
also. Cease your blows; and I will open the door.'
But her agency in that office was no longer needed.
A huge timber had been brought in the meantime from
the ruins, and plied by an hundred hands with noisy
uproar, the stone door soon gave way, just as lia
descended
and the murderous crew rushed in.
The work of death was in part quickly done. The
sons of Macer, who, on the uproar, had instantly joined
their mother in spite of all the entreaties of Demetrius,
were at once despatched, and dragged forth by ropes
attached
to their feet. The two youngest, transfixed by
spears, were seen borne aloft as bloody standards of that
murderous rout. The mother and the other children,
placed in a group in the midst of the multitude, were
made to march on, the savages themselves being divided
as to what should be their fate. Some cried out, `To
the Tiber!'  some, `Crucify them beyond the walls!'
others, `Give 'em the pavements!' But the voice of
one more ingenious in cruelty than the rest prevailed.
`To the square by Hanno's with them!'
This proposition filled them with delight.
`To Hanno's! to Hanno's!' resounded on all sides.
And away rushed the infuriated mass to their evil
sport.
`And who is Hanno?' I asked of one near me.
`Hanno? know you not Hanno? He is brother of
Sosia the gladiator, and breeds dogs for the theatres.
You shall soon see what a brood he will turn out.
There is no such breeder in Rome as he.'
Sick at heart as I was, I still pressed on, resolved to
know all that Christian heroism could teach me. We
were soon at the square, capable of holding on its
borders
not only thousands but tens of thousands, to which
number it seemed as if the throng had now
accumulated
.
Hanno's extensive buildings and grounds were
upon one side of the square, to which the people now
rushed, calling out for the great breeder to come forth
with his pack.
He was not slow in obeying the summons. He himself
appeared, accompanied, as on the day when Piso saw him
on the Capitol Hill, by his two dogs Nero and Sylla. After
first stipulating with the ringleaders for a sufficient
remuneration
,
he proceeded to order the game. He was
at first for separating the victims, but they implored to be
permitted to suffer together, and so much mercy was
shown them. They were then set together in the centre
of the square, while the multitude disposed themselves
in an immense circle around  the windows of the
buildings
and the roofs of all the neighboring dwellings being
also
thronged with those who both looked on and applauded.
Before the hounds were let loose, Hanno approached this
little band, standing there in the midst and clinging to
one another, and asked them,
`If they had anything to say, or any message to
deliver
,
for he would faithfully perform what they might
enjoin.'
The rest weeping, lia answered, `that she wished
to say a few words to the people who stood around.'
`Speak then,' replied Hanno, `and you shall not be
disturbed.'
She then turned toward the people, and said, `I can
wish you Romans, before I die, no greater good than
that, like me and those who are with me, you may one
day become Christians. For you will then be incapable
of inflicting such sufferings and wrongs upon any
human
being. The religion of Jesus will not suffer you
to do otherwise than love each other as you do
yourselves
;
that is the great Christian rule. Be assured
that we now die, as Christians, in full faith in Christ
and in joyful hope of living with him, so soon as these
mortal bodies shall have perished; and that though a
single word of denial would save us, we would not speak
it. Ye have cruelly slaughtered the good Macer; do
so now by us, if such is your will, and we shall then be
with him where he is.'
With these words she again turned, and throwing her
arms around her mother and younger sisters awaited the
onset of the furious dogs, whose yellings and strugglings
VOL. II. 12*
could all the while be heard. She and they waited but
a moment, when the bloodhounds, fiercer than the fiercest
beasts of the forest, flew from their leashes, and in less
time than would be believed naught but a heap of bones
marked where the Christian family had stood.
The crowds, then fully sated as it seemed with the
rare sport of the morning, dispersed, each having
something
to say to another of the firmness and patriotism of
Varus and Fronto,  and of the training and behavior
of the dogs.
From the earliest period of reflection have I detested
the Roman character; and all that I have witnessed
with my own eyes has served but to confirm those early
impressions. They are a people wholly destitute of
humanity
.
They are the lineal descendants of robbers,
murderers, and warriors  who are but murderers under
another name  and they show their parentage in every
line of their hard-featured visages, and still more in all
the qualities of the soul. They are stern,  unyielding,
unforgiving  cruel. A Roman heart dissected would
be found all stone. Any present purpose of passion, or
ambition, or party zeal, will extinguish in the Roman all
that separates him from the brute. Bear witness to the
truth of this, ye massacres of Marius and Sylla! and
others, more than can be named, both before and since
when the blood of neighbors, friends, and fellow-citizens,
was poured out as freely as if it had been the filthy
stream that gurgles through the public sewers! And, in
good sooth, was it not as filthy? For those very ones so
slain, had the turn of the wheel set them uppermost,
would have done the same deed upon the others. Happy
is it for the peace of the earth and the great cause of
humanity
,
that this faith of Christ, whether it be true or
false, is at length bearing sway, and doing somewhat to
soften, what more than twelve centuries have passed
over and left in its original hardness.
When, like the rest of that Roman mob, I had been
filled with the sights and sounds of the morning, I turned
and sought the palace of Piso.
Arriving there I found Portia, Julia and Piso sitting
together at the hour of dinner. I sat with them. Piso
had not left the palace since I had parted from him.
They had remained at peace within, and as ignorant of
what had happened in Rome as we all were of what was
doing in another planet. When, as the meal drew to a
close I had related to them the occurrences of which I
had just been the witness, they could scarce believe what
they heard, though it was but what they and all had
every
reason to look for from the language which Aurelian
had used, and the known hostility of the Perfect.
Portia
,
the mother, was moved more, if it could be so, than
even Piso or Julia. When I had ended she said,
`Think not, Nichomachus, that although, as thou
knowest, I am of Aurelian's side in religion, I
defend
these inhuman wrongs. To inflict them can make
no part of the duty of any worshiper of the gods,
however
zealous he may be. I do not believe that the gods
are propitiated by any acts which occasion suffering to
their creatures. I have seen no justification under any
circumstances of human sacrifices  much less can I see
any of sacrifices like those you have this morning
witnessed
.
Aurelian, in authorizing or conniving at such
horrors, has cut himself loose from the honor and the
affections
of all those in Rome whose esteem is worth
possessing
.
He has given himself up to the priesthood,
and to the vulgar rabble over whom it exercises a sway
more strict than an Eastern despot. He has by these
acts turned the current of the best Roman sympathy
toward the Christians, and put off by a long remove the
hour when he might hope to see the ancient religion of
the state delivered from its formidable rival.'
`It is the purpose of Aurelian,' I said, `not so much
to persecute and annoy the Christians, as to exterminate
them. He is persuaded that by using the same extreme
and summary measures with the Christians, which he has
been accustomed to employ in the army, he can root out
this huge evil from the state, as easily as those lesser ones
from the camp;  without reflecting that it must be
impossible
to discover all, or any very large proportion of
those who profess Christianity, and that therefore his
slaughter of a half or a quarter of the whole number,
will be to no purpose. It will have been but killing so
many  there will be no other effect; unless indeed it
have the effect to convince new thousands of the power,
and worth, and divinity of that faith, for which men are
so willing to die.'
`I mourn,' said Portia, `that the great head of the
state, and the great high priest of our religion should
have taken the part he has. Measures of moderation
and true wisdom, though they might not have obtained
for him so great a name for zeal and love of the gods,
nor made so sudden and deep an impression upon the
common mind and heart, would have secured with
greater
probability the end at which he has aimed.'
`It is hard,' said I, `to resist nature, especially so
when superstition comes in to its aid. Aurelian, by
nature
a savage, is doubly one through the influence of his
religion and the priesthood. Moderation and humanity
are so contrary to every principle of the man and his
faith, that they are not with more reason to be looked for
from him than gentleness in a half-starved tiger.'
Portia looked as if I had assailed the walls and capitol
of Rome.
`I know not, Greek,' she quickly said, `on what
foundation
it is you build so heavy a charge against the
time-honored
faith of Rome. It has served Rome well these
thousand years, and reared men whose greatness will
dwell in the memory of the world while the world lasts.'
`Great men have been reared in Rome,' I replied; `it
can by none be denied. But it has been by resisting
the influences of their religion, not by courting them.
They have left themselves in this to the safer tutelage
of nature, as have you, lady; and they have escaped the
evils, which the common superstition would have
entailed
upon them, had they admitted it to their bosoms.
Who can deny that the religion of Rome, so far as it is
a religion for the common people, is based upon the
characters of the gods, as they through history and
tradition are held up to them  especially as they are
painted by the poets? Say if there be any other books
of authority on this great theme than the poets? What
book of religious instruction and precept have you, or
have you ever had, corresponding to the volume of the
Christians, called their gospels?'
`We have none,' said Portia, as I paused compelling
a rejoinder. `It is true, we have but our historians and
our poets, with what we find in the philosophers.'
`And the philosophers,' I replied, `it will be seen at
once, can never be in the hands of the common people.
Whence then do they receive their religious ideas, but
from tradition, and the character of the deities of heaven,
as they are set forth in the poets? And if this be so, I
need not ask whether it be possible that the religion of
Rome should be any other than a source of corruption
to the people. So far as the gods should be their
models
,
they can do no otherwise than help to sink their
imitators
lower and lower in all filth and vice. Happily
for Rome and the world, lady, men instinctively revolt
at such examples, and copy instead the pattern which
their own souls supply. Had the Romans been all which
the imitation of their gods would have made them, this
empire had long ago sunk under the deep pollution.
Fronto and Aurelian  the last at least sincere  aim at
a restoration of religion. They would lift it up to the
highest place, and make it the sovereign law of Rome.
In this attempt, they are unconsciously digging away
her very foundations; they are leveling her proud walls
with the earth. Suppose Rome were made what Fronto
would have her? Every Roman were then another
Fronto  or another Aurelian. Were that a world to
live in? or to endure? These, lady, are the enemies of
Rome, Aurelian and Fronto. The only hope for Rome
lies in the reception of some such principles as these of
the Christians. Whether true or false, they are in
accordance
with the best part of our nature, and, once
spread abroad and received, they would tend by a mighty
influence to exalt it more and more. They would
descend
,
as it is of the nature of absolute truth to do, and
lay hold of the humblest and lowest and vilest, and in
them erect their authority, and bring them into the state,
in which every man should be, for the reason that he is
a man. Hellenism cannot do this.'
`Notwithstanding what I have heard, Nichomachus,
I think you must yourself be a Christian. But whether
you are or not, I grant you to understand well what
religion
should be. And I must say that it has ever been
such to me. I, from what I have read of our moralists
and philosophers, and from what I have reflected, have
arrived at principles not very different from such as you
have now hinted at '
`And are those of Fronto or Varus like yours, lady?'
`I fear not,' said Portia.
`Yours then, let me say, are the religion, which you
have first found within your own breast, a gift from the
gods, and then by meditation have confirmed and exalted;
theirs, the common faith of Rome. Could your faith
rejoice in or permit the horrors I have this day
witnessed
and but now described? Yet of theirs they are
the legitimate fruit, the necessary product.'
`Out of the best,' replied Portia, `I believe,
Nichomachus
,
may often come the worst. There is naught
so perfect and so wise, but human passions will mar and
pervert it. I should not wonder if, in ages to come,
this peace-loving faith of the Christians, should it
survive
so long, should itself come to preside over scenes
as full of misery and guilt as those you have to-day
seen in the streets of Rome.'
`It may be,' I rejoined. `But it is nevertheless our
duty, in the selection of our principles, to take those
which are the purest, the most humane, the most
accordant
with what is best in us, and the least liable to
perversion
and abuse. And whether, if this be just, it be
better
that mankind should have presented for their
imitation
and honor the character and actions of Jesus Christ,
or those of Jupiter Greatet and Best, may be left for
the simplest to determine.'
Portia is so staunch a Roman, that one cannot doubt
that as she was born and has lived, so she will die  a
Roman. And truth to say, were all like her, there
were little room for quarrel with the principles that
could produce such results. But for one such, there
are a thousand like Varus, Fronto, and Aurelian.
As after this interview, which was prolonged till the
shades of evening began to fall, I held communion with
myself on the way to the quiet retreats of Tibur, I could
not but entertain apprehensions for the safety of the
friends I had just left. I felt that where such men as
Varus and Fronto were at the head of affairs, wielding
almost as they pleased the omnipotence of Aurelian, no
family nor individual of whatever name or rank could
feel secure of either fortune or life. I had heard
indeed
such expressions of regard fall from the Emperor
for Piso and his beautiful wife, that I was sure that if
any in Rome might feel safe, it was they. Yet why
should he, who had fallen upon one of his own
household
,
and such a one as Aurelia, hesitate to strike the
family of Piso, if thereby the religion or the state were
to be greatly benefited? I could see a better chance
for them only in the Emperor's early love of Julia,
which still seemed to exercise over him a singular
power.
The Queen, I found, upon naming to her the subject
of my thoughts, could entertain none of my
apprehensions
.
It is so difficult for her nature to admit the
faintest purpose of the infliction of wanton suffering,
that she cannot believe it of others. Notwithstanding
her experience of the harsh and cruel spirit of Aurelian,
notwithstanding the unnecessary destruction, for any
national or political object, of the multitudes of
Palmyra
,
still she inclines to confide in him. He has given
so many proofs of regret for that wide ruin, he has
suffered
so much for it  especially for his murder of
Longinus
in the opinion of all Rome, and of the highest
and best in all nations, that she is persuaded, he will
be more cautious than ever whom he assails, and
where he scatters ruin and death. Still, such is her
devotion
to Julia and her love of Piso  so entirely is her
very life lodged in that of her daughter, that she resolved
to seek the Emperor without delay, and if possible
obtain an assurance of their safety, both from his own
arm and that of popular violence. This I urged upon
her with all the freedom I might use; and not in
vain; for the next day, at the gardens of Sallust, she
had repeated interviews with Aurelian  and afterward
at her own palace, whither Aurelian came with Livia,
and where, while Livia ranged among the flowers with
Faustula, the Emperor and the Queen held earnest
discourse
not only on the subject which chiefly agitated
Zenobia, but on the general principles on which he was
proceeding in this attempted annihilation of
Christianity
.
Sure I am, that never in the Christian body itself
was there one who pleaded their cause with a more
winning and persuasive eloquence.
VOL. II. 13
LETTER X.
FROM PISO TO FAUSTA.
I write
to you, Fausta, by the hands of Vabalathus,
who visits Palmyra on his way to his new kingdom. I
trust you will see him. The adversities of his family
and the misfortunes of his country have had most
useful
effects upon his character. He has, though the time
has been so short, done much to redeem himself.
Always
was he indeed vastly superior to his brothers;
but now, he is not only that, but very much more.
Qualities have unfolded themselves, and affections and
tastes warmed into life, which we none of us I believe
so much as suspected the existence of. Zenobia has
grown to be devotedly attached to him and to repose
the same sort of confidence in him as formerly in Julia.
All this makes her the more reluctant to part with him;
but as it is for a throne, she acquiesces. He carries
away from Rome with him one of its most beautiful
and estimable women  the youngest daughter of the
venerable Tacitus  to whom he has just been married.
In her you will see an almost too favorable specimen of
Roman women.
Several days have elapsed since I wrote to you,
giving
an account of the sufferings and death of the
Christian
Macer  as I learned them from those who were
present  for a breach of the late edicts, and for
sacrilegiously
,
as the laws term it, tearing down the
parchment
containing them from one of the columns of the
capitol. During this period other horrors of the same
kind have been enacted in different parts of the city.
Macer is not the only one who has already paid for his
faith with his life. All the restraints of the law seem
to be withdrawn, not confessedly, but virtually, and the
Christians in humble condition  and such for the most
part we are  are no longer safe from violence in the
streets of Rome. Although, Fausta, you believe not
with us, you must scarcely the less for that pity us in
our present straits. Can the mind picture to itself in
some aspects of the case a more miserable lot? Were
the times even at the worst so full of horror in Palmyra
as now here in Rome? There, if the city were given
up to pillage, the citizen had at least the satisfaction of
dying in the excitement of a contest, and in the defence
of himself and his children. Here the prospect is  the
actual scene is almost arrived and present  that all the
Christians of Rome will be given over to the butchery,
first of the Prefect's court, and others of the same
character
established throughout the city for the exprss
purpose of trying the Christians  and next, to that of
the mob commissioned with full powers to search out,
find, and slay all who bear the hated name. The
Christians, it is true, die for a great cause. In that
cause they would rather die than live. But still death
is not preferred  much less is death, in the revolting
and agonizing form which chiefly these voluntary
executioners
choose, to be viewed in any other light than
an evil too great almost to be endured.
It would astonish you I think, and give you
conceptions
of the power of this religion such as you have
never had as yet, could you with me look into the
bosom
of these thousand Christian families, and behold
the calmness and the fortitude with which they await
the approaching calamities. There is now as they
believe
little else before them but death  and death such
as a foretaste has been given of in the sufferings of
Macer
.
Yet are they, with wonderfully few exceptions,
here in their houses prepared for whatever may betide,
and resolved that they will die for him unto whom they
have lived. This unshrinking courage, this spirit of
self-sacrifice, is the more wonderful as it is now the
received
belief that they would not forfeit their Christian
name or hope by withdrawing, before the storm bursts,
from the scene of danger.
There have been those in the church, and some there
are now, who would have all who in time of persecution
seek safety in flight or by any form of compromise,
visited
with the severest censures the church can inflict,
and forever after refused readmission to the
privileges
which they once enjoyed. Paying no regard to
the peculiar temperament and character of the
individual
,
they would compel all to remain fixed at their
post, inviting by a needless ostentation of their name
and faith the search and assault of the enemy. Macer
was of this number. Happily they are now few: and
the Christians are left free  free from the constraint of
any tyrant opinion, to act according to the real feeling
of the heart. But does this freedom carry them away
from Rome? Does it show them to the world
hurryrying
in crowds by day, or secretly flying by night,
from the threatened woes? Not so. All who were
here when these troubles first began, are here now, or
with few and inconsiderable exceptions  fewer than I
could wish. All who have resorted to me under these
circumstances for counsel or aid have I advised, if flight
be a possible thing to them, that they should retreat
with their children to some remote and secluded spot,
and wait till the tempest shall have passed by.
Especially
have I so advised and urged all whom I have
known to be of a sensitive and timid nature, or bound
by ties of more than common interest and necessity to
large circles of relatives and dependents. I have aimed
to make them believe, that little gain would accrue to
the cause of Christ from the addition of them and their's
to the mass of sufferers  when that mass is already so
large; whereas great and irreparable loss would follow
to the community of their friends and of the Christians
who should survive. They would do an equal service
to Christ and his church by living, and on the first
appearance
of calmer times reassuming their Christian
name and profession, and being a centre about which
there might gather together a new multitude of
believers
.
If still the enemies of Christ should prevail, and a
day of rest never dawn nor arise, they might then, when
hope was dead, come forth and add themselves to the
innumerable company of those born of Heaven, who
hold life and all its joys and comforts as dross in
comparison
with the perfect integrity of the mind. By such
statements have I prevailed with many. Probus too
has exerted his power in the same direction, and has
enjoyed the happiness of seeing safely embarked for
Greece, or Syria, many whose lives in the coming years
will be beyond price to the then just-surviving church.
Yet do not imagine, Fausta, that we are an
immaculate
VOL. II. 13*
people; that the weaknesses and faults which seem
universal to mankind, are not to be discovered in us;
that we are all, what by our acknowledged principles we
ought to be. We have our traitors and our renegades,
our backsliders, and our well-dissembling hypocrites
but so few are they, that they give us little disquiet, and
bring no discredit upon us with the enemy. And beside
these there will now be those, as in former persecutions,
who as the day of evil approaches will, through the
operation
simply of their fears, renounce their name and
faith. Of the former, some have already made
themselves
conspicuous  conspicuous now by their cowardly
and hasty apostacy, as they were before by a narrow,
contentious and restless zeal. Among others, the very
one who, on the evening when the Christians assembled
in the baths by Macer's, was so forward to assail the
faith of Probus, and who ever before on other occasions,
when a display could by any possibility be made of
devotion
to his party, or an ostentatious parade of his love
of Christ, was always thrusting himself upon the notice
of our body and clamoring for notoriety, has already
abandoned us and sought safety in apostacy. Others of
the same stamp have in like manner deserted us. They
are neither lamented by us nor honored by the other
party. It is said of him whom I have just spoken of,
that soon as he had publicly renounced Christ and
sacrificed
,
hisses and yells of contempt broke from the
surrounding
crowds. He, doubtless it occurred to them,
who had so proved himself weak, cowardly, and
faithless
,
to one set of friends, could scarcely be trusted as
brave and sincere by those to whom he then joined
himself
.
There are no virtues esteemed by the Romans like
courage and sincerity. This trait in their character is
greatly in our favor. For much as they detest our
superstitions
,
they so honor our fortitude under suffering,
that a deep sympathy springs up almost unconsciously
in our behalf. Half of those who on the first outbreak
of these disorders would have been found bitterly hostile,
if their hearts could be scanned now or when this storm
shall have passed by, would be found most warmly with
us  not in belief, but in a fellow-feeling which is its
best preparation and almost certain antecedent. Even
in such an inhuman rabble as perpetrated the savage
murder of the family of Macer, there were thousands
who, then driven on by the fury of passion, will, as soon
as reflection returns, bear testimony in a wholly altered
feeling toward us, to the power with which the
miraculous
serenity and calm courage of those true martyrs
have wrought within them. No others are now spoken
of in Rome, but Macer and his heroic wife and children.
Throughout the city it is this morning current that
new edicts are to be issued in the course of the day.
Milo, returning from some of his necessary excursions
into the more busy and crowded parts of the city, says
that it is confidently believed. I told him that I could
scarcely think it, as I had reason to believe that the
Emperor
had engaged that they should not be as yet.
`An Emperor surely,' said Milo, `may change his
mind if he lists. He is little better than the rest of us
if he have not so much power as that. I think if I were
Emperor that would be my chief pleasure, to do and say
one thing to-day and just the contrary thing to-morrow,
without being obliged to give a reason for it. If there
be anything that makes slavery it is this rendering a
reason. In the service of the most noble Gallienus, fifty
slaves were subject to me, and never was I known to
render a reason for a single office I put them to. That
was being nearer an Emperor than I fear I shall ever be
again.'
`I hope so, Milo,' I said. `But what reason have you
to think, if you will render a reason, that Aurelian has
changed his mind?'
`I have given proof,' answered Milo, `have I not, that
if anything is known in Rome, it is known by Curio?'
`I think you have shown that he knows some things.'
`He was clearly right about the sacrifices,' responded
Milo, `as events afterwards declared. Just as many
suffered
as he related to me. What now he told me this
morning was this; that certain persons would find
themselves mistaken  that some knew more than
others
that the ox led to the slaughter knew less than the
butcher  that great persons trusted not their secrets to
every one  emperors had their confidants  and Fronto
had his.'
`Was that all?' I patiently asked.
`I thought, noble sir,' he replied `that it was  for
upon that he only sagaciously shook his head and was
silent. However, as I said nothing, knowing well that
some folks would die if they retained a secret, though
they never would part with it for the asking, Curio
began
again, soon as he despaired of any question from
me, and said he could tell me what was known but to
three persons in Rome. His wish was that I should
ask him who they were, but I did not, but began a new
bargain with a man for his poultry  we were in the
market. He then began himself and said, Who think
you they were? But I answered not. Who, he
then whispered in my ear, but Aurelian, Fronto, and
myself! Then I gratified him by asking what the
secret
was, for if it had anything to do with the Christians
I should like to know it. I will tell it to thee, he said,
but to no other in Rome, and to thee only on the
promise
that it goes in at thy ear but not out at thy mouth.
I said that I trusted that I, who had kept, I dared hardly
say how many years and kept them still, the secrets of
Gallienus, should know how to keep and how to reveal
anything he had to say. Whereupon without any more
reserve, he assured me that Fronto had persuaded the
Emperor to publish new and more severe edicts before
the sixth hour, telling him as a reason for it, that the
Christians were flying from Rome in vast numbers;
that every night  they having first passed the gates in
the day, multitudes were hastening into the country
making for Gaul and Spain, or else embarking in vessels
long prepared for such service on the Tiber  that
unless
instantly arrested there would be none or few for
the edicts to operate upon, and then, when all had
become
calm again, and he  Aurelian  were dead and
another less pious upon the throne, they would all
return
and Rome swarm with them as before. Curio
said that when the Emperor heard this, he broke out
into a wild and furious passion. He swore by the great
god of light  which is an oath Curio says he never uses
but he keeps  that you, sir, Piso, had deceived him
had cajoled him; that you had persuaded him to
wait and hear what the Christians had to say for
themselves
before they were summarily dealt with, which he
had consented to do, but which he now saw was a
device
to gain time by which all or the greater part might
escape secretly from the capital. He then, with Fronto
and the secretaries, prepared and drew up new edicts,
declaring every Christian an enemy of the state and of
the gods, and requiring them everywhere to be informed
against, and upon conviction of being Christians, to be
thrown into prison and await there the judgment of the
Emperor. These things, sir, are what I learned from
Curio, which I make no secret of, for many reasons. I
trust you will believe them, for I heard the same story
all along the streets, and mine is better worthy of belief
only because of where and whom it comes from.'
I told Milo that I could not but suppose there was
something in it, as I had heard the rumor from several
other sources; that if Curio spoke the truth, it was worse
than I had apprehended.
Putting together what was thus communicated by
Milo, and what, as he said, was to be heard anywhere
in the streets, I feared that some dark game might
indeed
be playing by the priest against us, by which our
lives might be sacrificed even before the day were out.
`Should you not,' said Julia, `instantly seek Aurelian?
If what Milo has said possess any particle of truth, it is
most evident the Emperor has been imposed upon by
the lies of Fronto. He has cunningly used his
opportunities
:
and you, Lucius, except he be instantly
undeceived
,
may be the first to feel his power.'
While she was speaking, Probus, Felix, and others
of the principal Christians of Rome entered the
apartment
.
Their faces and their manner, and their first
words, declared that the same convinction possessed them
as us.
`We are constrained,' said Felix, `thus with little
ceremony, noble Piso, to intrude upon your privacy.
But in truth the affair we have come upon admits not of
ceremony or delay.'
`Let there be none then I pray, and let us hear at
once what concerns us all.'
`It is spread over the city,' replied the bishop, `that
before the sixth hour edicts are to be issued that will go
to the extreme we have feared  affecting the liberty
and life of every Christian in Rome. We find it hard
to believe this however, as it is in the face of what
Aurelian
has most expressly stipulated. It is therefore the
wish and prayer of the Christians that you, being nearer
to him than, any should seek an interview with him,
and then serve our cause in such manner and by such
arguments as you best can.'
`This is what we desire, Piso,' said they all.
I replied, that I would immediately perform that which
they desired, but that I would that some other of our
number should accompany me. Whereupon Felix was
urged to join me; and consenting we, at the moment
departed for the palace of Aurelian.
On arriving at the gardens, it was only by urgency
that I obtained admission to the presence of the
Emperor
.
But upon declaring that I came upon an errand
that nearly concerned himself and Rome, I was ordered
to be brought into his private apartment.
As I entered, Aurelian quickly rose from the table at
which he had been sitting, on the other side of which
sat Fronto. None of the customary urbanity was visible
in his deportment; his countenance was dark and
severe
,
his reception of me cold and stately, his voice more
harsh and bitter than ever. I could willingly have
excused
the presence of the priest.
`Ambassadors,' said Aurelian inclining toward us, `I
may suppose from the community of Christians.'
`We came at their request,' I replied; `rumors are
abroad through the city, too confidently reported, and
too generally credited to be regarded as wholly
groundless
,
yet which it is impossible for those who know
Aurelian
to believe, asserting that to-day edicts are to be
issued affecting both the liberty and the lives of the
Christians '
`I would, Piso, that rumor were never farther from
the truth than in this.'
`But,' I rejoined, `has not Aurelian said that he would
proceed against them no further till he had first heard
their defence from their own organs?'
`Is it one party only in human affairs, young Piso,'
he sharply replied, `that must conform to truth and keep
inviolate a plighted word? Is deception no vice when
it is a Christian who deceives? I indeed said that I
would hear the Christians, though, when I made that
promise, I also said that 'twould profit them nothing;
but I then little knew why it was that Piso was so
urgent
.'
`Truth,' I replied, `cannot be received from some
quarters, any more than sweet and wholesome water
through poisoned channels. Even, Aurelian, if Fronto
designed not to mislead, no statement passing through
his lips  if it concerned the Christians  could do so,
without there being added to it or lost from it much that
properly belonged to it. I have heard that too, which I
may suppose has been poured into the mind of Aurelian
to fill it with a bitterer enmity still toward the Christians
that the Christians have sought this delay only that
they might use the opportunities thus afforded, to escape
from his power  and that using them they have already
in the greater part fled from the capitol, leaving to the
Emperor of all the world but a few old women and
children
upon whom to wreak his vengeance. How does
passion bring its film over the clearest mind! How
does the eye that will not see, shut out the light though
it be brighter than that of day! It had been wiser in
Aurelian, as well as more merciful, first to have tried the
truth of what has thus been thrust upon his credulity,
ere he made it a ground of action. True himself, he
suspects not others; but suspicion were sometimes a
higher virtue than frank confidence. Had Aurelian but
looked into the streets of Rome, he could not but have
seen the grossness of the lie that has been palmed upon
his too willing ear. Of the seventy thousand Christians
who dwelt in Rome, the same seventy thousand, less by
scarce a seventieth part, are now here within their
dwellings
waiting the will of Aurelian. Take this on the
word of one whom, in former days at least, you have
found worthy of your trust. Take it on the word of the
venerable head of this community who stands here to
confirm it either by word or oath  and in Rome it
needs but to know that Felix the Christian has spoken,
to know that truth has spoken too.'
`The noble Piso,' added Felix `has spoken what all
who know aught of the affairs and condition of the
Christians know to be true. There is among us, great
Emperor, too much, rather than too little, of that courage
that meets suffering and death without shrinking. Let
VOL. II. 14
your proclamations this moment be sounded abroad
calling
upon the Christians to appear for judgment upon
their faith before the tribunals of Rome, and they will
come flocking up as do your Pagan multitudes to the
games of the Flavian.'
While we had been speaking, Fronto sat,
inattentive
as it seemed to what was going on. But at these
last words he was compelled to give ear, and did it as a
man does who has heard unwelcome truths. As Felix
ended, the Emperor turned toward him without
speaking
and without any look of doubt or passion, waiting
for such explanation as he might, have to give.
Fronto rose from his seat with the air of a man who
doubts not the soundness of his cause, and who feels
sure of the ear of his judge.
`I will not say, great Emperor, that I have not in my
ardor made broader the statements which I have
received
from others. It is an error quite possible to have
been guilty of. My zeal for the gods is warm and
ofttimes
outruns the calm dictates of reason. But if what
has now been affirmed as true, be true, it is more I
believe
than they who so report can make good  or than
others can, be they friends or enemies of this tribe. Who
shall now go out into this wilderness of streets, into the
midst of this countless multitude of citizens and strangers
men of all religions and all mannersand pick me out
the seventy thousand Christians, and show that all are
snug at home? Out of the seventy thousand is it not
palpable that its third or half may have fled, and yet it
shall be in no man's power to make it so appear  to
point to the spot whence they have departed, or to that
whither they have gone? But beside this, I must here
and now confess, that it was upon no knowledge of my
own gathered by my own eyes and ears that I based the
truth, now charged as error; but upon what came to me
through those in whose word I have ever placed the
most sacred trust, the priests of the temple, and more
than all my faithful servant  friend I may call him
Curio, into whom drops by some miracle all that is
strange or new in Rome.'
I said in reply, `that it were not so difficult perhaps
as the priest has made it seem, to learn what part of the
Christians were now in Rome and what part were gone.
There are among us, Aurelian, in every separate
church, men who discharge duties corresponding to
those which Fronto performs in the Temple of the Sun.
We have our priests, and others subordinate to them,
who fill offices of dignity and trust. Beside these there
are others still who for their wealth or their worth are
known well, not among the Christians only, but the
Romans
also. Of these it were an easy matter to learn
whether or not they are now in Rome. And if these
are here, who from the posts they fill would be the first
victims, it may be fairly supposed that the humbler sort
and less able to depart  and therefore safer  are also
here. Here I stand, and here stands Felix; we are
not among the missing! And we boast not of a
courage
greater than may be claimed for the greater part of
those to whom we belong.'
`Great Emperor,' said Fronto, `I will say no more
than this, that this in its whole aspect bears the same
front, as the black aspersions of the wretch Macer,
whose lies, grosser than Cretan ever forged, poured in a
foul and rotten current from his swollen lips; yea,
while the hot irons were tearing out his very
heartstrings
,
did he still belch forth fresh torrents blacker
and fouler as they flowed longer, till death came and
took him to other tortures worse a thousand-fold  the
just doom of such as put false for true. That those
were the malignant lies I have said they are, Aurelian
can need no other proof, I hope, than that which has
been already given.'
`I am still, Fronto, as when your witnesses were here
before me, satisfied with your defence. When indeed
I doubt the truth of Aurelian, I may be found to
question
that of Fronto. Piso  hold! We have heard
and said too much already. Take me not, as if I
doubted, more than Fronto, the word which you have
uttered, or that of the venerable Felix. You have said
that which you truly believe. The honor of a Piso has
never been impeached, nor as I trust can be. Yet has
there been error both here and there, and I doubt not is.
Let it be thus determined then. If upon any, blame
shall seem to rest, let it be me. If any shall be charged
with doing to-day what must be undone to-morrow, let
the burden be upon my shoulders. I will therefore
recede
;
the edicts, which as you have truly heard were
to-day to have been promulged, shall sleep at least
another
day. To-morrow, Piso, at the sixth hour, in the
palace on the Palatine, shall Probus  if such be the
pleasure of the Christians  plead in their behalf. Then
and there will I hear what this faith is, from him, or
from whomsoever they shall appoint. And now no
more.'
With these words on the part of Aurelian, our
audience
closed, and we turned away  grieving to see
that a man like him, of his Herculean strength
otherwise
,
should have so surrendered himself into the
keeping
of another; yet rejoicing that some of that spirit
of justice that once wholly swayed him still remained,
and that our appeal to it had not been in vain.
To-morrow then, at the sixth hour, will Probus
appear
before Aurelian. It is not, Fausta, because I or
any suppose that Aurelian himself can be so wrought
upon as to change any of his purposes, that we desire
this hearing. He is too far entered into this business
too heartily, and I may add too conscientiously  to
be drawn away from it, or diverted from the great
object
which he has set up before him. I will not despair,
however, that even he may be softened, and abate
somewhat
of that raging thirst for our blood, for the blood of
us all, that now seems to madden him. But however
this may be, upon other minds impressions may be
made that may be of service to us either directly or
indirectly
.
We may suppose that the hearing of the
Christians will be public, that many of great weight
with Aurelian will be there who never before heard
a word from a Christian's lips, and who know only
that we are held as enemies of the state and its religion.
Especially, I doubt not, will many, most or all, of the
senate be there; and it is to that body I still look, as
in the last resort, able perhaps to exert a power that
may save us at least from absolute annihilation.
To-day has Probus been heard; and while others
sleep, I resume my pen to describe to you the events
of it as they have occurred.
It was in the banqueting hall of the imperial palace
VOL. II. 14*
on the Palatine, that Probus was directed to appear and
defend his cause before the Emperor. It is a room of
great size and beautiful in its proportions and
decorations
.
A row of marble pillars adorns each longer side
of the apartment. Its lofty ceiling presents
allegorically
to the eye, and in colors that can never fade, Rome
victorious over the world. The great and good of
Rome's earlier days stand around, in marble or brass,
upon pedestals or in niches sunk into the substance of
the walls. And where the walls are not thus broken,
pictures wrought upon them set before the beholder
many of the scenes in which the patriots of former days
achieved or suffered for the cause of their country.
Into this apartment, soon as it was thrown open, poured
a crowd both of Christians and Pagans, of Romans and
of strangers from every quarter of the world. There
was scarcely a remote province of the empire that had
not there its representative; and from the far East,
discernible
at once by their costume, were many present,
who seemed interested not less than others in the
great questions to be agitated. Between the two
central
columns upon the western side, just beneath the
pedestal of a colossal statue of Vespasian, the great
military
idol of Aurelian, upon a seat slightly raised above
the floor, having on his right hand Livia and Julia, sat
the Emperor. He was surrounded by his favorite
generals
and the chief members of the senate, seated, or
else standing against the columns or statues which
were near him. There too, at the side of or
immediately
before Aurelian, but placed lower, were Porphyrius,
Varus, Fronto, and half the priesthood of Rome. A
little way in front of the Emperor, and nearly in the
centre of the room, stood Probus.
If Aurelian sat in his chair of gold, looking the
omnipotent
master of all the world, as if no mere mortal
force could drive him from the place he held and
filled  Probus on his part, though he wanted all that
air of pride and self-confidence written upon every line
of Aurelian's face and form, yet seemed like one, who,
in the very calmness of an unfaltering trust in a
goodness
and power above that of earth, was in perfect
possession
of himself and fearless of all that man might
say or do. His face was pale; but his eye was clear.
His air was that of a man mild and gentle, who would
not injure willingly the meanest thing endowed with
life; but of a man too of that energy and inward strength
of purpose, that he would not on the other hand suffer
an injury to be done to another, if any power lodged
within him could prevent it. It was that of a man to
be loved, and yet to be feared; whose compassion
you might rely upon; but whose indignation at wrong
and injustice might also be relied upon, whenever the
weak or the oppressed should cry out for help against
the strong and the cruel.
No sooner had Aurelian seated himself, and the
thronged apartment become still, than he turned to
those who were present, and said,
`That the Christians had desired this audience
before
him and the sacred senate, and he had therefore
granted them their request. And he was now here, to
listen to whatever they might urge in their behalf.
But,' said he, `I tell them now, as I have told them
before
,
that it can be of no avail. The acts of former
Emperors, from Nero to the present hour, have
sufficiently
declared what the light is in which a true
Roman
should view the superstition that would supplant
the ancient worship of the gods. It is enough for me,
that such is the acknowledged aim and asserted
tendency
and operation of this Jewish doctrine. No merits
of any kind can atone for the least injury it might
inflict
upon that venerable order of religious worship
which, from the time of Romulus, has exercised over us
its benignant influences, and doubtless by the blessings
it has drawn down upon us from the gods, crowned our
arms with a glory the world has never known before
putting under our feet every civilized kingdom from the
remotest East to the farthest West, and striking terror
into the rude barbarians of the German forests.
Nevertheless
they shall be heard; and if it is from thee,
Christian, that we are to know what thy faith is, let us
now hear whatever it is in thy heart to say. There
shall no bridle be put upon thee; but thou hast freest
leave to utter what thou wilt. There is nothing of
worst concerning either Rome or her worship, her
rulers
or her altars, her priesthood or her gods, but thou
mayest pour it forth in such measure as shall please
thee, and no one shall say thee nay. Now say on; the
day and the night are before thee.'
`I shall require, great Emperor,' replied Probus, `but
little of either; yet I thank thee, and all of our name
who are here present thank thee, for the free range
which thou hast offered. I thank thee too, and so do
we all, for the liberty of frank and undisturbed speech,
which thou hast assured to me. Yet shall I not use it
to malign either the Romans or their faith. It is not
with anger and fierce denunciation, O Emperor, that it
becomes the advocate of what he believes to be a
religion
from Heaven to assail the adherents of a religion
like this of Rome, descended to the present generation
through so many ages, and which all who have believed
it in times past, and all who believe it now, do hold to
be true and woven into the very life of the state  the
origin of its present greatness, and without which it
must fall asunder into final ruin, the bond that held it
together being gone. If the religion of Rome be false,
or really injurious, it is not the generations now
living
who are answerable for its existence formerly or
now, nor for the principles, truths, or rites, which
constitute
it. They have received it, as they have received
a thousand customs which are now among them, by
inheritance
from the ancestors who bequeathed them, and
which they received at too early an age to judge
concerning
their fitness or unfitness, but to which, for the
reason of that early reception, they have become fondly
attached, even as to parents, brothers, and sisters, from
whom they have never been divided. It becomes not
the Christian, therefore, to load with reproaches those
who are placed where they are, not by their own will,
but by the providence of the Great Ruler. Neither does
it become you of the Roman faith to reproach us for the
faith to which we adhere; because the greater
proportion
of us also have inherited our religion, as you yours,
from parents and a community who professed it before
us, and all regard it as heaven-descended, and so proved
to be divine, that without inexpiable guilt we may not
refuse to accept it. It must be in the face of reason,
then, and justice, in the face of what is both wise and
merciful, if either should judge harshly of the other.
`Besides, what do I behold in this wide devotion of
the Roman people to the religion of their ancestors, but
a testimony beautiful for the witness it bears to the
universality
of that principle or feeling which binds the
human
heart to some god or gods, in love and worship?
The worship may be wrong or greatly imperfect, and
sometimes injurious; the god or gods may be so
conceived
of as to act with hurtful influences upon human
character and life; still it is religion; it is a sentiment
that raises the thoughts of the humble and toilworn
from the gross, the dull, the material, and the perishing,
to the heavenly, the invisible, the future, the immortal.
And this, though accompanied by some or many rites
shocking to humanity and revolting to reason, is better
than that men were in this regard no higher nor other
than brutes; but received their being as they do theirs,
they know not whence, and when they lose it, depart
like them, they know not and care not whither. In the
religious character of the Roman people  for religious
in the earlier ages of this empire they eminently were,
and they are religious now, though in less degree
I behold and acknowledge the providence of God, who
has so framed us that our minds tend by resistless force
to himself; satisfied at first with low and crude
conceptions
,
but ever aspiring after those that shall be
worthier
and worthier.
`And now, O Emperor, for the same reason that we
believe God the creator did implant in us all, of all tribes
and tongues, this deep desire to know, worship, and
enjoy
him, so that no people have ever been wholly
ignorant
of him, do we believe that he has, in these latter
years, declared himself to mankind more plainly than he
did in the origin of things, or than he does through our
own reason, so that men may, by such better
knowledge
of himself and of all necessary truth which he has
imparted, be raised to a higher virtue on earth, and
made fit for a more exalted life in Heaven. We believe
that he has thus declared himself by him whom you
have heard named as the Master and Lord of the
Christian
,
and after whom they are called, Jesus Christ.
Him, God the creator, we believe, sent into the world to
teach a better religion than the world had; and to break
down and forever destroy, through the operation of his
truth, a thousand injurious forms of false religion. It is
this religion which we would extend and impart, to those
who will open their minds to consider its claims, and
their hearts to embrace its truths, when they have once
been seen to be divine. This has been our task and our
duty in Rome, to beseech you not blindly to receive, but
strictly to examine, and if found to be true, then humbly
and gratefully to adopt this new message from above '
`By the gods, Aurelian,' exclaimed Porphyrius, `these
Christians are kindly disposed! their benevolence and
their philosophy are alike. We are obliged to them '
`Not now, Porphyrius,' said Aurelian. `Disturb not
the Christian. Say on, Probus.'
`We hope,' continued Probus, nothing daunted by the
scornful jeers of the philosopher, `that we are sincerely
desirous of your welfare, and so pray that in the lapse
of years all may, as some have done, take at our hands
the good we proffer them; for sure we are, that would
all so receive it, Rome would tower upwards with a
glory and a beauty that should make her a thousand-fold
more honored and beloved than now, and her roots
would strike down, and so fasten themselves in the very
centre of the earth, that well might she then be called
the Eternal City. Yet, O Emperor, though such is our
aim and purpose; though we would propagate a religion
from God, and in doing so are willing to labor our lives
long, and if need be die in the sacred cause, yet are
we charged as atheists. The name by which we are
known, as much as by that of Christian, is atheist '
`Such I have surely believed you,' said Porphyrius,
again breaking in, `and at this moment do.'
`But it is a name, Aurelian, fixed upon us ignorantly
or slanderously; ignorantly I am willing to believe.
We believe in a God, O Emperor; it is to him we live
and to him we die. The charge of atheism I thus
publicly
deny, as do all Christians who are here, as would
all throughout the world with one acclaim, were they
also here, and would all seal their testimony, if need
were, with their blood. We believe in one God; not in
many, some greater and some lesser, as with you, and
whose forms are known and can be set forth in images
and statues  but in one spiritual and invisible Being,
the sole monarch of the universe, whom no eye hath
seen or can see; whom no man, be he never so cunning,
can represent in wood or brass or stone; whom so to
represent in any imaginary shape our faith denounces
as unlawful and impious. Hence it is, O Emperor,
because
the vulgar, when they enter our churches or our
houses, see there no image of god or goddess, that they
imagine we are without a God, and without his worship.
And such conclusion may in them be excused. For, till
they are instructed, it may not be easy for them to
conceive
of one infinite and spiritual God, filling Heaven
and earth with his presence. But in others, it is hard
to see how they think us atheists on the same ground,
since nothing can be plainer than that among you, the
intelligent, and the philosophers especially, believe as we
do in a great pervading invisible spirit of the universe.
Plato worshipped not nor believed in these stone or
wooden gods; nor in any of the fables of the Greek
religion
;
yet who ever has charged him with atheism?
So was it with the great Longinus. I see before me
those who are now famed for their science in such
things, and who are the teachers of Rome in them, yet
not one, I may venture to declare, believes other than as
Plato and Longinus did in this regard. It is an error
or a calumny that has ever prevailed concerning us; but
in former times some have had the candor, when the
error has been removed, to confess publicly that they
had been subject to it. The Emperor Marcus Aurelius,
to name no other, when, in the straits into which he was
fallen at Cotinus, he charged his disasters upon the
Christian soldiers, and, they praying prostrate upon the
earth for him and his army and empire, he forthwith
gained the victory, which before he had despaired of
did then immediately acknowledge that they had a God,
and that they should no longer be reviled as atheists;
since it was plain that men might believe in a God, and
carry about the image of him in their own minds, though
they had no visible one. It is thus we are all theists.
We carry about with us, in the sanctuary of our own
bosoms, our image of the great and almighty God whom
we serve; and before that, and that only, do we bow
VOL. II. 15
down and worship. Were we indeed atheists, it were
not unreasonable that you dealt with us as you now do,
nay and much more severely; for where belief in a God
does not exist, it is not easy to see how any state can
long hold together. The necessary bond is wanting, and,
as a sheaf of wheat when the band is broken, it must
fall asunder.
`The first principle of the religion of Christ is this
belief
in a God; in his righteous providence here on earth,
and in a righteous retribution hereafter. How then can
the religion of Christ in this respect be of dangerous
influence
or tendency? It is well known to all, who are
acquainted in the least with history or philosophy, that
in the religion of the Jews, the belief and worship of
one God almost constitutes the religion itself.
Everything
else is inferior and subordinate. In this respect
the religion of Jesus is like that of the Jews. It is
exceeding jealous of the honor and worship of this one
God  the God of the Jews also; for Jesus was himself
a Jew, and has revealed to us the same God, whom we
are required to worship, only with none of the
ceremonies
,
rites, and sacrifices, which were peculiar to the
Jews. It is this which has caused us, equally to our
and their displeasure, frequently to be confounded
together
,
and mistaken the one for the other. But the
differences between us are, excepting in the great
doctrine
I have just named, essential and eternal. This
doctrine therefore, which is the chief of all, being so
fundamental
with us, it is not easy, I say, to see how we
can on religious accounts be dangerous to the state.
For many things are comprehended in and follow from
this faith. It is not a barren, unprofitable speculation,
but a practical and restraining doctrine of the greatest
moral efficacy. If it be not this to us, to all and
everyone
of us, it is not what it ought to be, and we wrongly
understand or else willfully pervert it. We believe that
we are everywhere surrounded by the presence of our
God; that he is our witness every moment, and
everywhere
conscious, as we are ourselves, of our words, acts,
and thoughts; and will bring us all to a strict account at
last for whatever he has thus witnessed that has been
contrary to that rigid law of holy living which he has
established over us in Christ. Must not this act upon
us most beneficially? We believe that in himself he is
perfect purity, and that he demands of us that we be so
in our degree also. We can impute to him none of the
acts, such as the believers in the Greek and Roman
religions
freely ascribe to their Jove, and so have not, as
others have, in such divine example a warrant and
excuse
for the like enormities. This one God too we also
regard as our judge, who will in the end sit upon our
conduct throughout the whole of our lives, and punish
or reward according to what we shall have been, just as
the souls of men, according to your belief, receive their
sentence at the bar of Minos and Rhadamanthus. And
other similar truths are wrapt up with and make a part
of this great primary one. Wherefore it is most evident,
that nothing can be more false and absurd than to think
and speak of us as atheists, and for that reason a
nuisance
in the state.
`But it is not only that we are atheists, but that
through our atheism we are to be looked upon as
disorderly
members of society, disturbers of the peace,
disaffected
and rebellious citizens, that we hear on every side.
I do not believe that this charge has ever been true of
any; much less of all. Or if any Christian has at any
time and for any reason disobeyed the laws, withheld
his taxes when they have been demanded, or neglected
any duties which as a citizen of Rome he has owed to
the Emperor or any representative of him, then so far
he has not been a Christian. Christ's kingdom is not
of this world  though, because we so often and so much
speak of a kingdom we, have been thought to aim at one
on earth  it is above; and he requires us while here
below to be obedient to the laws and the rulers that are
set up over us; to pay tribute to whomsoever it is due;
here in Rome to Csar; and wherever we are to be
loyal and quiet citizens of the state. And the reception
of his religion tends to make such of us all. Whoever
adopts the faith of the gospel of Jesus will be a virtuous,
and holy, and devout man, and therefore both in Rome,
in Persia, and India, and everywhere, a good subject.
`We defend not nor abet, great Emperor, the act of
that holy but impetuous and passionate man, who so
lately, in defiance of the imperial edict and before either
remonstrance or appeal on our part, preached on the
very steps of the capitol, and there committed that
violence
for which he hath already answered with his life.
We defend him not in that; but neither do we defend
the unrighteous haste, and the more than demoniac
barbarity
of his death. God, we rejoice in all our
afflictions
,
is over all, and the wicked, the cruel, and the
unjust
,
shall not escape.
`Yet it must be acknowledged that there are higher
duties than those which we owe to the state, even as
there is a higher sovereign to whom we owe allegiance
than the head of the state, whether that head be king,
senate, or emperor. Man is not only a subject and a
citizen, he is first of all the creature of God, and
amenable
to his laws. When therefore there is a conflict
between
the laws of God and the king, who can doubt
which are to be obeyed?  '
`Who does not see,' cried Porphyrius vehemently,
`that in such principles there lurks the blackest treason?
for who but themselves are to judge when the laws of
the two sovereigns do thus conflict? and what law then
may be promulged, but to them it may be an offence?'
`Let not the learned Porphyrius,' resumed Probus,
`rest in but a part of what I say. Let him hear the
whole, and then deny the principle if he can. I say,
when the law of God and the law of man are opposite
the one to the other, we are not to hesitate which to obey
and which to break; our first allegiance is due to Heaven.
And it is true, that we ourselves are to be the judges
in the case. But then we are judges under the same
stern laws of conscience toward God, which compel us
to violate the law of the empire, though death in its
most terrific form be the penalty. And is it likely
therefore
that we shall, for frivolous causes, or imaginary
ones, or none at all, hold it to be our duty to rebel
against the law of the land? To think so were to rate
us low indeed. They may surely be trusted to make
this decision, whose fidelity to conscience in other
emergences
brings down upon them so heavy a load of
calamity
.
I may appeal moreover to all, I think, who hear
me, of the common faith, whether they themselves would
not hold by the same principle? Suppose the case that
your supreme god  `Jupiter greatest and best'  or
VOL. II. 15*
the god beyond and above him in whom your
philosophers
have faith  revealed a law, requiring what the
law of the empire forbids, must you not, would you
not, if your religion were anything more than a mere
pretence, obey the god rather than the man? Although
therefore, great Emperor, we blame the honest Macer
for his precipitancy, yet it ought to be, and is, the
determination
of us all, to yield obedience to no law which
violates the law of Heaven. We having received the
faith of Christ in trust, to be by us dispensed to mankind,
and believing the welfare of mankind to depend upon
the wide extension of it, we will rather die than shut it
up in our own bosoms  we will rather die, than live
with our tongues torn from our mouths  our limbs
fettered
,
and bound! We must speak, or we will die  '
Porphyrius again sprang from his seat with intent to
speak, but the Emperor restrained him.
`Contend not now, Porphyrius; let us hear the
Christian
.
I have given him his freedom. Infringe it not.'
`I will willingly, noble Emperor,' said Probus, `
respond
to whatsoever the learned Tyrian may propose.
All I can desire is this only, that the religion of Christ
may be seen by those who are here to be what it truly
is; and it may be, that the questions or the objections of
the philosopher shall show this more perfectly than a
continued discourse.'
The Emperor however, making a sign, he went on.
`We have also been charged, O Emperor, with vices
and crimes, committed at both our social and our religious
meetings, at which nature revolts, which are even
beyond
in grossness what have been ever ascribed to the
most flagitious of mankind.'  Probus here enumerated
the many rumors which had long been and still were
current in Rome, and, especially by the lower orders,
believed
;
and drew then such a picture of the character,
lives, manners, and morals of the Christians, for the
truth of which he appealed openly to noble and
distinguished
persons among the Romans then present,
not of the Christian faith, but who were yet well
acquainted
with their character and condition, and who
would not refuse to testify to what he had said  that
there could none have been present in that vast
assembly
but who, if there were any sense of justice within
them, must have dismissed forever from their minds, if
they had ever entertained them, the slanderous fictions
that had filled them.
To report to you, Fausta, this part of his defence,
must be needless, and could not prove otherwise than
painful. He then also refuted in the same manner
other common objections alleged against the Christians
and their worship; the lateness of its origin; its
beggarly
simplicity; the low and ignorant people who
alone or chiefly, both in Rome and throughout the
world, have received it; the fierce divisions and
disputes
among the Christians themselves; the uncertainty
of its doctrines; the rigor of its morality, as unsuited
to mankind; as also its spiritual worship; the
slowness
of its progress, and the little likelihood that, if
God were its author, he would leave it to be trodden
under foot and so nearly annihilated by the very people
to whom he was sending it; these and other similar
things usually urged against the Christians, and now
for the first time, it is probable, by most of the Romans
present, heard refuted and explained, did Probus set
forth, both with brevity and force; making nothing
tedious
by reason of a frivolous minuteness, nor yet
omiting
a single topic or argument, which it was due to the
cause he defended, to bring before the minds of that
august
assembly. He then ended his appeal in the
following
manner:
`And now, great Emperor, must you have seen, in
what I have already said, what the nature and
character
of this religion is; for in denying and disproving
the charges that have been brought against it, I have, in
most particulars, alleged and explained some opposite
truth or doctrine, by which it is justly characterized.
But that you may be informed the more exactly for
what it is you are about to persecute and destroy us,
and for what it is that we cheerfully undergo torture
and death sooner than surrender or deny it, listen yet a
moment longer. You have heard that we are named
after Jesus, Jesus of Nazareth in Galilee, who, in the
reign of Tiberius, was born in Judea, and there lived
and taught, a prophet and messenger of God, till he
was publicly crucified by his bitter enemies the Jews.
We do not doubt, nay, we all steadfastly believe, that
this Jesus was the Son of the Most High God, by reason
of his wonderful endowments and his delegated office
as the long-looked-for Messiah of the Jews. As the
evidences
of his great office and of his divine origin, he
performed those miracles that filled with astonishment
the whole Jewish nation, and strangers from all parts of
the world; and so wrought even upon the mind of your
great predecessor, the Emperor Tiberius, that he would
fain receive him into the number of the gods of Rome.
And why, O Emperor, was this great personage sent
forth into the world, encircled by the rays of divine
power and wisdom and goodness, an emanation of the
self-existent and infinite and invisible God? And why
do we so honor him, and cleave to him, that we are
ready to offer our lives in sacrifice, while we go forth
as preachers of his faith, making him known to all
nations
as the universal Saviour and Redeemer? This
Jesus came into the world, and lived and taught; was
preceded by so long a preparation of prophetic
annunciation
and accompanied by so sublime demonstrations
of almighty power, to this end, and to this end only, that
he might save us from our sins, and from those penal
consequences in this world and in worlds to come,
which are bound to them by the stern decrees of fate.
Yes, Aurelian, Jesus came only that he might deliver
mankind from the thraldom of sin, and raise them to a
higher condition of virtue and happiness. He was a
great moral and religious reformer, endowed with the
wisdom and power of the supreme God. He himself
toiled only in Judea; but he came a benefactor of
Rome too  of Rome as well as of Judea. He came to
purge it of its pollutions; to check in their growth those
customs and vices which seem destined, reaching their
natural height and size, to overlay and bury in final ruin
the city and the empire; he came to make us
citizens
of Heaven through the virtues which his doctrine
should build up in the soul, and so citizens of Rome
more worthy of that name than any who ever went
before. He came to heal, to mend, to reform the state;
not to set up a kingdom in hostility to this, but in unison
with it; an inward, invisible kingdom in every man's
heart, and which should be as the soul of the other.
`It was to reform the morals of the state, to save it
from itself, that you, Aurelian, in the first years of your
reign, applied those energies that have raised the
empire
to more than its ancient glory. You aimed to
infuse
a love of justice and of peace, to abate the
extravagances
of the times, to stem the tide of corruption that
seemed about to bear down upon its foul streams the
empire itself, tossing upon its surface a wide sea of
ruins
.
It was a great work  too great for man. It
needed a divine strength and a more than human
wisdom
.
These were not yours; and it is no wonder
that the work did not go on to its completion. Jesus is
a reformer; of Rome and of the world also. The
world is his theatre of action; but with him there is
leagued the arm and the power of the Supreme God;
and the work which he attempts shall succeed. It
cannot
but succeed. It is not so much he, Jesus of
Nazareth
,
who has come forth upon this great errand of
mercy and love to mankind, as God himself in and
through him. It is the Great God of the Universe,
who, by Jesus Christ as his agent and messenger, comes
to you, and would reform and redeem your empire, and
out of that which is transitory, and by its inherent vice
threatened with decay and death, make a city and an
empire which, through the energy of its virtues, shall
truly be eternal. Can you not, O Emperor, supposing
the claims of this religion to a divine origin to be just,
view it with respect? Nay, could you not greet its
approach to your capital with pleasure and gratitude,
seeing its aim is nothing else than this, to purify, purge,
and reform the state, to heal its wounds, cleanse its
putrifying
members, and infuse the element of a new and
healthier life? Methinks a true patriot and lover of
Rome must rejoice when any power approaches and
offers
to apply those remedies that may, with remotest
probability only, bid fair to cure the diseases of which
her body is sick, nigh unto death. Such, Aurelian, was
and is the aim of Jesus in the religion which he
brought; to reform the world, and bring men
everywhere
into harmony with God their Creator; to
reconcile
them to each other; to make them as one. And of
us, who are his ministers, his messengers  who go
forth bearing these glad tidings of deliverance from sin
and corruption, and of union with God  our work is
the same with his. We but repeat the lessons which
he gave. We take his gospel, which is his written
instruction
,
in our hand, and reading as we go, we aim to
rescue the souls of men from the power of demons, of
satan, and of sin. We are humble teachers of good
morals. Our office, like that of our great Master, is
persuading men to abandon all that injures them, and
unite themselves to God in virtuous lives. Are we, in so
doing, enemies of Rome? Are we not rather her truest
friends? By making men good, pure, just, kind,
honest
,
and conscientious, are we not at the same time
making them the best citizens? Are there in Rome
better citizens than the Christians?
`You will now perhaps, Aurelian, desire to be told
by what instruments Christianity hopes to work such
changes  by the use of what means. It is simply, O
Emperor, by the power of truth! The religion which
we preach uses not force. Were the arm of Aurelian
at this moment the arm of Probus, he could do no more
than he now does with one, which, as the world deems, is
in the comparison powerless as an infant's. In all that
pertains to the soul and its growth and purification, there
must be utmost freedom. The soul must suffer no
constraint
.
There must be no force laid upon it, but the
force of reason and the appeal of divine truth. All that
we ask or want in Rome is the liberty of speech  the
free allowance to offer to men the truth in Christ and
persuade them to consider it. With that we will engage
to reform and save the whole world. We want not to
meddle with affairs of state, nor with the citizen's
relations
to the state; we have naught to do with the city,
or its laws, or government. We desire but the
privilege
to worship God according to our consciences, and
labor for the moral and spiritual welfare of all who will
hear our words.
`And if you would know what the truth is we
impart
,
and by which we would save the souls of men, and
reform the empire and the world, be it known to you
that we preach Jesus Christ and him crucified, whom
God raised up and sent into the world to save it by his
doctrine and life, and whom  being by the Jews hung
upon a cross  God raised again from the dead. We
preach him as the Son of God with power, by whom
God has been revealed to mankind in his true nature
and perfections, and through whom, he and he only is
to be worshipped. It is this Being, the God who sent
Jesus into the world, whom we preach to you and all in
Rome as the only true God, for whom you are bound,
when the truth shall have been made plain to you, to
forsake your idols and fall down and serve him alone.
In the place of Jupiter, we bring you a revelation of
the God and Father of Christ Jesus our Lord  a being
of perfect purity, holiness, and truth, who is the creator,
governor, and judge of the universe, and who will call all
men unto judgment at last for all their acts and thoughts,
rewarding or punishing according to what they have
done. Through Jesus, we preach also a resurrection
from the dead. We show by arguments which cannot
be refuted, that this Jesus, when he had been crucified
and slain, and had lain three days in the tomb, was
called again to life, and taken up to Heaven, as an
example
of what should afterward happen to all his
followers
.
Through him has immortality been plainly brought
to light and proved, and this transporting truth we
declare
wherever we go. Through Jesus, we preach also
repentance; we declare to men their wickedness; we
show them what and how great it is; and exhort them
to repentance, as what can alone save them from the
wrath to come.
`This, O Emperor, is the great work which we, as
apostles of Jesus, have to do, to convince the world
how vile it is; how surely their wickedness unrepented
of will work their misery and their ruin, and so lead
them away from it, and up the safe and pleasant heights
of Christian virtue. We find Rome sunk in sensuality
and sin; nor only that, but ignorant of its own guilt,
dead to the wickedness into which it has fallen, and
denying
any obligations to a different or better life. Such
do we find the world itself, dead, dead in trespasses and
sin. We would rouse it from this sleep of moral death.
We desire, first of all, to waken in the souls of men a
perception of the guilt of sin! a feeling of the wide
departure
of their lives from the just demands of the being
who made them. The prospect of immortality were
VOL. II. 16
nothing without this. Longer life were but a greater
evil were we not made alive to sin and righteousness.
Life on earth, Aurelian, is not the best thing, but life
free from sin  virtuous life: so life without end is not
the best thing, but that life glorious through holiness.
But to the necessity of such holiness to the life of the
soul, men are now insensible and dead. They love the
prospect of an immortal existence, but not of that purity
without which immortality were no blessing. This
moral regeneration  this waking up of men dead in
sin, to the life of righteousness  this redemption of
them from their vices and the abominable and cruel and
impious customs which prevail and sink them to the
level of the brutes  this is the first aim of Christianity.
Repentance! was the first word of its founder when
he began preaching in Judea; it is the first word of his
followers wherever they go, and should be the last.
This, O Aurelian, in few words, is the gospel of
Jesus
Repent, and live forever!
`In the service of this gospel, and therefore of you and
the world, we are content to labor while we live, to
suffer
injury and reproach, and if need be, and they to
whom we go will not understand us, lay down our
lives. Almost three hundred years has it appealed to
mankind; and though not with the success that should
have followed upon the toil of those who have toiled
for the salvation of men, yet has it not been rejected
everywhere
,
nor has the labor been in vain. The fruit that
has come of the seed sown is great and abundant. In
every corner of the earth are there now those who
name the name of Christ. And in every place are there
many more than meet the eye who read our gospels,
believe in them, and rejoice in the virtue and the
hope which have taken root in their souls. Here in
Rome, O Aurelian, are there multitudes of believers,
whom the ear hears not, nor the eye sees, hidden
away in the security of this sea of roofs, and whom the
messengers of your power never could discover.
Destroy
us you may; sweep from the face of Rome every
individual whom the most diligent search can find, from
the gray-haired man of four-score to the infant that can
just lisp the name of Jesus, and you have not destroyed
the Christians; the Christian church still stands  not
unharmed, but founded as before upon a rock, against
which the powers of earth and hell can never prevail;
and soon as this storm shall have overblown, those other
and now secret multitudes, of whom I speak, will come
forth, and the wilderness of the church shall blossom
again as a garden in the time of spring. God is
working
with us, and who therefore can prevail against us!
`Bring not then, Aurelian, upon your own soul; bring
not upon Rome, the guilt that would attend this
unnecessary
slaughter. It can but defer for an hour or a
day the establishment of that kingdom of righteousness,
which must be established, because it is God's, and he
is laying its foundations and building its walls. Have
pity too, great Emperor, upon this large multitude of
those who embrace this faith, and who will not let it go
for all the terrors of your courts and judges and
engines
;
they will all suffer the death of Macer ere they
will prove false to their Master. Let not the horrors of
that scene be renewed, nor the greater ones of an
indiscriminate
massacre. I implore your compassions, not
for myself, but for these many thousands, who by my
ministry have been persuaded to receive this faith. For
them my heart bleeds; them I would save from the
death which impends. Yet it is a glorious and a happy
death, to die for truth and Christ! It is better to die
so, knowing that by such death the very church itself is
profited than to die in one's own bed, and only to one's
self. So do these thousands think; and whatever
conpassion
I may implore for them, they would each and
all, were that their fate, go with cheerful step, as those
who went to some marriage supper, to the axe, the
stake, or the cross. Christianity cannot die but with
the race itself. Its life is bound up in the life of man,
and man must be destroyed ere that can perish.
Behold
then, Aurelian, the labor that is thine!'
Soon as he had ceased, Porphyrius started from his
seat and said,
`It is then, O Romans, just as it has ever been
affirmed
.
The Galileans are atheists! They believe not
in the gods of Rome, nor in any in whom mankind can
ever have belief. I doubt not but they think themselves
believers in a God. They think themselves to have
found one better than others have; but upon any
definition
that I or you could give or understand of atheism,
they are atheists! Their God is invisible; he is a
universal
spirit, like this circumambient air; of no form,
dwelling in no place. But how can that without
effrontery
be called a being, which is without body and
form; which is everywhere and yet nowhere; which
from the beginning of the world has never been heard of
till by these Nazarenes he is now first brought to light,
or, if older, exists in the dreams of the dreaming Jews,
whose religion, as they term it, is so stuffed with fable,
that one might not expect, after the most exact and
laborious
search, to meet with so much as a grain of truth.
Yet, whatever these Galileans may assert, their speech
is hardly to be received as wholly worthy of belief, when,
in their very sacred records, such things are to be found
as contradict themselves. For in one place  not to
mention a thousand cases of the like kind  it is said
that Jesus, the head of this religion, on a certain
occasion
walked upon the sea; when, upon sifting the
narrative
,
it is found that it was but upon a paltry lake, the
lake of Galilee, upon which he performed that great feat!
a thing to which the magic of which he is accused
and doubtless with justice  was plainly equal; while
to walk upon the sea might well have been beyond that
science. How much of what we have heard is to be
distrusted also, concerning the love which these
Nazarenes
bear to Rome. We may well pray to be delivered
from the affection of those, whose love manifests itself in
the singular manner of seeking our destruction. He
who loves me so well as to poison me that I may have
the higher enjoyment of Elysium, I could hardly esteem
as a well-wisher or friend. These Jewish fanatics love
us after somewhat the same fashion. In the zeal of
their affection they would make us heirs of what they
call their heavenly kingdom, but in the meanwhile
destroy
our religion, deprive us of our ancient gods, and
sap the foundations of the state. Romans, in spite of
all you have heard of another sort, I hope you will still
believe that experience is one of your most valuable
teachers, and that therefore you will be slow to forsake
opinions which have the sanction of venerable age,
under
which you have flourished so happily and your
country
VOL. II. 16*
grown to so amazing a height of glory and renown.
I think you would deserve the fate which this new-made
religion would bring you to, if you abandoned the
worship
of a thousand years, for the presumptuous novelty
of yesterday. Not a name of greatness or honor can be
quoted of those who have adorned this foreign fiction;
while all the great and good of Greece and Rome,
philosophers
,
moralists, historians, and poets are to be found
on the side of Hellenism. If we cast from us that which
we have experienced to be good, by what rule and on
what principle can we afterward put our trust in
anything
else? And it is considerable, that which has ever
been asserted of this people and which I doubt not is
true, that they have ever been prying about with their
doctrines and their mysteries among the poor and
humbler
sort, among women, slaves, simple and unlearned
folks, while they have never appealed to, nor made any
converts of the great, the learned, the witty, who alone
capable of judging of the truth of what they put
forth. Who are the believers here in Rome? Who
knows them? Are the sacred senate Christians? or any
distinguished for their rank? No; with exceptions too
few to be noticed those who embrace it are among the
dregs of the people, men wholly incapable of separating
true from false, and laying properly the safe foundations
of a new religion  a work too great even for
philosophers
.
And not only does this religion draw to itself
the poor and humble and ignorant, but the base and
wicked also; persons known while of our way to have
been notorious for their vices have all of a sudden joined
themselves to the Christians; and whatever show of
sanctity may then have been assumed, we may well
suppose
there has not been much of the reality. Long may
it boast of such members, and while its brief life lasts
make continually such converts from us. As to the
amazing show they make of their benevolence in the
care of the poor and even of our poor, doing more offices
of kindness toward them  so it is affirmed  than we
ourselves  who does not see the motive that prompts
so much charity, in the good opinion they build up for
themselves in those whom they have so much obliged,
and who cannot in decency do less afterward than oblige
them in turn by joining their superstitionssuperstitions
of which they know nothing before they adopt them, and
as little afterward. But I will not O Emperor, weary
out your patience again  already so tried  and will
only
say that the fate which has all along and everywhere
befallen these people might well warn them that they
are objects of the anger rather than the favor and love
of the Lord of Heaven, of which they so confidently
make their boast. For if he loved them would he leave
them everywhere so to the rage and destruction of their
enemies  to be reviled, trodden upon and despised all
over the earth? If these be the signs of love what are
those of hate? And can it be that he their Lord of
Heaven hath in store for them a world of bliss
beyond
this life, who gives them here on earth scarce
the sordid shelter of a cabin? In truth they seem to be
a community living upon their imaginations. They
fancy themselves favorites of Heaven  though all the
world thinks otherwise. They fancy themselves the
greatest benefactors the world has ever seen, while they
are the only ones who think so. They have nothing
here but persecution, contempt, and hatred, and yet are
anticipating a more glorious Elysium than the greatest
and best of earth have ever dared to hope for. We
cannot
but hope they may be at some time the riddle to
themselves which they are to us. This is a benevolent
wish, for their entertainment would be great.'
When he had ended, and almost before, many voices
were heard of those who wished to speak, and Probus rose
in his place to reply to what had fallen from the
philosopher
,
but all were alike silenced by the loud and stern
command of Aurelian, who evidently weary and
impatient
of further audience of what he was so little willing
to hear at all, cried out, saying,
`The Christians, Romans, have now been heard, as
they desired, by one whom they themselves appointed to
set forth their doctrine. This is no school for the
disputations
of sophists or philosophers or fanatics. Let
Romans and Christians alike withdraw.'
Whereupon, without further words or delay, the
assembly
broke up.
It was not difficult to see that the statements and
reasonings
of Probus had fallen upon many who heard
them with equal surprise and delight. Every word that
he uttered was heard with an eager attention I never
before
saw equaled. I have omitted the greater part of
what he said, especially where he went with minuteness
into an account of the history, doctrine, and precept of
our faith, knowing it to be too familiar to you to make
it desirable to have it repeated.
It was in part at least owing to an unwillingness to
allow
Probus again to address that audience, representing
all the rank and learning of Rome, that the Emperor
so hastily dissolved the assembly. Whatever effect the
hearing of Probus may have upon him or upon us,
there is reason to believe that its effects will be deep
and eternal upon the higher classes of our inhabitants.
They then heard what they never heard before  a fair
and honest account of what Christianity is; and from
what I have already been informed, and gathered
indeed
from my own observation at the time, they now
regard
it with very different sentiments.
When late in the evening of this day we conversed
of its events, Probus being seated with us, we indulged
both in those cheering and desponding thoughts which
seem to be strangely mingled together in our present
calamities.
`No opinion,' said Julia, `has been more strongly
confirmed within me by this audience before Aurelian,
than this, that it has been of most auspicious influence
upon our faith. Not that some have not been filled
with a bitterer spirit than before; but that more have
been favorably inclined toward us by the disclosures,
Probus, which you made; and whether they become
Christians or not eventually, they will be far more
ready to defend us in our claim for the common rights
of citizens. Marcellinus, who sat near me, was of this
number. He expressed frequently in most emphatic
terms his surprise at what he heard, which he said he
was constrained to admit as true and fair statements,
seeing they were supported and corroborated by my
and your presence and silence. At the close he
declared
his purpose to procure the gospels for his
perusal
.'
`And yet,' said I, `the late consul Capitalinus, who
was at my side, and whose clear and intelligent mind
is hardly equaled here in Rome, was confirmed  even
as Porphyrius was, or pretended to be  in all his
previous
unfavorable impressions. He did not disguise his
opinion, but freely said that in his judgment the
religion
ought to be suppressed, and that, though he should
by no means defend any measures like those which he
understood Aurelian had resolved to put in force, he
should advocate such action in regard to it as could
not fail to expel it from the empire in no very great
number of years.'
`I could observe,' added Probus, `the same differences
of feeling and judgment all over the surface of that sea
of faces. But if I should express my belief as to the
proportion of friends and enemies there present, I should
not hesitate to say  and that I am sure without any
imposition upon my own credulity  that the greater
part by far were upon our side  not in faith as you may
suppose  but in that good opinion of us and of the
tendencies
of our doctrine and the value of our services,
that is very near it, and is better than the public
profession
of Christ of many others.'
`It will be a long time, I am persuaded,' said Julia,
`before the truths received then into many minds will
cease to operate in our behalf. But what think you
was the feeling of Aurelian? His countenance was
hidden from me  yet that would reveal not much. It is
immovable at those times when he is deeply stirred, or
has any motive to conceal his sentiments.'
`I cannot believe,' replied Probus, `that any
impression
such as we could wish was made upon that hard
and cruel heart. Not the column against which he
leaned stood in its place more dead to whatever it was
that came from my lips than he. He has not been
moved, we may well believe, to change any of his
designs
.
Whatever yesterday it was in his intent to do,
he will accomplish to-morrow. I do not believe we
have anything to hope at his hands.'
`Alas! Lucius,' said Julia, `that our faith in Christ
and our interest and concern for its progress in Rome
should come to this. How happy was I in Syria, with
this belief as my bosom companion and friend; and
free too to speak of it, to any and to all. How needless
is all the misery which this rude, unlettered tyrant is
about to inflict. How happily for all, would things
take their course even here, might they but be left to
run in those natural channels which would reveal
themselves
,
and which would then conduct to those ends
which the Divine Providence has proposed. But man
wickedly interposes; and a misery is inflicted which
otherwise would have never fallen upon us, and which
in the counsels of God was never designed. What now
think you, Probus, will be the event?'
`I cannot doubt,' he replied, `that to-morrow will
witness
all that report has already spread abroad as the
purpose of Aurelian. Urged on by both Fronto and
Varus, he will not pause in his course. Rome, ere the
Ides, will swim in Christian blood. I see not whence
deliverance is to come. Miracle alone could save us;
and miracle has long since ceased to be the order of
Providence. Having provided for us this immense
instrument
of moral reform in the authority and doctrine
of Christ, we are now left, as doubtless it is on the
whole best for our character and our virtues we should
be, to our own unassisted strength, to combat with all
the evils that may assail us, both from without and
within. For myself, I can meet this tempest without a
thought of reluctance or dread. I am a solitary man;
having neither child nor relative to mourn my loss; I
have friends indeed, whom I love, and from whom I
would not willingly part; but, if any considerable
purpose
is to be gained by my death to that cause for
which I have lived, neither I nor they can lament that
it should occur. Under these convictions as to my
own fate  and that of all must I say and believe? no;
I cannot, will not, believe that humanity has taken its
final departure from the bosom of Aurelian  I turn to
one bright spot, and there my thoughts dwell, and there
my hopes gather strength, and that is here, where you,
Piso, and you, lady, will still dwell, too high for the
aim of the imperial murderer to reach. Here I shall
believe will there be an asylum for many a wearied
spirit, a safe refuge from the sharp pelting of the storm
without. And when a calm shall come again, from
beneath
this roof, as once from the ark of God, shall there
go forth those who shall again people the waste-places
of the church, and change the wilderness of death into
a fruitful garden full of the plants of God.'
`That it is the present purpose of Aurelian to spare
me,' I answered, `whatever provocation I may give him,
I fully believe. He is true; and his word to that end,
with no wish expressed on my part, has been given.
But do not suppose that in that direction at least he
may not change his purpose. Superstitiously mad as
he now is, a mere plaything too in the bloody hands of
Fronto  and nothing can well be esteemed as more
insecure
than even my life, privileged and secure as I
may seem. If it should occur to him, in his day or his
night visions and dreams, that I more than others should
be an acceptable offering to his god, my life would be to
him but as that of an insect buzzing around his ear; and
being dead by a blow, he would miss me no more. Still
let the mercy that is vouchsafed, whether great or little,
be gratefully confessed.'
You then see, Fausta, the position in which your old
friends now stand here in Rome. Who could have
believed
,
when we talked over our dangers in Palmyra,
that greater and more dreadful still awaited us in our
own home. It has come upon us with such
suddenness
that we can scarce believe it ourselves. Yet are
we prepared, with an even mind and a trusting faith, for
whatever may betide.
It is happy for me, and for Julia, that our religion
has fixed within us so firm a belief in a superintending
Providence  who orders not only the greatest but the
least events of life, who is as much concerned for the
happiness and the moral welfare of the humblest
individual
,
as he is for the orderly movement of a world
that we sit down under the shadows that overhang us,
perfectly convinced that some end of good to the church
or the world is to be achieved through these
convulsions
greater than could have been achieved in any
other way. The Supreme Ruler, we believe, is
infinitely
wise and infinitely good. But he would be
neither
,
if unnecessary suffering were meted out to his
creatures. This suffering then is not unnecessary. But
through it, in ways which our sight now is not piercing
VOL. II. 17
enough to discern  but may hereafter  shall a
blessing
redound both to the individuals concerned, to the
the present generation, and a remote posterity, which
could not otherwise have been secured. This we must
believe; or we must renounce all belief.
Forget not to remember us with affection to Gracchus
and Calpurnius.
I also was present at the hearing of Probus. But of
that I need say nothing; Piso having so fully written
concerning it to the daughter of Gracchus.
Early on the following day I was at the Gardens of
Sallust, where I was present both with the Emperor
and Livia, and with the Emperor and Fronto, and
heard conversations which I here record.
When I entered the apartment, in which it was
customary
for the Empress to sit at this time of the day, I
found her there engaged upon her embroidery, while
the Emperor paced back and forth, his arms crossed
behind
him, and care and anxiety marked upon his
countenance
.
Livia, though she sat quietly at her work,
seemed ill at ease, and as if some thought were busy
within to which she would gladly give utterance. She
was evidently relieved by my entrance, and immediately
made her usual inquiries after the health of the Queen,
in which Aurelian joined her.
Aurelian then turned to me and said,
`I saw you yesterday at the Palatine, Nichomachus;
what thought you of the Christian's defence?'
`It did not convert me to his faith '
`Neither, by the gods! did it me,' quickly interrupted
Aurelian.
`But,' I went on, `it seemed to show good cause why
they should not be harshly or cruelly dealt with. He
proved them to be a harmless people, if not positively
profitable to the state.'
`I do not see that,' replied the Emperor. `It is
impossible
they should be harmless who sap the
foundations
of religion; it is impossible they should be
profitable
who seduce from their allegiance the good subjects
of the empire; and this religion of the Christians does
both.'
`I agree that it is so,' I rejoined, `if it is to be
assumed
in the controversy that the prevailing religion of
the Romans is a perfect one, and that any addition or
alteration is necessarily an evil. That seems to be the
position of Porphyrius and others. But to that I can
by no means assent. It seems to me that the religions
of mankind are susceptible of improvement as
governments
are, and other like institutions; that what may
be perfectly well suited to a nation in one stage of its
growth may be very ill adapted to another; that the
gods in their providence accordingly design that one
form of religious worship and belief should in successive
ages be superceded by others, which shall be more
exactly
suited to their larger growth and more urgent
necessities
.
The religion of the early days of Rome was
perhaps all that so rude a people were capable of
comprehending
all that they wanted. It worked well
for them, and you have reason for gratitude that it was
bestowed upon them, and has conferred so great benefits
upon the preceding centuries. But the light of the sun
is not clearer than it is that for this present passing age,
that religion is stark naught.'  The Emperor frowned,
and stood still in his walk, looking sternly upon me;
but I heeded him not.  `Most of any intelligence and
reflection,' I continued, `spurn it away from them as fit
but for children and slaves. Must they then be
without
any principle of this kind? Is it safe for a
community
to grow up without faith in a superintending
power, from whom they come, to whom they are
responsible
?
I think not. In any such community
and Rome is becoming such a one  the elements of
disruption, anarchy, and ruin, are there at work, and
will overthrow it. A society of atheists is a
contradiction
in terms. Atheists may live alone, but not
together
.
Will you compel your subjects to become
such? If a part remain true to the ancient faith, and
find it to be sufficient, will you deny to the other part
the faith which they crave, and which would be
sufficient
for them? I doubt if that were according to the
dictates of wisdom and philosophy. And how know
you, Aurelian, that this religion of Christ may not be
the very principle which, and which alone, may save
your people from atheism, and your empire from the
ruin that would bring along in its train?'
`I cannot deny,' said the Emperor in reply, `that
there is some sense and apparent truth in what you have
said. But to me it is shadowy and intangible. It is
the speculation of that curious class among men, who,
never satisfied with what exists, are always desiring
some new forms of truth, in religion, in government,
and all subjects of that nature. I could feel no more
certain of going or doing right by conforming to their
theories, than I feel now in adhering to what is already
established. Nay, I can see safety nowhere but in
what already is. There is the only certainty.
Suppose
some enthusiast in matters of government were to
propose his system, by which the present established
insitutions were all to be abandoned and new ones set
up, should I permit him to go freely among the people,
puzzling their heads with what it is impossible they
should understand, and by his sophistries alienating them
from their venerable parent? Not so, by Hercules! I
should ill deserve my office of supreme guardian of
the honor and liberties of Rome, did I not mew him up
in the Fabrician dungeons, or send him lower still to
the Stygian shades.'
`But,' said Livia, who had seemed anxious to speak,
`though it may be right, and best for the interests of
Rome, to suppress this new worship, yet why, Aurelian,
need it be done at such expense of life? Can no way
be devised by which the professors of this faith shall be
banished the realm, and no new teachers of it permitted
to enter it afterward but at the risk of life, or some other
appointed penalty? Sure I am, from what I heard
from the Christian Probus, and what I have heard so
often from the lips of Julia, this people cannot be the
sore in the body of the state which Fronto represents
them.'
`I cannot, Livia,' replied the Emperor, `refuse to
obey what to me have been warnings from the gods.'
`But may not the heavenly signs have been read
amiss?' rejoined Livia.
`There is no truth in augury, if my duty be not
where I have placed it,' answered Aurelian.
VOL. II. 17*
`And perhaps, Aurelian, there is none. I have heard
that the priests of the temples play many a trick upon
their devout worshippers.'
`Livia, it has doubtless been so; but you would not
believe that Fronto has trifled with Aurelian?'
`I believe Fronto capable of any crime by which the
gods may be served. Have you not heard, Aurelian,
what fell from the dying Christian's lips?'
`I have, Livia; and have cast it from me as at best
the coinage of a moonstruck mountebank. Shall the
word of such a one as Macer the Christian, unseat my
trust in such a one as Fronto? That were not
reasonable
,
Livia.'
`Then, Aurelian, if not for any reason that I can
give, for the love you bear me, withhold your hand
from this innocent people. You have often asked me
to crave somewhat which it would be hard for you to
grant, that you might show how near you hold me.
Grant me this favor, and it shall be more to me than if
you gave me the one half the empire.'
The Emperor's stern countenance relaxed, and wore
for a moment that softened expression, accompanied
by a smile, that on his face might be be termed
beautiful
.
He was moved by the unaffected warmth and
winning grace with which those words were spoken by
Livia. But he only said,
`I love thee, Livia, as thou knowest,  but not so
well as Rome.'
`I would not, Aurelian,' replied the Empress, `that
love of me should draw you away from what you owe
to Rome  from what is the clear path of a monarch's
duty; but this seems confessedly a doubtful case. They
who are equally Roman in their blood differ here. It
is not wrong to ask you, for my sake, to lean to the side
of mercy.'
`You are never wrong, Livia. And were it only
right to '
`But are you not, Aurelian, sure of being right in
being merciful? Can it ever afterward repent you that
you drew back from the shedding of blood?'
`It is called mercy, Livia, when he who has the power
spares the culprit, forgives the offence, and sends him
from the gibbet or the cross back to his weeping friends.
The crowds throw up their caps and shout as for some
great and good deliverance. But the mercy that returns
upon the world a villain, whose crimes had richly earned
for him his death, is surely a doubtful virtue. Though,
as is well known, I am not famed for mercy, yet were it
clear to me what in this case were the truest mercy
for the pleasure, Livia, of pleasuring thee, I would be
merciful. But I should not agree with thee in what is
mercy. It were no mercy to Rome, as I judge, to spare
these Christians, whatever the grace might be to them.
Punishment is often mercy. In destroying these
wretches I am merciful both to Rome and to the world,
and shall look to have their thanks.'
`There comes, Aurelian,' said Livia, rising, `thy evil
genius  thy ill-possessing demon  who has so changed
the kindly current of thy blood. I would that he, who
so loves the gods, were with them. I cannot wait him.'
With these words Livia rose and left the apartment,
just as Fronto entered in another direction.
`Welcome, Fronto!' said Aurelian. `How thrive our
affairs?'
`As we could wish, great Emperor. The city with
us, and the gods with us,  we cannot but prosper. A
few days will see great changes.'
`How turns out the tale of Curio? What find you to
be the truth? Are the Christians here, or are they
fled?'
`His tale was partly false and partly true. More are
fled than Piso or the Christians will allow; but
doubtless
the greater part, by large odds, remain.'
`That is well. Then for the other side of this great
duty. Is thine own house purged? Is the temple,
new and of milk-white marble, now as clean and white
in its priesthood? Have those young sots and pimps
yet atoned for their foul impieties?'
`They have,' replied Fronto. `They have been dealt
with; and their carcases swinging and bleaching in the
wind will long serve I trust to keep us sweet. The
temple, I now may believe, is thoroughly swept.'
`And how is it, Fronto, with the rest?'
`The work goes on. Your messengers are abroad;
and it will be neither for want of power, will, nor zeal,
if from this time Hellenism stand not before the world
as beautiful in her purity as she is venerable in years
and truth.'
`The gods be praised that I have been stirred up to
this! When this double duty shall be done, Hellenism
reformed, and her enemy extinct, then may I say that
life has not been spent for naught. But meanwhile,
Fronto, the army needs me. All is prepared, and letters
urge me on. To-morrow I would start for Thrace. Yet
it cannot be so soon.'
`No,' said the priest. `Rome will need you more
than Thrace, till the edicts have been published, and the
work well begun. Then, Aurelian, may it be safely
entrusted
,
so far as zeal and industry shall serve, to those
behind.'
`I believe it, Fronto. I see myself doubly reflected
in thee: and almost so in Varus. The Christians, were
I gone, would have four Aurelians for one. Well, let
us rejoice that piety is not dead. The sacrifice this
morning was propitious. I feel its power in every
thought and movement.'
`But while all things else seem propitious, Aurelian,
one keeps yet a dark and threatening aspect.'
`What mean you?'
`Piso! '
`Fronto, I have in that made known my will, and
more than once. Why again dispute it?'
`I know no will, great Csar, that may cross or
surmount
that of the gods. They to me are supreme, not
Aurelian.'
Aurelian moved from the priest and paced the room.
`I see not, Fronto, with such plainness the will of
Heaven in this.'
`'Tis hard to see the divine will, when the human
will is so strong.'
`My aim is to please the gods in all things,' replied
the Emperor.'
`Love too, Aurelian, blinds the eye, and softening the
heart toward our fellow, hardens it toward the gods.'
This he uttered with a strange significancy.
`I think, Fronto, mine has been all too hard toward
man, if it were truly charged. At least, of late, the gods
can have no ground of blame.'
`Rome,' replied the priest `is not slow to see and
praise the zeal that is now crowning her seven hills with
a greater glory than ever yet has rested on them. Let
her see that her great son can finish what has been so
well begun.'
`Fronto, I say it, but I say it with some inward pain,
that were it plain the will of the gods were so '
`Piso should die!' eagerly interrupted the priest.
`I will not say it yet, Fronto.'
`I see not why Aurelian should stagger at it. If the
will of the gods is in this whole enterprise; if they will
that these hundreds and thousands, these crowds of
young and old, little children and tender youth, should
all perish, that posterity by such sacrifice now in the
beginning
may be delivered from the curse that were else
entailed upon them, then who can doubt, to whom truth
is the chief thing, that they will, nay, and ordain in their
sacred breasts, that he who is their chief and head,
about whom they cluster, from whose station and power
they daily draw fresh supplies of courage, should perish
too; nay, that he should be the first great offering, that
so the multitudes who stay their weak faith on him may,
on his loss, turn again unharmed to their ancient faith.
That too were the truest mercy.'
`There may be something in that, Fronto.
Nevertheless
I do not yet see so much to rest upon one life.
If all the rest were dead, and but one alive, and he Piso,
I see not but the work were done.'
`A thousand were better left, Aurelian, than Piso, and
the lady Julia! They are more in the ears and eyes of
Rome than all the preachers of this accursed tribe.
They are preaching, not on their holydays to a mob of
beggarly knaves, men and women dragged up by their
hot and zealous caterers from the lanes and kennels of
the city, within the walls of their filthy synagogues, but
they preach every day, to the very princes and nobles of
the state  at the capitol to the senate  here in thy
palaces to all the greatest and best of Rome; and, by the
gods! as I believe, make more converts to their impieties
than all the army of their atheistical priesthood. Upon
Probus, Piso, and Julia, hang the Christians of Rome.
Hew them away and the branches die. Probus, ere
to-morrow's
sun is set, feeds the beasts of the Flavian
then '
`Hold, Fronto! I will no more of it now. I have,
besides, assured Piso of his safety.'
`There is no virtue like that of those who, having
erred, repent.'
Aurelian looked for the moment as if he would
willingly
have hurled Fronto, and his temple after him, to
Tartarus. But the bold man heeded him not.
`Shall I,' he continued, `say what it is that thus ties
the hands of the conqueror of the world?'
`Say what thou wilt.'
`Rome says, I say it not  but Rome says 'tis love.'
`What mean they? I take you not. Love?'
`Of the princess Julia, still so called.'
A deep blush burned upon the cheek of Aurelian.
He paused a moment as if for some storm within to
subside
.
He then said, in his deep tone that indicates the
presence of the whole soul  but without passion
`Fronto, 'tis partly true  truer than I wish it were.
When in Syria my eye first beheld her I loved her
as I never loved before and never shall again. But not
for the Emperor of the world would she part from young
Piso. I sued, as man never sued before, but all in vain.
Her image still haunts the chambers of my brain; yet,
with truth do I say it, but as some pure vision sent from
the gods. I confess, Fronto, it is she who stands
between
me and the will of Heaven. I know not what
force, but that of all the gods, could make me harm her.
To no other ear has this ever been revealed. She is to
me god and goddess.'
`Now, Aurelian, that thou hast spoken in the fullness
of thy heart, do I hold thee redeemed from the invisible
tyrant. In our own hearts we sin and err, as we dare
not when the covering is off, and others can look in and
see how weak we are. Thou canst not, great Csar,
for this fondness forget and put far from thee the vision
of thy mother, whom, in dreams or in substantial shape,
the gods sent down to revive thy fainting zeal! Let it
not be that that call shall have been in vain.'
`Fronto, urge now no more. Hast thou seen Varus?'
`I have.'
`Are the edicts ready?'
`They are.'
`Again then at the hour of noon let them glare forth
upon the enemies of Rome from the columns of the
capitol. Let Varus be so instructed. Now I would be
alone.'
Whereupon the priest withdrew, and I also rose from
where I had sat, to take my leave, when the Emperor
said,
`This seems harsh, to thee, Nichomachus?'
`I cannot but pray the gods,' I said, `to change the
mind of Aurelian!'
`They have made his mind what it is, Nichomachus.'
`Not they,' I said, `but Fronto.'
`But,' he quickly added, `the gods made Fronto and
have put their mind in him, or it has never been known
on earth. You know not the worth, Greek, of this
man. Had Rome possessed such a one two hundred
years ago, this work had not now to be done.'
Saying which, he withdrew into his inner apartment,
and I sought again the presence of Livia.
VOL. II. 18
LETTER XI.
FROM PISO TO FAUSTA.
A day
has passed, Fausta, since the hearing of
Probus
,
and I hasten to inform you of its events.
But, first of all, before I enter upon the dark chapter
of our calamities, let me cheer you and myself by
dwelling
a moment upon one bright and sunny sopt. Early
in the day we were informed that Isaac was desirous to
see us. He was at once admitted. As he entered it
was easy to see that some great good fortune had
befallen
him. His face shone through the effect of some
inward joy, and his eyes sparkled in their deep sockets
like burning tapers. When our customary salutations
and inquiries were over, Julia said to him.
`I think, Isaac, you must have sold a jewel this
morning
to no less a person than Aurelian, if the face may be
held as an index of our good fortune.'
`I have parted with no jewel, lady, he replied, 'but
there has fallen into my hands a diamond of inestimable
value, drawn from those mines of the Orient, which I
may say, not all the wealth of Aurelian could purchase
of me. Whenever I shall receive such permission, it
will give me highest delight to show it to thee.'
`Only a single jewel, Isaac?' said Julia. `Is it
but one stone that so transports thee and makes thy face
that of a young man?'
`Lady, to confess the truth, there are fourfour
living
stones and precious  more precious than any that
of old blazed upon the breastplate of our high-priest.
Princess, I have come to tell thee and Piso what none in
Rome besides, as I think, would care to know  and
strange it is that you Christians should be those whom
I, a Jew, most love, and that I, an old and worn-out man,
should fill any space, were it no bigger than a grain of
wheat, in your regards. I have come to tell you what
you have already discovered, that Hagar is arrived with
the young Ishmael, and with them two dark-eyed
daughters
of Israel, who are as welcome as the others. There
is not now, Piso, within the walls of Rome a dwelling
happier than mine. Soon as leisure and inclination shall
serve, come, if you will do us such grace, to the street
Janus, and behold our contentment. Sorry am I that the
times come laden to you with so many terrors. Piso,'
continued he in a more earnest tone and bending toward
me, `rely upon the word of one who is rarely deceived,
and who now tells thee, there is a sword hanging over
thy head! Fronto thirsts for thy life, and thine, lady!
and Aurelian, much as he may love you, is, as we have
already seen, not proof against the violent zeal of the
priest. Come to the street Janus, and I will warrant
you safety and life. There is none for you here  nor
in Rome  if Aurelian's hounds can scent you.'
We were again obliged to state, with all the force we
could give to them, the reasons which bound us to
remain
not only in Rome but in our own dwelling, and
await whatever the times might bring forth. He was
again slow to be convinced, so earnestly does he desire
our safety. But at length he was persuaded that he
himself would take the same course were he called upon
to defend the religion of his fathers. He then departed,
having first exacted a promise that we would soon see
his new family.
Soon as Isaac was gone I sought the streets.
Rome, Fausta, has put on the appearance of the
Saturnalia
.
Although no license of destruction has yet
been publicly given, the whole city is in commotion
the lower orders noisy and turbulent, as if they had
already
received their commission of death. Efforts have
been made, both on the part of the senate and that of
the nobles who are not of that body, joined by many of
all classes, to arrest the Emperor in his murderous
career
,
but in vain. Not the Seven Hills are more firmly
rooted in the earth than he in his purposes of blood.
This is well known abroad; and the people are the
more emboldened in the course they take. They know
well that Aurelian is supreme and omnipotent; that no
power in Rome can come in between him and his
object
,
whatever it may be; and that they therefore,
though they should err through their haste, and in their
zeal even go before the edicts, would find in him a
lenient
judge. No Christian was accordingly to be now
seen in the streets  for nowhere were they safe from
the ferocious language, or even the violent assaults, of
the mob. These cruel executioners I found all along,
wherever I moved, standing about in groups as if
impatiently
awaiting the hour of noon, or else gathered about
the dwellings of well-known Christians, assailing the
buildings with stones, and the ears of their pent-up
inhabitants
with all that variety of imprecation they so
well know how to use. It was almost with sensations
of guilt that I walked the streets of Rome in safety,
bearing a sort of charmed life, while these thousands of
my friends were already suffering more through their
horrible anticipation, than they would when they should
come to endure the reality. But although I passed
along uninjured by actual assault, the tongue was freely
let loose upon me, and promises were abundantly
lavished
that before many days were gone not even the
name of Piso, nor the favor of Aurelian, should save me
from the common doom.
As the hour of noon drew nigh, it seemed as if the
entire population of Rome was pouring itself into the
streets and avenues leading to the capitol. Not the
triumph
of Aurelian itself filled this people with a more
absorbing, and, as it appeared, a more pleasing interest,
than did the approaching calamities of the Christians.
Expectation was written on every face. Even the boys
threw up their caps as in anticipation of somewhat that
was to add greatly to their happiness.
The sixth hour has come and is gone. The edicts
are published, and the Christians are now declared
enemies
of the state and of the gods, and are required to
be informed against by all good citizens, and arraigned
before the Prefect and the other magistrates especially
appointed for the purpose.
All is now confusion, uproar, and cruel violence.
No sooner was the purport of the edicts ascertained
by the multitudes who on this occasion as before
thronged the capitol, than they scattered in pursuit of
their victims. The priests of the temples heading the
furious crowds, they hastened from the hill in every
direction
,
assailing as they reached them the houses of
VOL. II. 18*
the Christians, and dragging the wretched inhabitants
to the presence of their barbarous judges. Although in
the present edicts the people are not let loose as
authorized
murderers upon the Christians, they are
nevertheless
exhorted and required to inform against them and
bring them before the proper tribunals on the charge of
Christianity, so that there is lodged in their hands a
fearful power to harrass and injure  a power which is
used as you may suppose Romans would use it. Every
species of violence has this day been put in practice
upon this innocent people; their perpetrators feeling
sure that in the confusion, deeds at which even Varus
or Aurelian might take offence, will be overlooked. The
tribunals have been thronged from noon till night with
Christians and their accusers. As the examination of
those who have been brought up has rarely occupied
but a few moments, the evidence always being
sufficiently
full to prove them Christians, and when that
has been wanting their own ready confession supplying
the defect  the prisons are already filling with their
unhappy tenants, and extensive provisions are making
to receive them in other buildings set apart for the time
to this office. A needless provision. For it requires
but little knowledge of Aurelian to know that his
impatient
temper will not long endure the tedious process of
a regular accusation, trial, condemnation, and
punishment
.
A year in that case would scarce suffice to
make way with the Christians of Rome. Long before
the prisons can be emptied in a legal way of the tenants
already crowding them, will the Emperor resort to the
speedier method of a general and indiscriminate
massacre
.
No one can doubt this, who is familiar as I am
with Aurelian, and the spirits who now rule him.
Let me tell you now of the fate of Probus.
He was seated within his own quiet home at the
time the edicts were proclaimed from the steps of the
capitol. The moment the herald who proclaimed them
had pronounced the last word, and was affixing them to
the column, the name of Probus was heard shouted
from one side of the hill to the other, and while the
multitude scattered in every direction in pursuit of those
who were known to them severally as Christians, a
large division of it made on the instant for the dwelling
of Probus. On arriving there, roused by the noise of
the approaching throng, Probus came forth. He was
saluted by cries and yells, that seemed rather to proceed
from troops of wild beasts than men. He would fain
have spoken to them, but no word would they hear.
`Away with the Christian dog to the Prefect!' arose
in one defeaning shout from the people; and
Probus
,
being on the instant seized and bound, was led
unresisting
away to the tribunal of Varus.
As he was dragged violently along, and was now
passing the door which leads to the room where Varus
sits, Felix the bishop, having already stood before the
Prefect, was leaving the hall, urged along by soldiers
who were bearing him to prison.
`Be of good cheer, Probus!' exclaimed he; `a crown
awaits thee within. Rome needs thy life, and Christ
thy soul.'
`Peace, dotard!' cried one of those who guarded and
led him; and at the same moment brought his spear
with such force upon his head that he felled him to the
pavement.
`Thou hast slain thyself, soldier, by that blow rather
than him,' said Probus. `Thine own faith has torments
in reserve for such as thee.'
`Thou too!' cried the enraged soldier; and he would
have repeated the blow upon the head of Probus, but
that the descending weapon was suddenly struck
upwards
and out of the hand of him who wielded it by
another belonging to the same Legion who guarded
Probus
,
saying as he did so,
`Hold, Mutius! it is not Roman to strike the bound
and defenceless, Christians though they be. Raise that
fallen old man, and apply such restoratives as the place
affords.' And then, with other directions to those who
were subordinate to him, he moved on, bearing Probus
with him.
Others, who had arrived before him, were standing
in the presence of Varus, who was questioning them as
to their faith in Christ. On the left hand of the
Prefect
,
and on the right of those who were examined,
stood a small altar surmounted by a statue of Jupiter, to
which the Christians were required to sacrifice. But
few words sufficed for the examination of such as were
brought up. Upon being inquired of touching their
faith, there was no waiting for witnesses, but as soon as
the question was put, the arraigned person
acknowledged
at once his name and religion. He was then
required
to sacrifice and renounce his faith, and forthwith
he should be dismissed in safety and with honor. This
the Christian refusing steadfastly to do, sentence of
death was instantly pronounced against him, and he
was remanded to the prisons to await the time of
punishment
.
Probus was now placed before the Prefect. When it
was seen throughout the crowd which again filled the
house, who it was that was arraigned for examination,
there were visible signs of satisfaction all around that
he who was in a manner the ringleader of the sect was
about to meet with his deserts. As the eye of Varus
fell upon Probus, and he too became aware who it was
that stood at his tribunal, he bent courteously towards
him and saluted him with respect.
`Christian,' said he, `I sincerely grieve to see thee in
such a pass. Ever since I met thee in the shop of the
learned Publius have I conceived an esteem for thee,
and would now gladly rescue thee from the danger that
overhangs. Bethink thee now  thou art of too much
account to die as these others. A better fate should be
thine; and I will stand thy friend.'
`Were what thou sayest true,' replied Probus, `which
I am slow to admit  for nobler, purer souls never lived
on earth than have but now left this spot where I stand
it would but be a reason of greater force to me, why I
should lose my life sooner than renounce my faith.
What sacrifice can be too holy for the altar of the God
whom I serve? Would to God I were more worthy
than I am to be offered up.'
`Verily,' said Varus, `you are a wonderful people.
The more fitted you are to live happily to yourselves
and honorably to others, the readier you are to die. I
behold in you, Probus, qualities that must make you
useful here in Rome. Rome needs such as thyself.
Say but the word, and thou art safe.'
`Could I in truth, Varus, possess the qualities thou
imputest to me, were I ready on the moment to abandon
what I have so long professed to honor and believe
abjuring
,
for the sake of a few years more of life, a faith
which I have planted in so many other hearts, and
which has already brought them into near neighborhood
with a cruel death? Couldst thou thyself afterward
think of me but as of a traitor and a coward?'
`I never,' said Varus, `could do otherwise than
esteem
one, who, however late, at length declared himself
the friend of Rome; and more than others should I
esteem
him who from being an enemy became a friend.
Even the Emperor, Probus, desires thy safety. It is at
his instance that I press thee.'
Probus bent his head and remained silent. The
people
taking it as a sign of acquiescence, cried out, many
of them, `See! he will sacrifice!'
Varus too said, `It needs not that the outward sign
be made. We will dispense with it. The inward
consent
,
Probus, shall suffice. Soldiers! '
`Hold, hold, Varus!' cried Probus, rousing himself
from his momentary forgetfulness. `Think not, O
Prefect
,
so meanly of me! What have I said or done to
induce such belief? I was but oppressed for a moment
with grief and shame that I should be chosen out from
among all the Christians in Rome as one whom soft
words and bribes and the hope of life could seduce from
Christ. Cease, Varus, then; these words are vain.
Such as I have been, I am, and shall be to the end  a
Christian!'
`To the rack with the Christian, then!' shouted
many voices from the crowd.
Varus enforced silence.
`Probus,' said he, as order was restored, `I shall still
hope the best for thee. Thou art of different stuff from
him whom we first had before us, and leisure for
reflection
may bring thee to another mind. I shall not
therefore condemn thee either to the rack or to death.
Soldiers, bear him to the prisons at the Fabrician
bridge.'
Whereupon he was led from the tribunal, and
conducted
by a guard to the place of his confinement.
The fate of Probus we now regard as sealed. In
what manner he will finally be disposed of it is vain to
conjecture, so various are the ways, each one more
ingenious
in cruelty than another, in which Christians
are made to suffer and die. Standing as he does, as
virtually the head of the Christian community, we can
anticipate for him a death only of more refined
barbarity
.
Felix too, we learn, is confined in the same prison:
and with him all the other principal Christians of Rome.
We have visited Probus in his confinement. You do
not remember, Fausta, probably you never saw, the
prison at the Fabrician bridge. It seems a city itself, so
vast is it and of so many parts, running upwards in walls
and towers to a dizzy height, and downwards to unknown
depths, where it spreads out in dungeons never visited
by the light of day. In this prison, now crowded with
the Christians, did we seek our friend. We were at
once, upon making known our want, shown to the cell
in which he was confined.
We found him, as we entered, seated and bending
over a volume which he was reading, aided by the faint
light afforded by a lamp which his jailer had furnished
him with. He received us with cheerfulness, and at his
side on the single block of stone which the cell provided
for its inmates, we sat and long conversed. I expressed
my astonishment that the favor of a lamp had been
allowed
him. `It is not in accordance' I said `with the
usages of this place.'
`You will be still more amazed,' he replied, `when I
tell you through whose agency I enjoy it.'
`You must inform us,' we said, `for we cannot guess.'
`Isaac's;' he replied. `At least I can think of no
other to whom the description given me by the jailer
corresponds. He told me upon bringing it to me, that a
kind-hearted old man, a Jew as he believed him, had
made inquiry about me, and had entreated earnestly for
all such privileges and favors, as the customs of the place
would allow. He has even procured me the blessing of
this friendly light  and what is more yet and which fills
me with astonishment  has sent me this volume, which
is the true light. Can it be that Isaac has done all this,
who surely never has seemed to regard me with much
favor?'
`Never doubt that it is he,' said Julia; `he has two
natures, sometimes one is seen, sometimes the other
his Jew nature, and his human nature. His human
heart is soft as a woman's or a child's. One so full of
the spirit of universal love I have never known. At
times in his speech, you would think him a man bloody
and severe as Aurelian himself; but in his deeds he is
almost more than a Christian.'
`As the true circumcision,' said Probus, `is that of the
heart, and as he is a Jew who is one inwardly, so is he
only a Christian who does the deeds of one and has the
heart of one. And he who does those deeds, and has
that heart  what matters it by what name he is called?
Isaac is a Christian, in the only important sense of the
word  and, alas! that it should be so, more than many
a one who bears the name. But does this make Christ
to be of none effect? Not so. The natural light, which
lightens every man who cometh into the world, will here
and there, in every place, and in every age, bring forth
those who shall show themselves in the perfection of
their virtues to be of the very lineage of Heaven  true
heirs of its glory. Isaac is such a one. But what then?
For one such, made by the light of nature, the gospel
gives us thousands. But how is it, Piso, in the city?
Are the wolves still abroad?'
`They are. The people have themselves turned
informers
,
soldiers, and almost executioners. However
large may be the proportion of the friendly or the
neutral
in the city, they dare not show themselves. The
mob of those devoted to Aurelian constitutes now the
true sovereign of Rome  the streets are theirs  the
courts are theirs  and anon the games will be theirs.'
`I am given to understand,' said Probus, `that
to-morrow
I suffer; yet have I received from the Prefect no
warning to that effect. It is the judgment of my keeper.'
`I have heard the same,' I answered, `but I know not
with what truth.'
`It can matter little to me,' he replied, `when the hour
shall come whether to-morrow or to-night.'
`It cannot,' said Julia. `Furnished with the whole
armor of the gospel, it will be an easy thing for you to
encounter death.'
VOL. II. 19
`It will, lady, believe me. I have many times fought
with enemies of a more fearful front. The enemies of
the soul are those whom the Christian most dreads.
Death, is but the foe of life. So the Christian may but
live to virtue and God, he can easily make his account
with death. It is not the pain of dying, nor the manner
of it, nor any doubts or speculations about the life to
come, which, at an hour like this, intrude upon the
Christian's
thoughts.'
`And what then,' asked Julia, as Probus paused and
fell back into himself, `is it that fills and agitates the
mind? for at such a moment it can scarcely possess
itself
in perfect peace.'
`It is this,' replied Probus. `Am I worthy? Have I
wrought well my appointed task? Have I kept the
faith? And is God my friend and Jesus my Saviour?
These are the thoughts that engross and fill the mind.
It is busy with the past  and with itself. It has no
thoughts to spare upon suffering and death  it has no
doubts or fears to remove concerning immortality. The
future life, to me, stands out in the same certainty as
the present. Death is but the moment which connects the
two. You say well, that at such an hour as this the
mind can scarce possess itself in perfect peace. Yet is
it agitated by nothing that resembles fear. It is the
agitation
that must necessarily have place in the mind of
one to whom a great trust has been committed for a long
series of years, at that moment when he comes to
surrender
it up to him from whom it was received. I have
lived many years. Ten thousand opportunities of doing
good to myself and others have been set before me.
The world has been a wide field of action and labor,
where I have been required to sow and till against the
future harvest. Must I not experience solicitude about
the acts and the thoughts of so long a career? I may
often have erred; I must often have stood idly by the
wayside; I must many times have been neglectful, and
forgetful, and willful; I must often have sinned; and it
is not all the expected glory of another life, nor all the
honor of dying in the cause of Christ, nor all the triumph
of a martyr's fate, that can or ought to stifle and overlay
such thoughts. Still I am happy. Happy, not because
I am in my own view worthy or perfect, but because
through Jesus Christ I am taught, in God, to see a
Father
.
I know that in him I shall find both a just and a
merciful judge; and in him who was tempted even as
we are, who was of our nature and exposed to our trials,
shall I find an advocate and intercessor such as the soul
needs. So that, if anxious as he who is human and
fallible
must ever be, I am nevertheless happy and
contented
.
My voyage is ended; the ocean of life is
passed; and I stand by the shore with joyful
expectations
of the word that shall bid me land and enter into
the haven of my rest.'
As Probus ended these words a low and deep murmur
or distant rumbling as of thunder caught our ears, which,
as we listened, suddenly increased to a terrific roar of
lions, as it were directly under our feet. We
instinctively
sprang from where we sat, but were quieted at
once by Probus:
`There is no danger,' said he; `they are not within
our apartment, nor very near us. They are a company
of Rome's executioners, kept in subterranean dungeons,
and fed with prisoners whom her mercy consigns to
them. Sounds more horrid yet have met my ears, and
may yours. Yet I hope not.'
But while he yet spoke, the distant shrieks of those
who were thrust toward the den, into which from a
high ledge they were to be flung headlong, were borne
to us, accompanied by the oaths and lashes of such as
drove them, but which were immediately drowned by
the louder roaring of the imprisoned beasts as they fell
upon and fought for their prey. We sat mute, and
trembling with horror, till those sounds at length ceased
to reverberate through the aisles and arches of the
building.
`O Rome!' cried Probus, when they had died away,
`how art thou drunk with blood! Crazed by ambition,
drunk with blood, drowned in sin, hardened as a
millstone
against all who come to thee for good, how shalt
thou be redeemed? where is the power to save thee?'
`It is in thee!' said Julia. `It is thy blood, Probus,
and that of these multitudes who suffer with thee, that
shall have power to redeem Rome and the world. The
blood of Jesus, first shed, startled the world in its
slumbers
of sin and death. Thine is needed now to sound
another alarm and rouse it yet once more. And even
again and again may the same sacrifice be to be
offered
up.'
`True, lady,' said Probus; `it is so. And it is of
that I should think. Those for whom I die should fill
my thoughts, rather than any concern for my own
happiness
.
If I might but be the instrument by my death,
of opening the eyes of this great people to their errors
and their guilt, I should meet death with gratitude
and joy.'
With this and such like conversation, Fausta, did we
fill up a long interview with Probus. As we rose from
our seats to take leave of him, not doubting that we then
saw him and spoke to him for the last time, he yielded
to the force of nature and wept. But this was but for a
moment. Quickly restored to himself  if indeed when
shedding those tears he were not more truly himself
he bade us farewell, saying with firmness and
cheerfulness
as he did so,
`Notwithstanding, Piso, the darkness of this hour and
of all the outward prospect, it is bright within.
Farewell
!
to meet as I trust in Heaven!'
We returned to the Clian.
When I parted from Probus, at the close of this
interview
,
it was in the belief that I should never see him
more. But I was once again in his dungeon, and then
heard from him what I will now repeat to you. It was
thus.
Not long after we had withdrawn from his cell on our
first visit, Probus, as was his wont when alone, sat
reading
by that dim and imperfect light which the jailer had
provided him. He presently closed the volume and laid
it away. While he then sat musing, and thinking of
the morrow, and of the fate which then probably awaited
him, the door of his cell slowly opened. He looked,
expecting
to see his usual visitant the jailer, but it was a
form very different from his. The door closed, and the
figure advanced to where Probus sat. The gown in
which it was enveloped was then let fall, and the
Prefect
stood before the Christian.
`Varus!' said Probus. `Do I see aright?'
`It is Varus,' replied the Prefect. `And your friend.'
VOL. II. 19*
`I would, now at least, be at friendship with all the
world,' responded Probus.
`Yet,' said Varus, `your friends must be few, that you
should be left in this place of horror alone to meet your
fate.'
`I have no friend powerful enough, on earth at least,
to cope with the omnipotence of Aurelian,' replied
Probus
.
`I am an infant in the grasp of a giant.'
`Thy friends, Christian, are more, and more potent
than thou dreamest of. As I said to thee before, even
Aurelian esteems thee.'
`Strange, that if he esteems me as thou sayest, he
should thrust me within the lions' den, with prospect of
no escape but into their jaws. And can I suppose that
his esteem is worth much to me who crowds his prisons
with those who are nearest to me, reserving them there
for a death the most cruel and abhorred?'
`He may esteem thee, Probus, and not thy faith. 'Tis
so with me. I like not thy faith, but truly do I say it, I
like thee, and would fain serve and save thee. Nay, 'tis
thy firmness and thy zeal in the cause thou hast espoused
that wins me. I honor those virtues. But, Probus, in
thee they are dangerous ones. The same qualities in a
worthier cause would make thee great. That which
thou hast linked thyself to, Christian, is a downward and
a dying one. Its doom is sealed. The word of
Aurelian
has gone forth, and, before the Ides, the blood of
every Christian in Rome shall flow  and not in Rome
only, but throughout the empire. The forces are now
disposing over the whole of this vast realm which at a
sign from the great Head shall fall upon this miserable
people, and their very name shall vanish from the earth.
It is vain to contend. It is but the struggling of a man
with the will and the arm of Jove '
`Varus!'  Probus began.
`Nay,' said the Prefect, `listen first. This faith of
thine, Christian, which can thus easily be destroyed,
cannot be that divine and holy thing thou deemest it.
So judges Porphyrius, and all of highest mark here in
Rome. It is not to be thought of one moment as
possible
that what a God made known to man for truth, he
should afterward leave defenceless, to be trodden to the
dust, and its ministers and disciples persecuted,
formented
,
and exterminated, by human force. Christian,
thou hast been deceived  and all thy fellows are in the
like delusion. Do thou then save both thyself and
them. It is in thy power to stop all this effusion of
blood, and restore unity and peace to an empire now
torn and bleeding in every part.'
`And how, Varus  seeing thou wouldst that I should
hear all  how shall it be done?'
`Embrace, Probus, the faith of Rome  the faith of
thy father, venerable for piety as for years  the faith of
centuries, and of millions of our great progenitors, and
thou art safe, and all thine are safe.'
Probus was silent.
`Aurelian bids me say,' continued the Prefect, `that
doing this, there is not a wish of thy heart, for thyself
or for those who are dear to thee, but it shall be granted.
Wealth, more than miser ever craved, office and place
lower but little than Aurelian's own, shall be thine '
`Varus! if there is within thee the least touch of
humanity
,
cease! Thy words have sunk into these dead
walls as far as into me; yet have they entered far
enough to have wounded the soul through and through.
Not, Varus, though to all thou hast said and promised
thou shouldst add Rome itself and the empire, and still
to that the subject kingdoms of the East and West,
with their treasures, and the world itself, would I prove
false to myself, my faith, and my God. Nor canst thou
think me base enough for such a deed. This is no
great virtue in me, Varus. I hold it not such; nor
may you. Go through the secret chambers of these
prisons with the same rich bribe upon thy tongue, and
not one so fallen wouldst thou find that he would hear
thee through as I have done. Varus, thou knowest not
what a Christian is! Thou canst not conceive how
little a thing life is in his regard set by the side of
truth. I grieve that ever I should have been so
esteemed
by thee as to warrant the proffers thou hast
made. This injures more and deeper than these bonds,
or than all thine array of engines or of beasts.'
`Be not the fool and madman,' said the Prefect, `to
cast away from thee the mercy I have brought. Except
on the terms I have now named, I say there is hope
neither for thee, nor for one of this faith in Rome,
however
high their name or rank.'
`That can make no change in my resolve, Varus.'
`Consider, Probus, well. As by thy renunciation
thou couldst save thyself, I now tell thee, that the lives
of those whom thou holdest nearest, hang also upon thy
word. Assent to what I have offered, and Piso and
Julia live! Reject it, and they die!'
Varus paused; but Probus spoke not. He went on.
`Christian, are not these dear to thee? Demetrius
too, and Felix? Where are the mercies of thy boasted
faith, if thy heart is left thus hard? Truly thou
mightest
as well have lived and died a Pagan.'
`Again I say, Varus, thou knowest not what a
Christian
is. We put truth before life; and if by but a word
that should deny the truth in Christ, or any jot or tittle
of it, I could save the life of Piso, Julia, Felix, Demetrius,
nay, and all in Rome who hold this faith, my tongue
should be torn from my mouth before that word should
be spoken. And so wouldst thou find every Christian
here in Rome. Why then urge me more? Did Macer
hear thee?'
`I hold thee, Probus, a wiser man than he. All
Rome knew him mad. Cast not away thy life. Live,
and to-morrow's sun shall see thee First in Rome!'
`Varus! why is this urgency? Think me not a fool
and blind. Thou knowest, and Fronto and Aurelian
know, that one apostate would weigh more for your bad
cause than a thousand headless trunks; and so with
cruel and insulting craft you weave your snares and
pile to Heaven your golden bribes. Begone, Varus,
and say to Aurelian, if in truth he sent thee on thy
shameful errand, that in the Fabrician prison, in the
same dungeon where he cast Probus the Christian,
there still lives Probus the Roman, who reveres what
he
once revered and loved, truth, and whom his bribes
cannot turn from his integrity.'
`Die then, idiot, in thy integrity! Thou hast thrown
scorn upon one who has power and the will to pay it
back in a coin it may little please thee to take it in. If
there be one torment, Galilean, sharper than another, it
shall be thine to-morrow; and for one moment that
Macer
passed upon my irons, there shall be hours for thee.
Not till the flesh be peeled inch by inch from thy bones,
and thy vitals look through thy ribs, and thy brain boil
in its hot case, and each particular nerve be stretched
till it break, shall thy life be suffered to depart. Then,
what the tormentors shall have left, the dogs of the
streets shall devour. Now, Christian, let us see if thy
God, beholding thy distress, will pity and deliver thee.'
Saying these words, his countenance transformed by
passion to that of a demon, he turned and left the cell.
Never, Fausta, I feel assured, did Aurelian
commission
Varus with such an errand. Fallen though he be,
he has not yet fallen to that lowest deep. Varus
doubtless
hoped to prevail over Probus by his base proposals,
and by such triumph raise his fortunes yet higher with
Aurelian. It was a game worth playing  so he judged,
and perhaps wisely  and worth a risk. For doubtless
one apostate of the rank of Probus would have been of
more avail to them, as Probus said to him, than a
thousand
slain. For nothing do the judges so weary
themselves
,
and exhaust their powers of persuasion, as to
induce
the Christians who are brought before them to
renounce
their faith. So desirous are they of this, that
they have caused, in many instances, those who were
no Christians to be presented at their tribunals, who
have then, after being threatened with torture and death,
renounced a faith which they never professed. Once
and again has this game been played before the Roman
people. Their real triumphs of this sort have as yet
been very few; and the sensation which they produced
was swallowed up and lost in the glory  in the eyes
even of the strangers who are in Rome  which has
crowned us in the steadfast courage with which our
people have remained quietly in their homes,
throughout
all this dreadful preparation, and then, when the
hour of trial drew nigh, and they were placed at the bar
of the judge, and were accused of their religion,
confessed
the charge, boasted in it, and then took their way
to the prison, from which they well knew death only
would deliver them.
That, Fausta, which we have long feared and looked
for, has come to pass, and Probus, our more than friend,
our benefactor, and almost our parent, is by the
Emperor
condemned to death; not, as from the words of
Varus
it might be supposed, to the same torments as those
to which Macer was made subject; but to be thrown to
the beasts in the Flavian, a death more merciful than
that, but yet full of horror. How is it that in the
Roman
mercy seems dead, and the human nature, which
he received from the gods, changed to that of the most
savage beast!
Livia has been with us; and here with us would she
now gladly remain. It is impossible, she says, for us to
conceive the height of the frenzy to which Aurelian is
now wrought up against the Christians. In his
impatience
,
he can scarce restrain himself from setting his
Legions in the neighboring camp at once to the work
of slaughter. But he is, strange as it may seem, in this
held back and calmed by the more bloody-minded, but
yet more politic, Fronto. Fronto would have the work
thoroughly accomplished; and that it may be so, he
adheres
to a certain system of order and apparent
moderation
,
from which Aurelian would willingly break away
and at once flood the streets of Rome in a new deluge
of blood. Livia is now miserable and sad, as she was
but a few months ago gay and happy. At the palace,
she tells us, she hears no sounds but the harsh and
grating voice of Fronto, or the smooth and silvery tones
of Varus. As soon, she says, as Aurelian shall have
departed for the East, shall she dwell either with us, or
fly to the quiet retreat of Zenobia at Tibur.
The day appointed for the death of Probus has
arrived
,
and never did the sun shine upon a fairer one in
Rome. It seems as if some high festival were come,
for all Rome is afoot. Heralds parade the streets,
proclaiming
the death of Probus, Felix, and other
Christians
,
in the Flavian, at the hour of noon. At the
corner
of every street, and at all the public places, the
name of Probus the Christian, condemned to the
beasts, meets the eye. Long before the time of the
sacrifice
had come, the avenues leading to the theatre,
and all the neighborhood of it, were crowded with the
excited thousands of those who desired to witness the
spectacle. There was little of beauty, wealth, fashion,
or nobility in Rome that was not represented in the
dense multitude that filled the seats of the boundless
amphitheatre. Probus had said to me, at my last
interview
with him, Piso, you may think it a weakness in
me; but I would that one at least, whose faith is mine,
and whose heart beats as mine, might be with me at
the final hour. I would, at that hour, meet one eye
that can return the glance of friendship. It will be a
source of strength to me, and I know not how much I
may need. I readily promised what he asked, though
as you may believe, Fausta, I would willingly have
been spared the trial. So that making part of that tide
pouring toward the centre, I found myself borne along
at the appointed hour to the scene of suffering and
death.
As I was about to pass beneath the arched-way which
leads to the winding passages within, I heard myself
saluted by a well-known voice, and turning to the
quarter
whence it came, beheld Isaac, but without his pack,
and in a costume so different from that which he
usually
wears, that at first I doubted the report of my eyes.
But the sound of his voice, as he again addressed me,
assured me it could be no other than he.
`Did I not tell thee, Piso,' said he, `that when the
Christian was in his straits, there thou wouldst see the
Jew, looking on, and taking his sport? This is for
Probus the very end I looked for. And how should it
be otherwise? Is he to live and prosper, who aims at
the life of that to which God has given being and
authority
?
Shall he flourish in pride and glory who hath
helped to pull down what God built up? Not so, Piso.
'Tis no wonder that the Christians are now in this
plight. It could be no otherwise. And in every
corner
of this huge fabric wilt thou behold some of my
tribe looking on upon this sight, or helping at the
sacrifice
.
Yet, as thou knowest, I am not among them.
There is no hope for Probus, Piso?'
`None, Isaac. All Rome could not save him.'
`Truly,' rejoined the Jew, `he is in the lion's den.
Yet as the prophet Daniel was delivered, so may it be
to him. God is over all.'
`God is indeed over all,' I said; `but he leaves us
with our natural passions, affections, and reason, to
work out our own way through the world. We are
the better for it.'
VOL. II. 20
`Doubtless,' said Isaac. `Yet at times, when we
look not for it, and from a quarter we dream not of,
deliverance
comes. So was it to Abraham, when he
thought that by his own hand Isaac his son must be
slain. But why to a Christian should I speak of these?
Dost thou witness the sacrifice, Piso?'
`Yes, at the earnest entreaty of Probus himself.'
`I too shall be there. We shall both then see what
shall come to pass.'
So saying, he moved away toward the lower vaults,
and I passed on and ascended the flight of steps leading
to that part of the interior where it is the custom of
Aurelian
to sit. The Emperor was not as yet arrived, but
the amphitheatre, in every part of it, was already filled
with its countless thousands. All were seated idly
conversing
,
or gazing about as at the ordinary sports of the
place. The hum of so many voices struck the ear like
the distant roar of the ocean. How few of those
thousands
not one perhaps  knew for what it was that
Probus and his companions were now about to suffer a
most cruel and abhorred death! They knew that their
name was Christian, and that Christian was of the same
meaning as enemy of the gods and of the empire; but
what it was which made the Christian so willing to die,
why it was he was so ready to come to that place of
horror and give up his body to the beasts  this they
knew not. It was to them a riddle they could not read.
And they sat and looked on with the same vacant
unconcern
,
or with the same expectation of pleasure, as if
they were to witness the destruction of murderers and
assassins. This would not have been so had that class
of the citizens of Rome, or any of them been present,
however he might affect or feel displeasure for a moment,
would secretly applaud and thank them for the deed.
However this may be, Aurelian suddenly departed
from Rome, and Fronto and Varus filled his place; and
their first act of authority was the seizure of Piso and
the Princess. At Tibur we knew nothing of these
events till they were passed; we caring not to hear of
the daily horrors that were acted in the city, and feeling
as secure of the safety of Piso and Julia as of our own.
It was on a gloomy winter evening when they were
borne away from their home upon the Clian to the
dark vaults beneath the Temple of the Sun, Fronto's
own province. But here again let Piso speak for
himself
,
as I find recorded in the fragment of a letter.
* * * The darkness of the night scarce
permitted
me to see, he says, whither we were borne, but
when the guard stopped and required us to alight from
the carriage in which we had been placed, I perceived
that we were at the steps of the temple  victims
therefore
in his own regions of a man, as much more savage
than Aurelian, as he than a beast of the forest. We
were denied the happiness of being confined in the same
place, but were thrust into separate dungeons, divided by
walls of solid rock. Here, when wearied out by
watching
,
I fell asleep. How long this lasted I cannot tell; I
was wakened by the withdrawing of the bolts of my door.
One, bearing a dim light, slowly opening the door
entered
.
Forgetting my condition I essayed to rise, but
my heavy chains bound me to the floor. Soon as the
noise of my motion caught the ear of the person who
had entered, he said,
`So; all is safe. I am not thy keeper, sir Piso, but
VOL. II. 21
'tis my province to keep the keeper  that is  visit
thee every hour to see that thou art here. Yet, by the
gods! if you Christians have that power of magic which
is commonly reported of you, I see not of what use it
were to watch you thus. How is it with thee, most
noble Piso?'
`That is of little moment; but tell me, if there is
anything
human in thee, where is my wife, and what is her
fate?'
`Be not too much concerned,' he replied. `She is
safe, I warrant you. None but Fronto deals with her.'
`Fronto!' I could only say.
`Yes, Fronto. Fear not, he is an honorable man and
a holy priest.'
`Fronto!' I was about to add more but held my
peace; knowing well that what I might say could avail
nothing for us, and might be turned against us. I only
asked, `why there was such delay in examining and
condemning us?'
`That is a question truly,' he replied; `but not so
easy to be answered. Few know the reason, that I can
say. But what is there in the heart of Fronto that is
kept from Curio? Are thy chains easy, Piso?'
`I would that they might be lengthened. Here am I
bound to the floor without so much as the power to stand
upright. This is useless suffering.'
`'Twas so ordered by Fronto; but then if there is one
in Rome who can take a liberty with him I know well
who he is. So hold thou the lamp, Piso, and I will
ease thee;' and, like one accustomed to the art, he soon
struck apart the chain, and again uniting it left me room
both to stand and move.
`There,' said he as he took again the lamp, `for one
who hates a Christian as he does death, that's a
merciful
deed. But I can tell thee one thing that it will not
ease thee long.'
`That I can believe. But why, once more, is there
this delay?'
`I know not, Piso, whether I should tell thee, but as I
doubt not Fronto would, were he here, I surely may do
the same, for if there are two men in Rome, Piso, whose
humors are the same and jump together, I and Fronto
are they. There is a dispute then, noble Piso, between
Varus and Fronto about the lady Julia  ' and without
heeding my cries the wretch turned and left the vault,
closing after him the heavy door.
How many days in the torture of a suspense and
ignorance
worse than death I lay here I cannot tell. Curio
came as often as he said to see that all was safe, but
there was little said by either; he would examine my
chain and then depart. On the night  the last night I
passed in that agony  preceding my examination by
Varus and Fronto, I was disturbed from my slumbers by
the entrance of Curio. He advanced with as it seemed
to me an unusually cautious step, and I rose expecting
some communication of an uncommon nature. But
what was my amazement, as the light fell upon the face
of him who bore it, to see not Curio but Isaac. His
finger
was on his lips, while in his hand he held the
implements
necessary for sawing apart my chains.
`Piso!' said he in a whispered tone, `thou art now
free,  I could not save Probus, but I can save thee
horses fleet as the winds await thee and the Princess
beyond the walls, and at the Tiber's mouth a vessel
takes you to Berytus. Curio lies drunk or dead, it
matters
little which, in a neighboring vault.' And he set
down the lamp and seized my chain. The strange
devotion
of this man moved me; and were it but to reward
his love I could almost have slipped my bonds. But
other thoughts prevailed.
`Isaac, you have risked your life and that of your
household in this attempt; and sorry am I that I can
pay thee only with my thanks. I cannot fly.'
`Piso! thou surely art not mad? Why shouldst thou
stay in the hands of these pagan butchers  '
`Were this, Isaac, but the private rage of Fronto,
gladly would I go with thee  more gladly would I
give Julia to thy care. But it is not so. It is, as thou
knowest, for our faith that we are here and thus; and
shall we shrink from what Probus bore?'
`Piso, believe me  'tis not for thy faith alone that
thou art here, but for thy riches, and thy wife  '
`Isaac! thou hast been deceived. Sooner would they
throw themselves into a lion's den for sport, than brave
the wrath of Aurelian for such a crime. Thou hast
been deceived.'
`I have it,' replied the Jew, `from the mouth of the
knave Curio, who has told me of fierce disputes,
overheard
by him, between Varus and Fronto concerning
the lady Julia.'
`Their dispute has been, doubtless, whether she too
should be destroyed; for to Fronto is well known the
constant love which Aurelian still bears her. Curio is
not always right.'
`And is this my answer, Piso?' said Isaac. `And
shall I not still see thy wife?'
`No, Isaac; it would be of no avail. Her answer
would be the same as mine.'
`Nevertheless, Piso, I believe that what I have heard
and surmised is so. Fronto and Varus, who have
played with the great Aurelian as a toyman with his
images, may carry even this.'
`Were it so, I put my trust in God, and to him
commend
myself and Julia. For this our faith are we
ready to bear all that man can devise or do.'
Seeing that further argument was vain, Isaac, with
eyes that overflowed as any woman's, embraced me and
left the cell.
On the day which followed the visit of Isaac was I
placed before Fronto and Varus.
It was in the great room of the temple that the
Prefect
and the Priest awaited their victims. It was dimly
illuminated, so that the remoter parts were lost in thick
darkness. So far as the eye could penetrate it, faces
could be discerned in the gloom, of those who were
there to witness the scene. All whom my sight could
separate from the darkness, were of the Roman
priesthood
,
or friends of Fronto. Not that others were
excluded
it was broad day, and the act was a public
one and authorized by the imperial edict  but that no
announcement of it had been made; and by previous
concert the place had been filled with the priests and
subordinate ministers of the Roman temples. I knew
therefore that not a friendly eye or arm was there.
Whatever it might please those cruel judges to inflict
upon myself or Julia; there was none to remonstrate
or interpose. With what emotions, when I had first
VOL. II. 21*
been placed before those judges, did I await the coming
of Julia, from whom I had now been so long parted!
Fervently did I pray that the mercy of Fronto would
first doom her, that she might be sure of at least one
sympathising and pitying heart.
On the right of the Prefect, upon a raised platform,
were set the various instruments of torture and death,
each attended by its half-naked minister.
I had not stood long, when upon the other side of the
room the noise of the dividing crowd, told me that Julia
was entering, and in a moment more she was standing
at a little distance from me and opposite Fronto  I
being
opposite the Prefect. Our eyes met once  and no
more. As I could have desired, Fronto first addressed
her.
`Woman! thou standest here charged with impiety
and denial of the gods of Rome; in other words, with
being a follower of Christ the Nazarene. That the
charge is true, witnesses stand here ready to affirm.
Dost thou deny the charge? Then will we prove its
truth.'
`I deny it not,' responded Julia, `but confess it.
Witnesses
are not needed. The Christian witnesses for
himself.'
`Dost thou know the penalty that waits on such
confession
?'
`I know it, but do not fear it.'
`But for thee to die so, woman, is of ill example to all
in Rome. We would rather change thee. We would not
have thee die the enemy of the gods, of Rome, and of
thyself. I ask thee then to renounce thy vain impiety!'
Julia answered not.
`I require thee, Christian, to renounce Christ!'
Still Julia made no reply.
`Know you not, woman, I have power to force from
thee that which thou wilt not say willingly?'
`Thou hast no such power, Priest. Thou wert else
more than God.'
`Thy tender frame cannot endure the torture of those
engines. It were better spared such suffering.'
`I would gladly be spared that suffering,' said Julia;
`but not at the expense of truth.'
`Think not that I will relent. Those irons shall
rack and rend thee in every bone and joint, except thou
dost renounce that foul impostor, whose curse now lies
heavy upon Rome and the world.'
`Weary me not, Priest, with vain importunity. I am
a Christian, and a Christian will I die.'
`Prepare then the rack!' cried Fronto, his passions
rising; `that is the medicine for obstinacy such as this.
Now bind her to it.'
Hearing that, I wildly exclaimed,
`Priest! thou dar'st not do it for thy life! Touch
but the hair of her head, and thy life shall answer it.
Aurelian's word is pledged, and thou dar'st not break it.'
`Aurelian is far enough from here,' replied the priest.
But were he where I am, thou wouldst see the same
game. I am Aurelian now.'
`Is this then thy commission, had from Aurelian?'
`That matters not, young Piso. 'Tis enough for thee
to know that Fronto rules in Rome. No more! hold
now thy peace! Where an empress has sued in vain,
there is no room for words from thee. Slaves! bind
her, I say! To the rack with her!'
At that I sprang madly forward, thinking only of her
rescue from those murderous fangs, but was at the
same instant drawn violently back both by my chains
and the arms of those who guarded me. The
tormentors
descended from their engines to fulfill the
commands
of Fronto, and, laying hold of Julia, bore her,
without an opposing word, or look, or motion, toward
their instruments of death. And they were already
binding her limbs to the accursed wheels, while Fronto
and Varus both drew nigh to gloat over her agonies,
when a distant sound, as of the ocean lashed by winds,
broke upon the ears of all within that hell. Even the
tormentors paused in their work, and looked at each
other and at Fronto, as if asking what it should mean.
The silence of death fell upon the crowd  every ear
strained to catch the growing sound and interpret it.
`'Tis but the winter wind!' cried Fronto. `On,
cowards
,
with your work!'
But ere the words had left his lips, or those demons
could wind the wheels of their engine, the appalling
tumult
of a multitude rushing toward the temple became
too fearfully distinct for even Fronto or Varus to
pretend
to doubt its meaning. But why it was, or for what,
none could guess; only upon the terror-struck forms of
both the Prefect and the Priest might be read
apprehensions
of hostility that from some quarter was aiming at
themselves. Fronto's voice was again heard:
`Bar the great doors of the temple! let not the work
of the gods be profanely violated.'
But the words were too late; for while he was yet
speaking, Oh Fausta, how shall I paint my agony of joy!
there was heard from the street and from the porch of
the temple itself the shouts of as it were ten thousand
voices,
Tacitus is Emperor! Long live the good
Tacitus
!
Freedom and life were in those cries. The crowds
from the streets swept in at the doors like an advancing
torrent. Varus and Fronto, followed by their
myrmidons
,
vanished through secret doors in the walls behind
them, and among the first to greet me and strike the
chains from my limbs were Isaac and Demetrius.
`And where is the lady Julia?' cried Isaac.
`There!'
He flew to the platform, and turning back the wheels,
Julia was once more in my arms.
`And now,' I cried, `what means it all? Am I awake,
or do I dream?'
`You are awake,' replied Demetrius. `The tyrant
is dead! and the senate and people all cry out for
Tacitus
.'
I now looked about me. The mob of priests was fled,
and around me I beheld a thousand well-known faces
of those who already had been released from their
dungeons
.
Christians and the friends of Christians now
filled the temple.
`We were led hither,' continued Demetrius, `by your
fast friend, and the friend I believe of all, Isaac. None
but he, and those to whom he gave the tidings, knew
where the place of your confinement was; nor was the
day of your trial publicly proclaimed, although we found
the temple open. But for him we should have been, I
fear, too late. But no sooner was the news of
Aurelian's
assassination spread through the city, than Isaac
roused your friends and led the way.'
As Demetrius ceased, the name of Tacitus Emperor,
resounded again throughout the temple, and the crowds
then making for the streets, about which they careered
mad with joy, we were at liberty to depart; and
accompanied
by Isaac and Demetrius, were soon beneath our
own roof upon the Clian.
With what joy then, in our accustomed place of prayer,
did we pour forth our thanksgivings to the Overruling
Providence, who had not only rescued ourselves from
the very jaws of death, but had wrought out this great
deliverance of his whole people! Never before, Fausta,
was Christianity in such peril; never was there a man
who, like Aurelian, united to a native cruelty that could
behold the shedding of blood with the same indifference
as the flowing of water, a zeal for the gods and a love of
country that amounted quite to a superstitious madness.
Had not death interposed  judging as man  no power
could have stayed that arm that was sweeping us from
the face of the earth. Our certain doom was
annihilation
.
The prisons have all been thrown open, and their
multitudes again returned to their homes. The streets
and squares of the capital resound with the joyful
acclamations
of the people. Our churches are once more
unbarred, and with the voice of music and of prayer,
our people testify before Heaven their gratitude for this
infinite mercy.
The suddenness of this transition, from utter
hopelessness
and blank despair to this fullness of peace and
these transports of joy, is almost too much for the frame
to bear. Tears and smiles are upon every face. We
know not whether to weep or laugh; and many, as
who, regarding us with favor and hoping that somewhat
may yet come of our religion advantageous to the world,
maintain a neutral position. These were not there;
owing both to their disinclination to witness scenes so
brutalizing, and to apprehensions lest they should be
betrayed
into words or acts of sympathy, that might lead
to their being confounded with the obnoxious tribe and
exposed to the like dangers. All therefore within the
embrace of those wide-spreading walls were of one
heart and one mind.
While I sat waiting the coming of the Emperor, and
surrounded by those whom I knew not nor had ever
seen, one who occupied a part of the same seat,
accompanied
by his wife and daughters, said to me,
`'Tis to be hoped, sir, that so terrible an example as
this will have its effect in deterring others from joining
this dangerous superstition; and not only that, but strike
so wholesome a terror into those who already profess it,
that they shall at once abandon it, and so the general
massacre of them not be necessary; which indeed I
should be loth to witness in the streets of Rome.'
`If you knew,' I replied, `for what it is these people
are condemned to such sufferings, you would not, I am
sure, express yourself in that manner. You know, I
may presume, only what common report has brought to
your ears.'
`Nothing else, I admit,' he replied. `My affairs
confine
me from morning till night. I am a secretary, sir,
in the office of the public mint. I have no time to
inform
myself of the exact truth of anything but columns
of figures. I am not afraid to say there is not a better
accountant within the walls of Rome. But as for other
things, especially as to the truth in matters of this sort,
I know nothing, and can learn nothing. I follow on as
the world leads.'
`I dare say,' I replied, `you have spoken the truth.
And everyone here present, were he to speak, would
make very much the same declaration. So here are
eighty thousand citizens of Rome assembled to witness
the destruction of men, of whose crime they know
nothing
,
yet rejoicing in their death as if they were
murderers
or robbers! Were you charged with a false
enumeration
of your columns, would not you hold it basest
injustice to suffer punishment before pains were taken to
learn the exact truth in the case? But are you not
acting
the same unjust and cruel part  with all who are
here  in looking on and approving the destruction of
these men, about whose offence you know nothing and
have taken no pains to inquire?'
`By the gods!' exclaimed his wife, who seemed the
sharper spirit of the two, `I believe we have a Christian
here! But however that may be, we should be prettily
set to work whenever some entertainment is in prospect
to puzzle ourselves about the right and the wrong in the
matter. If we are to believe you, sir, whenever a poor
wretch is to be thrown to the beasts, before we can be
in at the sport we must settle the question  under the
law I suppose  whether the condemnation be just or
not! Ha! ha! Our life were in that case most light
and agreeable! The Prefect himself would not have
before him a more engaging task. Gods! Cornelia
dear, see what a pair of eyes!'
`Where, mother?'
`There! in that old man's head. They burn and
twinkle like coals of fire. I should think he must be a
Christian.'
I was not sorry that a new object had attracted the
attention
of this lady of the secretary; and looking where
she pointed, I saw Isaac planted below us and near the
arena. At the same moment the long peal of trumpets,
and the shouts of the people without, gave note of the
approach and entrance of the Emperor. In a moment
more, with his swift step, he entered the amphitheatre,
and strode to the place set apart for him, the whole
multitude
rising and saluting him with a burst of welcome
that might have been heard beyond the walls of Rome.
The Emperor acknowledged the salutation by rising
from his seat and lifting the crown from his head. He
was instantly seated again, and at a sign from him the
herald made proclamation of the entertainments which
were to follow. He who was named as the first to
suffer
,
was Probus.
When I heard his name pronounced, with the
punishment
which awaited him, my resolution to remain
for-sook
me, and I turned to rush from the theatre. But
my recollection of Probus's earnest entreaties that I
would be there, restrained me and I returned to my seat.
I considered, that as I would attend the dying bed of a
friend, so I was clearly bound to remain where I was,
and wait for the last moments of Probus; and the
circumstance
that his death was to be shocking and
harrowing
to the friendly heart was not enough to absolve
me from the heavy obligation. I therefore kept my
place, and awaited with patience the event.
I had waited not long when, from beneath that
extremity
of the theatre where I was sitting, Probus was
VOL. II. 20*
led forth and conducted to the centre of the arena, where
was a short pillar to which it was customary to bind
the sufferers. Probus, as he entered, seemed rather like
one who came to witness what was there than to be
himself
the victim, so free was his step, so erect his form.
In his face there might indeed be seen an expression,
that could only dwell on the countenance of one whose
spirit was already gone beyond the earth, and holding
converse with things unseen. There is always much of
this in the serene, uplifted face of this remarkable man;
but it was now there written in lines so bold and deep,
that there could have been few in that vast assembly but
must have been impressed by it, as never before by
aught human. It must have been this, which brought
so deep a silence upon that great multitude  not the
mere fact that an individual was about to be torn by
lions  that is an almost daily pastime. For it was so,
that when he first made his appearance, and as he moved
toward the centre turned and looked round upon the
crowded seats rising to the heavens, the people neither
moved nor spoke, but kept their eyes fastened upon him
as by some spell which they could not break.
When he had reached the pillar, and he who had
conducted him was about to bind him to it, it was plain,
by what at that distance we could observe, that Probus
was entreating him to desist and leave him at liberty;
in which he at length succeeded, for that person
returned
,
leaving him alone and unbound. O sight of
misery!  he who for the humblest there present would
have performed any office of love, by which the least
good should redound to them, left alone and
defenceless
,
they looking on and scarcely pitying his cruel fate!
When now he had stood there not many minutes, one of
the doors of the vivaria was suddenly thrown back, and
bounding forth with a roar, that seemed to shake the
walls of the theatre, a lion of huge dimensions leaped
upon the arena. Majesty and power were inscribed upon
his lordly limbs; and as he stood there where he had
first sprung, and looked round upon the multitude, how
did his gentle eye and noble carriage, with which no
one for a moment could associate meanness, or cruelty,
or revenge, cast shame upon the human monsters
assembled to behold a solitary, unarmed man torn
limb from limb! When he had in this way looked
upon that cloud of faces, he then turned and moved round
the arena through its whole circumference, still looking
upwards upon those who filled the seats  not till he had
come again to the point from which he started so much
as noticing him who stood, his victim, in the midst.
Then  as if apparently for the first time becoming
conscious
of his presence  he caught the form of Probus;
and moving slowly towards him, looked steadfastly
upon him, receiving in return the settled gaze of the
Christian. Standing there still awhile  each looking
upon the other  he then walked round him, then
approached
nearer, making suddenly and for a moment
those motions which indicate the roused appetite; but,
as it were in the spirit of self-rebuke, he immediately
retreated a few paces and lay down in the sand,
stretching
out his head toward Probus, and closing his eyes as
if for sleep.
The people, who had watched in silence, and with
the interest of those who wait for their entertainment,
were both amazed and vexed, at what now appeared to
be the dullness and stupidity of the beast. When
however
he moved not from his place, but seemed as if he
were indeed about to fall into a quiet sleep, those who
occupied the lower seats began both to cry out to him
and shake at him their caps, and toss about their arms
in the hope to rouse him. But it was all in vain; and
at the command of the Emperor he was driven back to
his den.
Again a door of the vivaria was thrown open, and
another of equal size, but of a more alert and rapid step,
broke forth, and, as if delighted with his sudden liberty
and the ample range, coursed round and round the
arena
,
wholly regardless both of the people and of Probus,
intent only as it seemed upon his own amusement.
And when at length he discovered Probus standing in
his place, it was but to bound toward him as in frolic,
and then wheel away in pursuit of a pleasure he
esteemed
more highly than the satisfying of his hunger.
At this, the people were not a little astonished, and
many who were near me hesitated not to say, that
there might be some design of the gods in this.
Others
said, plainly, but not with raised voices, An omen!
an omen! At the same time, Isaac turned and looked
at me with an expression of countenance which I could
not interpret. Aurelian meanwhile exhibited many
signs of impatience; and when it was evident the
animal
could not be wrought up, either by the cries of the
people or of the keepers to any act of violence, he too
was taken away. But when a third had been let loose,
and with no better effect, nay, with less  for he, when
he had at length approached Probus, fawned upon him
and laid himself at his feet  the people, superstitious
as you know beyond any others, now cried out aloud,
An omen! an omen! and made the sign that Probus
should be spared and removed. Aurelian himself
seemed almost of the same mind, and I can hardly doubt
would have ordered him to be released, but that Fronto
at that moment approached him, and by a few of those
words which coming from him are received by Aurelian
as messages from Heaven, put within him a new and
different mind; for rising quickly from his seat, he
ordered
the keeper of the vivaria to be brought before him.
When he appeared below upon the sands, Aurelian
cried out to him,
`Why, knave, dost thou weary out our patience
thus  letting forth beasts already over-fed? Do thus
again, and thou thyself shalt be thrown to them. Art
thou too a Christian?'
`Great Emperor,' replied the keeper, `than those I
have now let loose there are not larger nor fiercer in
the imperial dens, and since the sixth hour of yesterday
they have tasted nor food nor drink. Why they have
thus put off their nature 'tis hard to guess, unless the
general cry be taken for the truth, that the gods have
touched them.'
Aurelian was again seen to waver, when a voice from
the benches cried out,
`It is, O Emperor, but another Christian device!
Forget not the voice from the temple! The Christians,
who claim powers over demons, bidding them go and
come at pleasure, may well be thought capable to
change, by the magic imputed to them, the nature of a
beast.'
`I doubt not,' said the Emperor, `but it is so. Slave!
throw up now the doors of all thy vaults, and let us see
whether both lions and tigers be not too much for this
new necromancy. If it be the gods who interpose, they
can shut the mouths of thousands as of one.
At those cruel words, the doors of the vivaria were at
once flung open, and an hundred of their fierce tenants,
maddened both by hunger and the goads that had been
applied, rushed forth, and in the fury with which in a
single mass they fell upon Probus  then kneeling upon
the sands  and burying him beneath them, no one could
behold his fate, nor when that dark troop separated and
ran howling about the arena in search of other victims,
could the eye discover the least vestige of that holy
man.  I then fled from the theatre as one who flies
from that which is worse than death.
Felix was next offered up, as I have learned, and after
him more than fourscore of the Christians of Rome.
Rome continues the same scene of violence, cruelty,
and blood. Each moment are the miserable Christians
dragged through the streets either to the tribunals of
the judges, or thence, having received their doom, to the
prisons.
Seeing, Fausta, that the Emperor is resolved that we
shall not be among the sufferers, and that he is also
resolved
upon the total destruction of all within the walls
of Rome, from which purpose no human power can now
divert him, we feel ourselves no longer bound to this
spot, and are determined to withdraw from it, either to
Tibur or else to you. Were there any office of
protection
or humanity, which it were in our power to
perform
toward the accused or the condemned, you may
believe that we should remain fixed to the post of duty.
But the fearful sweep which is making, and yet to be
made, of every living soul in Rome, leaves nothing for
us to do but to stand idle and horror-struck witnesses of
sufferings and wrongs which we can do nothing to avert
or relieve. Portia shares our sorrows, and earnestly
entreats
us to depart, consenting herself to accompany us.
After seeing Zenobia at Tibur, and conversing with
her and Livia, whom I found there, we have resolved
upon Palmyra, and already have I engaged a vessel
bound to Berytus. A brief interval will alone be
needful
for our preparations. Portia goes with us.
In the midst of these preparations, news is brought
us by Milo that Aurelian, hastened by accounts of
disturbances
in the army has suddenly started for Thrace.
But I see not that this can interfere with our
movements
,
unless indeed.......... What can mean this sudden
uproar in the streets?  and now within the house
itself
..........My
fears are come true..........
Fausta, I am a prisoner in the hands of Fronto. I
now write in chains, and Julia stands at my side bound
also. I have obtained with difficulty this grace, to seal
my letter, and bid you farewell.
Thus
were Piso and Julia at length in the grasp of
the cruel and relentless Fronto. Aurelian's sudden
departure
from Rome placed the whole conduct of the
enterprise
he had undertaken in the hands of Varus and
the priest, who were left by the Emperor with full
powers
to carry on and complete the work which he had
begun
.
It was his purpose however, so soon as the
difficulties
in the army should be composed, himself
immediately
to return, and remain till the task were ended
the great duty done. But, as many causes might
conspire
to prevent this, they were clothed with sovereign
authority to do all that the welfare of the city and the
defence and security of religion might require. I will
not charge Aurelian with an unnecessary absence at this
juncture, that so he might turn over to his tools a work,
at which his own humanity and conscience, hardened as
they were, revolted  or rather that they, voluntarily,
and moved only by their own superstitious and
malignant
minds might then be free to do what they might
feel safe in believing would be an acceptable service to
their great master. I will still believe, that had he
intended
the destruction of Piso and Julia, he would, with
that courage which is natural to him, have fearlessly and
unshrinkingly done the deed himself. I will rather
suppose
that his ministers, without warrant from him, and
prompted by their own hate alone, ventured upon that
dark attempt, trusting when it should have once been
accomplished easily to obtain the pardon of him who,
if their reason were gone, both laugh and cry, utter
prayers and jests, in the same breath.
Soon as we found ourselves quietly in possession again
of our own home, surrounded by our own household,
Portia sitting with us and sharing our felicity, the same
feeling impelled us at once to seek Livia and Zenobia.
The Empress was, as we had already learned, at Tibur,
whither she had but this morning fled, upon finding all
interference of no avail, hoping  but how vainly
that possibly her mother, than whose name in Rome
none was greater, save Aurelian's  might prevail,
where her words had fallen but upon deaf ears and stony
hearts. Our chariot bore us quickly beyond the walls,
and toward the palace of the Queen. And as we reached
the entrance, Zenobia at the same moment, accompanied
by Livia, Nichomachus and her usual train, was
mounting
her horse for Rome. Our meeting I need not
describe
.
That day and evening were consecrated to love
and friendship; and many days did we pass there in the
midst of satisfactions of double worth, I suppose, from
the brief interval which separated them from the agonies
which but so lately we had endured.
All that we have as yet learned of Aurelian is this,
that he has met the fate that has waited upon so many
of the masters of the world. His own soldiers have
revenged
themselves upon him. Going forth, as it is
reported
,
to quell a sudden disturbance in the camp, he was
set upon by a band of desperate men  made so by
threats of punishment which he ever keeps  and fell
pierced by a hundred swords. When more exact
accounts
arrive, you shall hear again.
Tacitus, who has long been the idol of the senate, and
of the best part of the people of Rome, famed as you
know for his wisdom and his mild virtues, distinguished
too for his immense wealth and the elegance of his tastes,
was at once, on the news of Aurelian's death, proclaimed
Emperor  not so much however by any formal act of
the senate as by the unanimous will of all  senators and
people. For in order that the chance of peace may be
the greater, the senate, before any formal and public
decree
shall be passed, will wait the pleasure of the army.
But in the meantime, he is as truly Emperor as was
Aurelian  and was, at the first moment the news of the
assassination arrived. His opinions concerning the
Christians, also, being well known, the proclamation of
his name as Augustus, was at the same time a note of
safety and deliverance to our whole community. No
name in Rome could have struck such terror into the
hearts of Varus and Fronto, as that of Tacitus
Tacitus
Emperor!
After our happy sojourn at Tibur, and we had once
more regained our home upon the Clian, we were not
long as you may believe, in seeking the street Janus, and
the dwelling of Isaac. He was happily within and
greeted us with heartiest welcome.
`Welcome, most noble Piso,' he cried, `to the street
Janus!'
`And,' I added, `to the house of a poverty-pinched
Jew! This resembles it indeed!'
`Ah! are you there, Piso? Well, well, if I have
seemed poor, thou knowest why it has been and for
what. Welcome too, Princess! enter, I pray you, and
when you shall be seated I shall at once show you what
you have come to see I doubt not  my assortment of
diamonds. Ah! the news of your arrival has spread,
and they are before me  here, Piso, is the woman of
the desert and the young Ishmael, and here, lady, are
two dark-eyed nymphs of Ecbatana. Children, this is
the beautiful Princess of Palmyra, whose name you have
heard more than once.'
It was a pretty little circle, Fausta, as the eye need
behold; and gathered together here by how strange
circumstances
!
The very sun of peace and joy seemed
breaking from the countenance of Isaac. He caressed
first one and then another, nor did he know how to leave
off kissing and praising them.
When we had thus sat and made ourselves known
all around to each other, Julia said to Isaac, `that she
should hope often to see him and them in the same way;
but however often it might be, and at whatever other
times, she begged that annually, on the Ides of January,
she with Piso might be admitted to his house and board,
to keep with them all a feast of grateful recollection.
Whatever it is that makes the present hour so happy to
us all, we owe, Isaac, to you.'
`Lady! to the providence of the God of Abraham!'
`In you, Isaac, I behold his providence.'
`Lady, it shall be as you say  on the Ides of
January
will we, as the years go round, call up to our minds
these dark and bloody times, and give thanks for the
great redemption. Were Probus but with you, and to
be with you, Piso, your cup were full. And he had
been here, but for the voice of one who, just as the third
lion had been uncaged, fixed again the wavering mind
of Aurelian, who then, madman-like, set on him that
forest-full of beasts. At that moment I found it, Piso,
discreetest to depart.'
VOL. II. 22
`And was your hand in that too, Isaac? Were those
lions of your training? and that knave's lies of your
telling?'
`Verily thou mayest mayest so.'
`But was that the part of a Jew?'
`No,' said Julia, `it was only the part of the Jew.'
`Probus,' said Isaac, `was the friend of Piso and
Julia
,
and therefore he was mine. If now you ask how I
love you so, I can only say I do not know. We are
riddles
to ourselves. When I first saw thee, Piso, I
fancied
thee, and the fancy hath held till now. Now, where
love is, there is power  high as heaven, deep as hell.
Where there is the will, the arm is strong and the wits
clear. Mountains of difficulty and seas of danger sink
into mole-hills and shallow pools. Besides, Piso, there
is no virtue in Rome but gold will buy it, and, as thou
knowest, in that I am not wanting. Any slave like
Curio
,
or he of the Flavian, may be had for a basket-full of
oboli. With these two clues, thou canst thread the
labyrinth
.'
Though our affairs, Fausta, now put on so smiling a
face, we do not relinquish the thought of visiting you;
and with the earliest relenting of the winter, so that a
Mediterranean voyage will be both safe and pleasant,
shall we turn our steps toward Palmyra.
Demetrius greatly misses his brother. But what he
has lost, you have gained.
What at this moment is the great wonder in Rome is
this  a letter has come from the Legions in Thrace in
terms most dutiful and respectful toward the senate,
deploring
the death of Aurelian, and desiring that they
will place him in the number of the gods, and appoint
his successor. This is all that was wanted to confirm
us in our peace. Now we may indeed hail Tacitus as
Augustus and Emperor. Farewell.
Piso has mentioned with brevity the death of
Aurelian
and the manner of it as first received at Rome. I
will here add to it the account which soon became
current
in the capital, and which to this time remains
without
contradiction.
Already has the name of Menestheus occurred in
these memoirs. He was one of the secretaries of the
Emperor, always near him and much in his confidence.
This seemed strange to those who knew both, for
Menestheus
did not possess those qualities which
Aurelian
esteemed. He was selfish, covetous, and
fawning
;
his spirit and manner those of a slave to such as
were above him  those of a tyrant to such as were
below
him. His affection for the Emperor, of which he
made great display, was only for what it would bring
him; and his fidelity to his duties, which was
exemplary
,
grew out of no principle of integrity, but was
merely a part of that self-seeking policy that was the
rule of his life. His office put him in the way to amass
riches, and for that reason there was not one perhaps of
all the servants of the Emperor who performed with
more exactness the affairs intrusted to him. He had
many times incurred the displeasure of Aurelian, and
his just rebuke for acts of rapacity and extortion, by
which never the empire but his own fortune was
profited
;
but so deep and raging was his thirst of gold that it
had no other effect than to restrain for a season a
passion
,
which was destined in its further indulgence to
destroy both master and servant.
Aurelian had scarcely arrived at the camp without
the walls of Byzantium, and was engaged in the final
arrangements of the army previous to the departure for
Syria  oppressed and often irritated by the variety and
weight of the duties which claimed his care  when
about the hour of noon, as he was sitting in his tent, he
was informed, that one from Rome with pressing
business craved to be heard of the Emperor.
He was ordered to approach.
`And why,' said Aurelian, as the stranger entered,
`have you sped in such haste from Rome to seek me?'
`Great Csar, I have come for justice!'
`Is not justice well administered in the courts of
Rome, that thou must pursue me here, even to the gates
of Byzantium?'
`None can complain,' replied the Roman, `that
justice
hath been withheld from the humblest since the
reign of Aurelian '
`How then,' interrupted Aurelian, `how is it that thou
comest hither? Quick! let us know thy matter.'
`To have held back,' the man replied, `till the return
of the army from its present expedition, and the law
could be enforced, were to me more than ruin.'
`What, knave, has the army to do with thee, or thou
with it? Thy matter, quick, I say.'
`Great Csar,' rejoined the other, `I am the builder
of this tent. And from my work-shops came all these
various furnishings, of the true and full value of all of
which I have been defrauded '
`By whom?'
`By one near the Emperor, Menestheus the noble
secretary.'
`Menestheus! Make out the case, and by the great
god of Light, he shall answer it. Be it but a farthing
he hath wronged thee of, and he shall answer it.
Menestheus
?'
`Yes, great Emperor, Menestheus. It was thus.
When the work he spoke for was done and fairly
delivered
to his hands, agreeing to the value of an obolus
and the measure of a hair, with the strict commands he
gave, what does he when he sees it, but fall into a rage
and swear that 'tis not so  that the stuff is poor, the
fashion mean and beggarly, the art slight and imperfect,
and that the half of what I charged, which was five
hundred aurelians, was all that I should have, with
which, if I were not content and lisped but a syllable of
blame, a dungeon for my home were the least I might
expect; and if my knavery reached the ear of
Aurelian
,
from which, if I hearkened to him, it should be his
care to keep it, my life were of less value than a fly's.
Knowing well the power of the man, I took the sum he
proffered, hoping to make such composition with my
creditors, that I might still pursue my trade, for, O
Emperor
,
this was my first work, and being young and just
venturing forth, I was dependent upon others. But
with half the price I charged and is my due, I cannot
reimburse them. My name is gone and I am ruined.'
`The half of five hundred  say you  was that the
sum and all the sum he paid you?'
VOL. II. 22*
`It was. And there are here with me those that will
attest it.'
`It needs not; for I myself know that from the
treasury
five hundred aurelians were drawn, and said by
him for this work  which well suits me  to have been
duly paid. Let but this be proved and his life is the
least that it shall cost him. But it must be well proved.
Let us now have thy witnesses.'
Menestheus at this point, ignorant of the charge then
making against him, entered the tent. Appalled by the
apparition of the injured man, and grasping at a glance
the truth, all power of concealment was gone, conscious
guilt was written in the color and in every line and
feature
of the face.
`Menestheus!' said Aurelian, `knowest thou this
man?'
`He is Virro, an artisan of Rome;' replied the
trembling
slave.
`And what think you makes him here?'
The secretary was silent.
`He has come, Menestheus, well stored with proofs,
beside those which I can furnish, of thy guilt. Shall
the witnesses be heard? Here they stand.'
Menestheus replied not. The very faculty of speech
had left the miserable man.
`How is it,' then said Aurelian in his fiercest tones,
`how is it that again for these paltry gains, already
rolling
in wealth  thou wilt defile thy own soul, and bring
public shame upon me too, and Rome? Away to thy
tent! and put in order thine own affairs and mine. Thou
hast lived too long. Soldiers, let him be strongly
guarded.  Let Virro now receive his just dues. Men
call me cruel, and well I fear they may, but unjust,
rapacious
,
never, as I believe. Whom have I wronged,
whom oppressed? The poor of Rome, at least, cannot
complain of Aurelian. Is it not so, sirrah?'
`Rome,' he replied, `rejoices in the reign of Aurelian.
His love of justice and of the gods give him a place in
every heart.'
Whether Aurelian would have carried into execution
the threat which in a moment of passion he had
passionately
uttered  none can tell. All that can be said is
this, that he rarely threatened but he kept his word.
This the secretary knew, and knew therefore, that
another
day he might never see. His cunning and his wit
now stood him in good stead. A doomed man  he was
a desperate man, and no act then seemed to him a crime
by which his doom might be averted. Retiring to his
tent to fulfill the commands of the Emperor, he was
there left alone, the tent being guarded without; and
then as his brain labored in the invention of some device
by which he might yet escape the impending death and
save a life which  his good name being utterly blasted
and gone could have been but a prolonged shame  he
conceived and hatched a plan, in its ingenuity, its
wickedness
,
and atrocious baseness, of a piece with his whole
character and life. In the handwriting of the Emperor,
which he could perfectly imitate, he drew up a list of
some of the chief officers of the army  by him
condemned
to death on the following day. This paper, as
he was at about the eleventh hour led guarded to his
place of imprisonment, he dropped at the tent door of
one whose name was on it.
It fell into the intended hands; and soon as the
friendly night had come the bloody scroll was borne
from tent to tent, stirring up to vengeance the designated
victims. No suspicion of fraud ever crossed their minds;
but amazed at a thirst of blood so insatiable, and which,
without cause assigned, could deliver over to the axe his
best and most trusted friends, Carus, Probus, Mucapor
they doubted whether in truth his reason were not
gone, and deemed it no crime, but their highest duty, to
save themselves by the sacrifice of one who was no
longer to be held a man.
After the noon of this day the army had made a short
but quick march to Heraclea. Aurelian  the tents
being
pitched  the watch set  the soldiers, weary with
their march, asleep  himself tired with the day's duty
sat with folded arms, having just ungirded and thrown
from him his sword. His last attendant was then
dismissed
,
who passing from the tent door encountered the
conspirators as they rushed in, and was by them hewn
to the ground. Aurelian, at that sound, sprang to his
feet. But alone, with the swords of twenty of his
bravest generals at his breast  and what could he do?
One fell at the first sweep of his arm; but ere he could
recover himself  the twenty seemed to have sheathed
their weapons in his body. Still he fought, but not a
word did he utter till the dagger of Mucapor, raised
aloft, was plunged into his breast, with the words,
`This Aurelia sends!'
`Mucapor!' he then exclaimed as he sank to the
ground, `canst thou stab Aurelian?' Then turning
toward
the others, who stood looking upon their work,
he said, `Why, soldiers and friends, is this? Hold,
Mucapor, leave in thy sword, lest life go too quick;
I would speak a word ' and he seized the wrist of
Mucapor and held it even then with an iron grasp. He
then added, `Romans! you have been deceived! You
are all my friends, and have ever been. Never more
than now ' His voice fell.
Probus then, reaching forward, cried out, unfolding at
the same moment the bloody list,
`See here, tyrant! are these thy friends?'
The eyes of Aurelian, waking up at those words with
all the intentness of life, sought the fatal scroll and
sharply scanned it  then closing again, he at the same
moment drew out the sword of Mucapor, saying as he
did so,
`'Tis the hand of Menestheus  not mine. You
have been deceived.' With that he fell backwards and
expired.
Those miserable men then looking upon one another
the truth flashed upon them; and they knew that to save
the life of that mean and abject spirit they there stood
together murderers of the benefactor of many of them
the friend of all  of a General and Emperor whom,
with all his faults, Rome would mourn as one who had
crowned with a new glory her Seven Hills. How did
they then accuse themselves for their unreasonable
haste  their blind credulity! How did they bewail
the cruel blows which had thus deprived them of one,
whom they greatly feared indeed, but whom also they
greatly loved! above all, one whom, as their master in
that art which in every age has claimed the admiration
of the world, they looked up to as a very god! Some
reproached themselves; some, others; some threw
themselves
upon the body of Aurelian in the wildness of their
remorse and grief; and all swore vengeance upon the
miscreant who had betrayed them.
Thus perished the great Aurelian  for great he
truly was, as the world has ever estimated greatness.
When the news of his assassination reached Rome, the
first sensation was that of escape, relief, deliverance;
with the Christians, and all who favored them though
not of their faith, it was undissembled joy. The
streets presented the appearances which accompany an
occasion of general rejoicing. Life seemed all at once
more secure. Another bloody tyrant was dead, by the
violence which he had meted out to so many others,
and they were glad. But with another part of the
Roman people it was far otherwise. They lamented
him as the greatest soldier Rome had known since
Csar; as the restorer of the empire; as the stern but
needful reformer of a corrupt and degenerate age; as
one who to the army had been more than another
Vespasian
;
who, as a prince, if sometimes severe, was
always
just, generous, and magnanimous. These were
they, who, caring more for the dead than for the
living
,
will remember concerning them only that which is
good. They recounted his virtues and his claims to
admirationwhich were unquestionable and greatand
forgot, as if they had never been, his deeds of cruelty,
and the wide and wanton slaughter of thousands and
hundreds of thousands, which will ever stamp him as
one destitute of humanity, and whose almost only title
to the name of man was, that he was in the shape of
one. For how can the possession of a few of those
captivating
qualities, which so commonly accompany the
possession of great power, atone for the rivers of blood
which flowed wherever he wound his way?
I have now ended what I proposed to myself. I have
arranged and connected some of the letters of Lucius
Manlius Piso, having selected chiefly those which related
to the affairs of the Christians and their sufferings
during
the last days of Aurelian's reign. Those days were
happily few. And when they were passed, I deemed
that never again, so fast did the world appear to grow
wiser and better, could the same horrors be repeated.
But it was not so; and under Diocletian I beheld that
work in a manner perfected, which Aurelian did but
begin
.
I have outlived the horrors of those times, and at
length, under the powerful protection of the great
Constantine
,
behold this much-persecuted faith secure. In
this I sincerely rejoice, for it is to Christianity alone, of
all the religions of the world, may be safely intrusted
the destinies of mankind.
END.